The Washington National Cathedral , the nation's traditional host of prayer services for presidents and memorial services for national tragedies, announced on Wednesday that it would now also hold weddings for same-sex couples.The cathedral, a neo-Gothic landmark in northwest Washington, is the seat of the presiding bishop of the Episcopal Church and the Washington Diocese. Episcopalians voted at their convention last summer to authorize an official liturgy for blessing same-sex unions, bringing the church in line with other liberal Christian and Jewish denominations that sanction gay marriage.The cathedral's decision is not surprising for a denomination that has paid a price for its stance. The Episcopal Church shed members and set off an uproar in the international Anglican Communion to which it belongs by consecrating its first openly gay bishop in 2003.But the cathedral's step carries weight because of its historic role as the nation's unofficial capitol of worship, where Presidents Dwight D. Eisenhower and Ronald Reagan were eulogized, where the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. gave his last Sunday sermon and where the nation mourned the victims of the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks. Later this month, the cathedral will host the second inaugural prayer service for President Obama.The cathedral's dean, the Very Rev. Gary Hall, said: "We have a lot of gay and lesbian Christians. What the National Cathedral is saying by doing this is we want to give faithful lesbian, bisexual, gay and transgender people the same tools for living their lives faithfully that straight people have always had, and marriage is one of those tools. This comes out of even more of a theological understanding, for me, than it does out of a political agenda."Nine states and the District of Columbia have legalized marriage for gay couples. Not all Episcopal bishops have allowed priests to bless same-sex unions, but the bishop of Washington, Mariann Edgar Budde, who oversees parishes in the district and parts of Maryland, recently allowed such unions after Maryland's voters approved gay marriage in November.Bishops in five dioceses and priests in at least 100 parishes have broken from the Episcopal Church since it consecrated its first openly gay bishop, V. Gene Robinson, in New Hampshire. Bishop Robinson recently retired. According to the church's headquarters in New York, membership has held steady at 2.2 million, though others say membership has declined.The Washington National Cathedral has about one thousand regular congregants and many more visitors who attend Sunday services. Dean Hall said that the cathedral marries only couples who are congregants, volunteers, donors or graduates of the cathedral's schools, but that there are no gay couples yet "in the pipeline."Three years ago, before there was an officially sanctioned rite, the cathedral held a private wedding ceremony for a gay couple on its staff that was presided over by John Chane, the previous Bishop of Washington, a cathedral spokesman said. Dean Hall said members of the selection committee that interviewed him last year made it clear that they wanted the cathedral to bless same-sex marriages.
WASHINGTON — The pastor whom President Obama has chosen to deliver the benediction at his inauguration this month delivered a sermon in the 1990s in which he called on fellow Christians to fight the "aggressive agenda" of the gay rights movement and advocated "the healing power of Jesus" as "the only way out of a homosexual lifestyle."Think Progress, a liberal blog affiliated with the Center for American Progress Action Fund, reported Wednesday afternoon on the sermon delivered by the Rev. Louie Giglio, an Atlanta minister and founder of the Passion Conferences, a group dedicated to uniting college students in worship and prayer.The speech, "In Search of a Standard — Christian Response to Homosexuality," can be heard on Discipleship Library, a Christian training Web site.In it, Mr. Giglio cites Scripture in saying that homosexuality "is sin in the eyes of God, and it is sin in the word of God." He warned against gay rights. "That movement is not a benevolent movement," he said. "It is a movement to seize by any means necessary the feeling and the mood of the day, to the point where the homosexual lifestyle becomes accepted as a norm in our society."Inaugural officials did not respond to a request for comment, and a spokeswoman for Mr. Giglio was not available.Wayne Besen, founder of Truth Wins Out, which fights antigay sentiment, said: "It is imperative that Giglio clarify his remarks and explain whether he has evolved on gay rights, like so many other faith and political leaders. It would be a shame to select a preacher with backward views on L.G.B.T. people at a moment when the nation is rapidly moving forward on our issues."The controversy over Mr. Giglio carries echoes of the 2009 inaugural, when Mr. Obama offended many gay people by selecting the Rev. Rick Warren, author of "A Purpose Driven Life" and an opponent of same-sex marriage, to deliver the invocation. Gay rights advocates have not forgotten."You'd think that once burned, the Obama inaugural team would be twice shy about picking an antigay bigot for the swearing-in ceremony," John Aravosis wrote on Americablog, which covers gay and lesbian issues. "Well, meet Rick Warren-lite, Pastor Louie Giglio."But the president also pleased his gay constituency on Wednesday, when his committee announced that it had selected Richard Blanco, an openly gay writer of Cuban descent, to be the 2013 inaugural poet.
WASHINGTON — The minister selected by President Obama to deliver the benediction at his inaugural withdrew Thursday from the program, putting a quick end to a developing controversy over a sermon he gave in the 1990s in which he called on Christians to fight the "aggressive agenda" of the gay-rights movement.The minister, the Rev. Louie Giglio, said in a statement that he would "continue to pray regularly for the president" — including on Inauguration Day — but did not want to become a distraction."Due to a message of mine that has surfaced from 15-20 years ago," the statement said, "it is likely that my participation and the prayer I would offer will be dwarfed by those seeking to make their agenda the focal point of the inauguration."Officials at Mr. Obama's Presidential Inaugural Committee, which operates separately from the White House, announced the decision — less than 24 hours after news of Mr. Giglio's sermon surfaced — and took responsibility for failing to properly vet him."We were not aware of Pastor Giglio's past comments at the time of his selection, and they don't reflect our desire to celebrate the strength and diversity of our country at this inaugural," said Addie Whisenant, the spokeswoman for the committee. "Pastor Giglio was asked to deliver the benediction in large part for his leadership in combating human trafficking around the world. As we now work to select someone to deliver the benediction, we will ensure their beliefs reflect this administration's vision of inclusion and acceptance for all Americans."Mr. Giglio is founder of the Passion Conferences, an Atlanta organization that brings college students together in prayer and worship. The sermon, titled "In Search of a Standard — Christian Response to Homosexuality," can be heard on a Christian training Web site. In it, he said homosexuality is "sin in the eyes of God, and it is sin in the word of God."He also advocated "the healing power of Jesus" as "the only way out of a homosexual lifestyle" — a comment some gay-rights advocates interpreted as an endorsement of reparative therapy, or so-called gay-to-straight conversion, as a supposed cure for homosexuality.The minister's quick withdrawal highlights how sensitive the White House is to concerns over gay rights. It comes at a time when Mr. Obama's candidate for defense secretary, Chuck Hagel, a former Nebraska senator, is under fire for comments he made about gay people in the 1990s; some activists said the administration could ill afford two controversies over gay rights at the same time."It was the right decision," said Chad Griffin, the president of the Human Rights Campaign, a Washington-based advocacy group. "Participants in the inaugural festivities should unite rather than divide. Choosing an affirming and fair-minded voice as his replacement would be in keeping with the tone the president wants to set for his inaugural."The Giglio controversy echoes a controversy over Mr. Obama's 2009 inaugural, when he angered many gay-rights advocates by selecting the Rev. Rick Warren, author of "The Purpose Driven Life" and an outspoken opponent of same-sex marriage, to deliver the benediction."I think this is actually a bigger deal than Rick Warren because this gentleman is in many ways much worse," said Richard Socarides, who advised President Bill Clinton on issues concerning gay people. "Rick Warren was not a good choice but he is kind of in the mainstream of religious thinking, but this guy is really an outlier."Mr. Obama, who opposed same-sex marriage until last year, is featuring gay and lesbian people in several ways at his inaugural. He has selected Richard Blanco, a poet of Cuban descent who is openly gay, to be the 2013 inaugural poet. And for the second time, he has invited the Gay and Lesbian Band Association to march in the parade, becoming the first president to do so.
PROVIDENCE, R.I. — Rhode Island, the only state in New England that has not legalized gay marriage, began taking up the matter this week. The State House is expected to pass a bill Thursday that would allow anyone to marry "any eligible person regardless of gender."But the measure faces resistance in the State Senate and its fate is uncertain. Teresa Paiva-Weed, a Democrat who is the Senate president, opposes same-sex marriage but has said she would allow a vote on it in committee. Supporters say that if it gets to the Senate floor, the measure will pass, but opponents are skeptical and state senators are being lobbied heavily by both sides.Supporters of same-sex marriage have sought to build on the momentum from last year's elections, when voters in Maine, Maryland and Washington State approved it at the ballot box. Rhode Island is one of several states, including Delaware, Hawaii, Illinois, Minnesota and New Jersey, where supporters of gay marriage are trying to make legislative gains this year.Of the nine states where gay marriage is already legal, five — Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire and Vermont — are in New England. (The other four are Maryland, Iowa, New York and Washington, as well as the District of Columbia.) If the measure passes here, New England would become the first solid block of states in the country to allow gay marriage, underscoring the region's reputation as the nation's most liberal, and perhaps its least religious. A Gallup survey found that all six New England states rank among the bottom 10 states for weekly church attendance.And yet Rhode Island has seemed out of step with the rest of New England in not embracing gay marriage sooner. It was only on Tuesday that the House Judiciary Committee approved a same-sex marriage bill, albeit unanimously. It had come up in committee once before, in 2001, but only one person supported it.The voting here comes almost a decade after same-sex marriage became legal in neighboring Massachusetts."There was deep-rooted religious opposition," said state Representative Frank G. Ferri, a Democrat who is the deputy majority leader, and who is gay. "Even though we're mostly Democrats, we had many conservative Democrats who have kept this at bay."Perhaps the biggest reason for the turnabout is that supporters of gay marriage made an effort last year to elect sympathetic candidates to the General Assembly."We began planning for that by reaching out to pro-equality candidates and working with pro-equality incumbents," said Ray Sullivan, campaign director for Rhode Islanders United for Marriage.As a result, he said, they helped elect nine of the 10 new House members and the five new senators who support gay marriage. They have been joined by a broad-based coalition of religious, labor and civic groups and numerous elected officials, including the House speaker, Gordon D. Fox, who is gay, and the governor, Lincoln Chafee, an independent, who is now a strong proponent of same-sex marriage.Governor Chafee has made appeals for the bill on the grounds of religious tolerance, invoking the spirit of Roger Williams, who founded Rhode Island, which became a haven from religious persecution.He has also said gay marriage could help the state's lagging economy. "We are at an economic disadvantage with our neighboring states when we do not have the welcome mat out for all those who want to work here and contribute to our economy," Mr. Chafee said after the vote on Tuesday.The driving force against gay marriage is the National Organization for Marriage Rhode Island, an offshoot of the national group that has worked against it in several other states. It objects, among other things, to the suggestion that Rhode Island has some kind of obligation to go along with the rest of New England."We belong to the United States of America, not to the United States of New England," said Christopher Plante, the executive director. "Rhode Island stands with the vast majority of Americans in understanding that marriage is the union of one man and one woman." Thirty states have constitutional amendments banning same-sex marriage.Opponents say that Rhode Island never considered the issue before because most voters, most legislators and previous governors were against it."Today, Rhode Island has a more liberal governor and a House speaker wielding much political influence who has made it a personal mission to pass this legislation," said Darrell Lee, a founding member of the Faith Alliance of Rhode Island, a group of religious and civic leaders against the bill.Standing in the Judiciary Committee hearing room after Tuesday's vote, Mr. Lee said that gay-marriage advocates "have done a good job at putting pressure on the Legislature, and what you saw today was the Legislature caving into the pressure of these organized groups."But, he said, their efforts had also "awakened the faith community beyond that previously represented primarily by the Catholic Church." The Faith Alliance brought out hundreds of opponents at a hearing last week that lasted more than six hours; many were Latino members of Pentecostal churches.Still, the religious community here is deeply split. Bishop Thomas Tobin of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Providence strongly opposes the measure and last week called gay marriage "immoral and unnecessary."Rhode Island's Episcopal bishop, W. Nicholas Knisely, supports it, saying gays and lesbians deserve the same rights as any other couple. "Christ welcomed all to his table," said the Rev. Gene Dyszlewski, chairman of the Rhode Island Religious Coalition for Marriage Equality. "We hope to follow his example."
PROVIDENCE, R.I. — The Rhode Island House of Representatives on Thursday handily passed a bill to legalize same-sex marriage , paving the way for a showdown in the State Senate in the only New England state where it is not allowed.The measure, which would allow anyone to marry "any eligible person regardless of gender," passed 51 to 19 after about an hour and a half of debate. But the cheers that filled the viewing gallery were quickly tempered by the bill's uncertain future."It's off to the Senate now," Dennis Byrnes of Cranston, R.I., said to a fellow onlooker. Mr. Byrnes married his husband over the border in Massachusetts.The Senate president, Teresa Paiva-Weed, is opposed to same-sex marriage, although she has committed to allow the Senate Judiciary Committee to take up the bill, which will most likely happen in the spring.Supporters of the measure, including the speaker of the House, Gordon Fox, who is gay, hoped to capitalize on the apparent national momentum: voters in Maine, Maryland and Washington State approved same-sex marriage in referendums last November. Closer to home, advocates cited the election of new lawmakers who support same-sex marriage as a reason to put the issue in front of the General Assembly just two years after civil unions were legalized here."The time has come," Mr. Fox said on Thursday, drawing on President Obama's expressed support of same-sex marriage during his Inaugural Address on Monday.But even Mr. Fox conceded that though Rhode Island is in many ways a deeply Democratic state, it is probably more socially conservative than its neighboring New England states, all of which have legalized same-sex marriage."It's a combination of the quirkiness of our little state, the really entrenched opposition of our Catholic Church," as well as the dominant role that the church has historically played in the state, Mr. Fox said.Both advocates for and opponents of gay marriage vowed to use grass-roots support and direct lobbying to sway the state's senators."The importance of getting the bill out of the House early, and over to the Senate, is key to our strategic goals," said Ray Sullivan, the campaign director of Rhode Islanders United for Marriage, a coalition in support of the bill.Opponents, meanwhile, were confident that the measure would not succeed."The Senate has always been a stalwart for protecting life, marriage and family in Rhode Island," said Christopher Plante, the executive director of the National Organization for Marriage Rhode Island, the driving force behind the opposition here."Rhode Island has bigger issues than gay marriage," Mr. Plante said. "Our economy remains stagnant at best, in the tank at worst. We're tied for the worst unemployment rate in the nation. There's going to be a lot of things on the agenda between now and whenever the Senate decides to take this up."
WASHINGTON — When Mark Takano ran unsuccessfully for Congress twice in the early 1990s, his opponents tried to smear him as a "homosexual liberal" and a "nutzoid." One of them even had pink fliers printed that asked, "A Congressman for Riverside ... Or San Francisco?"When he ran again last year, he won by almost 20 points. "Flash forward 18 years," Mr. Takano said recently, "and the very macho building tradesmen are behind me. I'm getting pictures with them in their hard hats."For decades, the words "gay" and "Congress" were usually seen together only in stories of scandal and shame: an arrest after an illicit proposition in an airport bathroom, accusations of trawling for sex on a phone service. When Gerry E. Studds came out 30 years ago, the first congressman to do so, it was only after an affair with a 17-year-old Congressional page was revealed.But in the 113th Congress there are six openly gay or bisexual members in the House — a small but tangible sign that their presence at the highest levels of government is no longer something only whispered about. The Senate has its first lesbian, Tammy Baldwin of Wisconsin. The lawmakers' partners, no longer relegated to the shadows or introduced generically as "friends," stood beside them on the House floor when they were sworn in this month. Their adopted children are attending Congressional retreats.And this week they sat in President Obama's presence as he insisted on equality for "our gay brothers and sisters," words few of them ever expected to hear in a president's Inaugural Address.Congress has never been an accurate reflection of the country it serves. It remains far whiter, wealthier and more male than the nation's population. But as their numbers in Congress gradually increase, there is a sense among these newcomers that they are forcing some of their colleagues to rethink gay rights and homosexuality. The presence of openly gay men and women and their families was a factor that many believe was decisive in turning the tide for states where same-sex marriage was legalized by legislatures. Seeing them helped put a human face on a concept that many legislators had thought about only in the abstract.Yet even with the opportunities gay men, lesbians and bisexuals say their membership in Congress presents, their reception has not been a completely warm one. One of the first acts of the Republican-controlled House was to set aside funds to defend the 1996 law that prohibits the recognition of same-sex marriages because the Obama administration has stopped supporting it. And not everyone seems completely comfortable with their presence, like members of a Christian prayer group who seemed taken aback at a recent Congressional retreat when one noted he was married to a man. But in some ways the most telling sign of the gay lawmakers' advancement in Congress is the fact that their presence is now a little more routine."It's becoming — ever so slowly — more than a novelty to be a gay member of Congress," said Representative David Cicilline of Rhode Island. Like all the openly gay, lesbian and bisexual members, Mr. Cicilline is a Democrat.Representative Jared Polis of Colorado observed that it was not too long ago "when it was just Barney and Tammy." He was referring to Ms. Baldwin, a member of the House before she was elected to the Senate, and Barney Frank of Massachusetts, who retired but was the first member of Congress to speak openly about his homosexuality."But with six of us" in the House, "it's harder to keep track. And it's always going to be assumed that there are gays and lesbians in the room," added Mr. Polis, who has a young son with his partner and is the most senior gay member of the House. Together the six of them will lead a caucus that will champion gay rights and other equal protection issues. The other members will include Mr. Cicilline; Mr. Takano of California; Sean Patrick Maloney of New York; Kyrsten Sinema of Arizona, who is bisexual; and Mark Pocan of Wisconsin.Mr. Pocan was elected to fill Ms. Baldwin's House seat. In the last Congress, there were four openly gay or lesbian House members and none in the Senate.The retirement of Mr. Frank, long the dominant voice on gay rights in Congress, also opens the door to some of the newer, fresher faces to take more visible and influential roles. "Barney Frank, who we all know and love, is one of those larger-than-life personalities," Mr. Polis said. "But certainly the way I'd approach this is in a much more collaborative manner."Seven out of 535 is still relatively small. It equals just over 1 percent of the seats in the House and Senate."Seven isn't great," conceded Denis Dison, a senior strategist with the Victory Fund, which works to elect openly gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgendered people to public office.
ATLANTA — Here at the nation's largest gathering of politically minded gays and lesbians, President Obama's historic inclusion of sexual orientation in his inauguration speech just days earlier would seem to be cause for celebration.And it was, sort of. But as nearly 3,300 people gathered for the annual National Gay and Lesbian Task Force conference, the congratulatory mood was tempered by notes of caution and assurances that gay leaders would continue to pressure the White House to do more, including offering job protection to gays and lesbians who work for the federal government and weighing in on two pending Supreme Court cases regarding same-sex marriage."People see it as an opening, but I don't know that people see it as a promise or a guarantee," said Paulina Helm-Hernandez, a co-director of Southerners on New Ground, an advocacy group dedicated to social issues in the South. "The question is, now what do we do with the president's attention?"Mr. Obama on Friday offered a minute-and-a-half recorded message of congratulations to the task force, eliciting cheers and applause from conference attendees, including people who came of age before the modern gay rights movement began in 1969, 26 gay activists from China and Taiwan, and transgender teenagers grateful that the Atlanta Hilton Hotel had created special unisex bathrooms for the event.In his message, which Mr. Obama recorded before he delivered his inauguration speech on Monday, he reiterated his dedication to the cause of gay rights."Today you are helping lead the way to a future where everyone is treated with dignity and respect," the president said. "The work will be hard, the road will be long, but I'm more confident than ever that we will reach a better future as long as Americans like you keep reaching for justice and all of us keep marching together."Rea Carey, the group's executive director, then took the stage and gave what was billed as a "state of the movement" address in which she cautioned advocates not to rest."Some days I wake up astonished at the pace of our progress, but I also wake up angry about the lack of basic, basic protections for L.G.B.T. people," she said, referring to people who are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender. "I think about how, as we are in the spotlight for our progress on marriage, it can be more challenging to draw attention to the many other issues that affect our lives."Ms. Carey urged the group to keep pressuring the administration on a number of issues, including immigration reform, expanding benefits to same-sex partners of military personnel and allowing transgendered people to serve openly in the military.She also called for Mr. Obama to sign an executive order banning discrimination based on sexual orientation or gender identity at companies with government contracts.The Obama administration has said it would wait for Congress to pass broader legislation to prevent workplace bias. The administration has also indicated it would not weigh in on two pending Supreme Court cases challenging the constitutionality of laws that define marriage as being solely between a man and a woman.Putting pressure on the White House is not new for the group, which was founded in 1973 in New York and whose primary focus is legislative change and grass-roots organizing.In 1977, the task force helped arrange a meeting between President Jimmy Carter's staff and several members of gay organizations in what is widely considered to be the first official discussion of gay rights in the White House.This week, Mr. Obama's open support engendered sharp criticism from groups like the American Family Association and the National Organization for Marriage.In commenting on the broad arc in the president's inaugural speech that linked the women's movement, the civil rights movement and the gay rights movement, Peter Sprigg of the Family Research Council said in an interview on CNN that "the irony is that homosexuals already have all the same civil rights as anyone else."Bryan Fischer, a Christian conservative radio host and policy analyst for the American Family Association said this week that "homosexuals do not have a constitutional right to engage in sodomy."Such comments have underscored for some here that although national opinion on gay rights is becoming more favorable, the cultural war remains very much alive.Barbara Cook, 21, a college student from Baltimore, said the fact that that war must still be fought means pressure on the president must continue."I just hope he fulfills everything that he said he would," she said.
VICCO, Ky. — In a former pool hall that is now the municipal building for a coal smudge of a place in eastern Kentucky called Vicco, population 335, the January meeting of the City Commission came to order. Commissioners and guests settled into patio chairs, bought at a discount and arranged around a long conference table. Those who smoked did.The Commission approved the minutes from its December meeting, hired a local construction company to repair the run-down sewer plant and tinkered with the wording for the local curfew. Oh, and it voted to ban discrimination against anyone based on sexual orientation or gender identity — making Vicco the smallest municipality in Kentucky, and possibly the country, to enact such an ordinance.After that, the Commission approved a couple of invoices. Then, according to a clerk's notes, "Jimmy made a motion to adjourn and Claude seconded the motion. All voted yes."Admit it: The Commission's anti-discrimination vote seems at odds with knee-jerk assumptions about a map dot in the Appalachian coal fields, tucked between Sassafras and Happy. For one thing, Vicco embraces its raucous country-boy reputation — home to countless brawls and a dozen or so unsolved murders, people here say. For another, it is in Perry County, where four of every five voters rejected President Obama in the November election.But the Vicco Commission's 3-to-1 vote this month not only anticipated a central theme in the president's second inaugural speech ("Our journey is not complete until our gay brothers and sisters are treated like anyone else under the law ..."), it also presented a legislative model to the nation's partisan-paralyzed Capitol, 460 miles away.You discuss, you find consensus, you vote, and you move on, explained the mayor, Johnny Cummings. "You have to get along."Mr. Cummings, 50, runs a hair salon three doors down from the City Hall storefront. He spends his days hustling between the two operations, often wearing a black smock adorned with hair clips. One moment this wiry chain-smoker is applying dye to a client's hair; the next, he's dealing with potholes and water lines.For a good chunk of the last century, Vicco was the local coal miner's Vegas, its narrow streets lined with bars and attractions that ran on money earned the hard way in the subterranean dank. The city's very name derives from the initials for the Virginia Iron Coal and Coke Company.But as the coal camps folded, Vicco emptied out. Away went the car dealerships, the schools, the department store, the A&P, and even the Pastime theater, whose farewell film is said to have been "10," with Bo Derek. In 1979.Into the Vicco void came abandonment, drug abuse and budget deficits so dire that the city could not afford a police officer. There was also the requisite touch of public corruption. A few years ago, a mayor and his son, a city commissioner, were charged with using thousands of dollars in city money for their personal use. They both entered Alford pleas, in which they did not admit guilt but conceded that the case against them was pretty darn good.The next mayor stepped down last year for health reasons and was replaced by one of the city commissioners, the hairstylist down the street, Mr. Cummings.Cummings is a longtime Vicco surname. Johnny Cummings's mother, Betty, was a schoolteacher; she has some dementia now and spends most days in his salon, telling him she loves him. His father, John, ran several businesses, including a bar; he died from a blow to the back of the head in 1990. One of those unsolved Vicco murders.Mr. Cummings is gay, an identity he has never hidden, and the occasional rude encounter while growing up was nothing that he and his protective friends couldn't handle. After high school, he was offered a scholarship to a beauty academy in California, but he returned after two months. Other than a brief spell in South Carolina, he has been planted here in Vicco, where, for the last quarter-century, he has co-owned a salon called Scissors."I make 20 trips a day" between Scissors and City Hall, he said recently. "Right now I have a lady with color in her hair."
David Blankenhorn, a traditional-marriage advocate and star witness in the Proposition 8 trial in California in 2010, shocked his allies with an Op-Ed article in The New York Times last June announcing that he was quitting the fight against same-sex marriage . "Instead of fighting gay marriage," Mr. Blankenhorn wrote, "I'd like to help build new coalitions bringing together gays who want to strengthen marriage with straight people who want to do the same."He is about to find out how much support such a coalition can get.On Thursday, Mr. Blankenhorn's research group, the Institute for American Values in New York, plans to issue "A Call for a New Conversation on Marriage," a tract renouncing the culture war that he was once part of, in favor of a different pro-marriage agenda. The proposed conversation will try to bring together gay men and lesbians who want to strengthen marriage with heterosexuals who want to do the same.The document is signed by 74 well-known activists, writers and scholars, on the left and the right, including the conservative John Podhoretz, editor of Commentary magazine; John Corvino, a gay philosopher; Robert N. Bellah, a sociologist; Caitlin Flanagan, a social critic; and Glenn C. Loury, an economist — once conservative, now less so."While the nation's attention is riveted by a debate about whether a small proportion of our fellow citizens (gays and lesbians) should be allowed to marry," the statement reads, "marriage is rapidly dividing along class lines, splitting the country that it used to unite."Nine states as well as the District of Columbia permit same-sex marriage.Though he has long been a foe of same-sex marriage, Mr. Blankenhorn, who was raised in Mississippi and attended Harvard, never invoked a religious justification and did not oppose civil unions for gay men and lesbians. Instead, he argued that heterosexual marriage was society's most important institution, central to child rearing.The new coalition, according to the institute's manifesto, would be for anyone who wonders, "If unwed childbearing is not good for teens, is it good for twenty-somethings?" Or for those eager to know, "What economic policies strengthen marriage? What marriage policies create wealth?""New Conversation" is the capstone of a six-month period of rebuilding and rebranding for Mr. Blankenhorn. After his Op-Ed article appeared, five of his institute's board members, including Robert P. George, a prominent conservative Catholic and Princeton professor, resigned almost immediately. The institute lost about half a million dollars in donations, "half our discretionary spending," Mr. Blankenhorn said, referring to money not given by foundations for specific programs. "We're in a real steep hole," he added. "I laid two people off and am losing one by attrition."The staff members, Mr. Blankenhorn wishes he had back. But losing the board members most inflexibly opposed to same-sex marriage allowed him to retool. Mr. Blankenhorn added to his board a gay journalist, Jonathan Rauch, the author of the book "Gay Marriage," and Francis Fukuyama, author of "The End of History and the Last Man." And Mr. Blankenhorn made William A. Galston, a former adviser to President Bill Clinton now at the liberal Brookings Institution, the chairman of the board.The "new conversation" may discomfit many conservatives by including gay men and lesbians. And this conversation may not suit many liberals who are wary of stigmatizing unwed parents or treating marriage as some sort of desirable norm.As a result, this new coalition may have more luck gaining a few prominent supporters than gaining funds."David's personal networks are liberal, but his donor networks are quite conservative," said Maggie Gallagher, who used to work at the Institute for American Values and is a well-known opponent of same-sex marriage. It can be tough to find money for what could be called a centrist agenda, Ms. Gallagher cautioned, adding that there may be more conservatives willing to accept gay allies than liberals willing to publicly support marriage. Some financing, she said, "will be conservative, but the pro-marriage liberals have to step forward, and maybe make it more 50-50."Sean Fieler, the president of Equinox Partners, a New York hedge fund, was Mr. Blankenhorn's largest donor, until he quit the board. Mr. Fieler, whose average annual donation "ranged from $200,000 to $250,000," said that a pro-marriage movement could not so easily accept gay and lesbian allies, not if they were seeking marriage rights."The problem with gay marriage and the position David has taken," Mr. Fieler said, "is it promotes a very harmful myth about the gay lifestyle. It suggests that gay relationships lend themselves to monogamy, stability, health and parenting in the same way heterosexual relationships do. That's not true."But a "New Conversation" signatory, Mr. Galston, of the Brookings Institution, said there was no reason that nontraditional families should be excluded from the important discussion at hand: why "marriage and intact families are now becoming markers of a class divide." Increasingly, he said, it is college-educated and middle-class people who are getting married, regardless of sexual orientation.The debate, he said, should not be about gay versus straight but about why so few poor people are choosing the benefits of marriage.Mr. Rauch, who has long been criticized by fellow gay writers for being too conservative, said that it is time to raise different questions: "What does, so to speak, the sexual-orientation-blind, pro-family agenda look like?" he asked. "The family values agenda for the postgay world?"
A proposed shift by the Boy Scouts of America away from its national policy banning gays, leaving the decision to local councils, has divided scouts, families and troop leaders, with thousands taking to the organization's Facebook page and other online forums to express their views in passionate tones of anguish, opprobrium or approval.For Margaret Kreider, the mother of an Eagle Scout in Broussard, La., the cacophony promises only the beginning of a long argument. She said she does not support allowing openly gay scout leaders, and fears that local scout councils — like the one her son, Jacob, thrived in starting at age 7 — will be forced to take sides in a divisive debate and then not be able to fight back, with lawyers and clout, if challenged.Boy Scouts officials said on Monday that under the proposal, to be considered by the executive board next week, local scouting groups could decide for themselves whether to allow gay scouts and leaders, based on the social, religious and philosophical tenets of a troop's families.The real world, Ms. Kreider said, just isn't that simple."It will be the small troops that decide they don't want to have a homosexual leader, and then where do they go for help?" she asked. "If they get sued by the A.C.L.U. or whatever organization decides to come after them, they won't have the resources or the backing of the Boy Scouts of America because of this policy. It will be the destruction of the Boy Scouts."Some people who support a new policy are worried, too."We are here for the kids," said Val Carolin, the scoutmaster of Troop 467 in Atlanta, which meets in the "scout hut" behind Peachtree Road United Methodist Church. Mr. Carolin said that he thought inclusion was the right value for the Scouts to pursue, and that fighting over whether to welcome gay scouts or leaders would be a distraction, or worse. "If this thing comes down and causes a split, that would be very bad for scouting," he said.Other scout leaders said that because so many troops are affiliated with churches, a fractious local debate over gay membership could propel issues of faith and religion even more to the fore of scouting than they already are."I think some of the troops that are backed by churches or have more religious programs will become even more vocal," said Jason Stewart, the committee chairman of Troop 2 in Petaluma, Calif., who favors ending the ban on gays. "There is a large element of the leadership in Boy Scouts of America that has roots in various religious organizations that have historically had policies against homosexuality."Some scout leaders said the right to religious expression was something that scouting should fight to protect, too, whatever the consequences.Joe Krepel, a Cub Scout leader in Kearney, Neb., said that he would be pleased if local sponsors were given the opportunity to decide a troop's policy, and that he would not begrudge any sponsor from barring gay leaders or members."Most of them are churches," he said. "If their church is opposed to that, that's their right."What role the churches might play in the end is uncertain. The chairman of the National Catholic Committee on Scouting, John J. Halloran Jr., said his group would make a statement only if the Boy Scouts board approved the change. "Our Catholic faith remains our conscience and our guide," he said in an e-mail.A spokesman for the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, which strongly supports scouting, also declined to comment until a policy change is official."A lot of troops have been probably operating on 'don't ask, don't tell' for a long time," said Gary Purlee, leader of a Boy Scout troop in Jeffersonville, Ind. "So I think for many troops it won't make a difference at all. I think a number of scout troops, like ours, have been very tolerant for a number of years. We have welcomed boys and leaders from all orientations."
LOS ANGELES — Kevin L. James, a conservative talk show host running for mayor of Los Angeles, was sitting in his campaign office recently pondering which was his bigger obstacle to victory: being openly Republican, or being openly gay."Depending on what room you're in here, sometimes it's easier coming out gay to Republicans than it is coming out Republican to gays," he said.By any measure, Mr. James, 49, is a bit of a long shot. He is a Republican brassy former prosecutor running in a Democratic city at a time when California is marching steadily to the left, making his first bid for office in a field of establishment candidates.Yet in the first major election since President Obama's victory in November — voting that relegated the California Republican Party to the margins — Mr. James has become, at least for a few national Republicans, something of a lifeline. They see in his candidacy in the March 5 vote an outside chance to grab what could be a spirit-lifting victory, and perhaps even signal a way to get back in the game in California.Fred Davis, a Republican ad producer based in the Hollywood Hills who worked for the presidential campaign of Senator John McCain, created a political action committee to finance an advertising campaign to help Mr. James compete with his better-financed competitors. Mr. Davis was looking to raise $4 million from Republicans across the nation; he has since scaled back that goal a bit (he had raised $700,000 as of Friday).And Mr. James has retained John Weaver, a Republican political consultant who has long advised Mr. McCain, as his senior political adviser. Mr. Weaver has increasingly warned that Republicans are marginalizing themselves by moving to the right on issues like abortion, gay rights and immigration."He is from central casting about what a future Republican candidate can look like in an urban or blue state and win," Mr. Weaver said. "It's important for the party. We have not done well nationally since we stopped winning in California."Mr. James's draw for these men is not only that he is a fiscal conservative who supports abortion rights and same-sex marriage, or that he is a colorful show horse in a field of gray. (At a debate the other night, he kept standing up when it was his turn to speak, even as everyone else settled politely into their chairs.)It is also who he is — or rather, what he is."Here I am talking to this intelligent Republican guy that no one has ever heard of, who didn't have any personal money, and I'm thinking, no way," Mr. Davis said, recounting his first meeting with Mr. James. "A couple of days later, in researching the guy, there was some mention that he was gay.""It was a great moment," Mr. Davis said. "Because all of a sudden, all those social ills go away. There's nothing to be scared of. It's one of the things that made me decide we should go ahead with this venture."In theory, this is as good a place as any to test-drive new Republican appeals. States do not get much bluer than California, in no small part because of the increase in the numbers of Latinos and Asian-Americans who are voting Democratic. Even a partial victory by Mr. James could be instructive for Republicans, not to mention a tonic for a party that needs one.It will not be easy."On the national stage, he is the perfect example of the Republican dilemma," said Bill Carrick, a Democratic consultant advising one of Mr. James's Democratic rivals, Eric Garcetti, a member of the City Council. "He has to both energize a shrinking base of Republican voters who are decidedly more conservative than the rest of the city's electorate, at the same time he reaches out to the ultimate Democratic voters. It's a hell of a challenge."But Mr. James could well affect the final outcome here. Given Mr. Davis's effort and the crowded field, Mr. James is positioned to squeeze his way into a two-way runoff this spring. If he does, it will probably be at the expense of Wendy Greuel, the city comptroller, who is competing for the same votes in the San Fernando Valley where Mr. James has a constituency. Mr. James has directed most of his attacks against her.Whether he could beat a Democrat in a two-way race — polls suggest that the opponent would be Mr. Garcetti — is decidedly less likely.Mr. James has not always been a Republican; he registered as a Democrat during the height of the AIDS crisis, when he was a member of the board of the AIDS Project Los Angeles, viewing Democrats as much more concerned about AIDS issues. He declined to say for whom he voted in November; Mr. Obama won 61 percent of the vote in California."I'm not going to go into the presidential race," he said. "It's history, it's behind us, and it doesn't apply to my race."At the very least, Mr. James has provided a dash of drama to what has otherwise been a low-spark election to succeed Mayor Antonio R. Villaraigosa. At a League of Women Voters debate recently, the moderator asked the candidates whether they would renegotiate the 5.6 percent raises due for city workers next year if the city was still in a fiscal crisis.Mr. Garcetti responded with a barely audible "no." Ms. Greuel gave an equivocal answer that produced a rustle of laughter among a few in the audience. Mr. James jumped to his feet."My opponents gave them those raises," he said. "They must be renegotiated, and I will do that."Michael Saltz, who hosted a block party for Mr. James in the Woodland Hills neighborhood of the San Fernando Valley, responded to that kind of appeal."He is the only person running for mayor who is not responsible for the worst decline in the history of L.A.," he said.Mr. Davis is known for making or proposing political advertisements intended to be provocative, sometimes too much so. He wrote an advertising plan for a political action committee working on behalf of Mitt Romney, the Republican presidential candidate, suggesting that it "do exactly what John McCain would not let us do" and produce advertisements linking Mr. Obama to the racially incendiary sermons delivered by Mr. Obama's former minister, the Rev. Jeremiah A. Wright Jr. The advertisement was never made.Mr. Davis said that while he was spending much of his energy on this race — his other clients include Rick Snyder, the Republican governor of Michigan — he was careful not to exaggerate its potential symbolism."It's a little tiny start," he said. "I'm not silly. I don't think the mayor of Los Angeles is going to be the next face of the Republican Party. But I think it would be an enormous wake-up call to the Republican Party if we succeeded."
AUSTIN, Tex. (AP) — Gov. Rick Perry of Texas said emphatically Saturday that the Boy Scouts of America should not soften its strict policy barring gay members, and dismissed the idea of bending the organization to the whims of "popular culture."Mr. Perry, the country's longest-serving governor, is an Eagle Scout, and in 2008 he wrote the book "On My Honor: Why the American Values of the Boy Scouts Are Worth Fighting For." It detailed his deep love for the organization and explained why it should continue to embrace traditional conservative values — including excluding openly gay members and leaders.The governor spoke at the Texas Scouts' 64th annual Report to State, where hundreds of scouts from across the state filled the State House of Representatives to announce their delegations' recent accomplishments. Mr. Perry had addressed the gathering several times before, most recently in 2010.The Scouts' national leadership announced last week that it was considering ending the mandatory exclusion of gay members. The group could allow different religious and civic groups that sponsor Scout units to decide for themselves whether to maintain the exclusion or open up their membership.Even though the Boy Scouts reaffirmed the policy just seven months ago, the proposal is expected to be discussed, and possibly voted on, at the meeting of the Scouts' national executive board, which will begin Monday in Irving, outside Dallas.Mr. Perry told the youngsters that the Scouts were a key reason that he had joined the Air Force and later sought public office, and that society's failure to adhere to the organization's core values was a cause for high rates of teenage pregnancy and wayward youths who grow up to be "men joining their fathers in prison."After his address, Mr. Perry said: "Hopefully the board will follow their historic position of keeping the Scouts strongly supportive of the values that make scouting this very important and impactful organization."
WASHINGTON — The practice of law would be much more pleasant, many lawyers will tell you over a second Scotch, if it did not require clients. It is one thing to construct an airtight legal argument and quite another to deal with the demands of inconstant human beings.Consider Solicitor General Donald B. Verrilli Jr.'s most prominent client, President Obama. In May, in announcing his support for same-sex marriage, Mr. Obama said the issue should be decided state by state. In his Inaugural Address last month, Mr. Obama seemed to make a case for a more national approach.The timing was awkward. Mr. Verrilli is in the midst of considering what to tell the Supreme Court in a pair of momentous same-sex marriage cases to be argued in March. Just days before the inauguration, he met with lawyers challenging California's ban on same-sex marriage, who urged him to weigh in on their side. He was noncommittal, but his client's public marching orders until then had suggested that he should sit that one out.Here is what Mr. Obama told Robin Roberts of ABC News in May: "What you're seeing is, I think, states working through this issue in fits and starts, all across the country. Different communities are arriving at different conclusions, at different times. And I think that's a healthy process and a healthy debate. And I continue to believe that this is an issue that is going be worked out at the local level, because historically, this has not been a federal issue, what's recognized as a marriage."That reasoning fits tolerably well with the Justice Department's position in one of the two cases before the Supreme Court, United States v. Windsor, No. 12-307. That case is a challenge to the constitutionality of the federal Defense of Marriage Act, a 1996 law that defined marriage as the union of a man and a woman in connection with federal benefits. The Defense of Marriage Act, Mr. Obama explained in May, "tried to federalize what has historically been state law."Mr. Verrilli will presumably make much the same point on March 27, when the Supreme Court hears arguments in the Windsor case.But there is a second case, and there Mr. Verrilli faces tough choices. On March 26, the day before the argument about the 1996 law, the justices will hear Hollingsworth v. Perry, No. 12-144. It seeks to overturn Proposition 8, a voter initiative that banned same-sex marriage in California.If marriage is a matter for the states, as Mr. Obama announced in May, you might think that California should be permitted to prohibit same-sex marriage.The federal government is not a party to the California case, and it is not required to file a brief or to take a public position. Ms. Roberts asked Mr. Obama a direct question in May about whether he had given his lawyers instructions about what to do: "Can you ask your Justice Department to join in the litigation in fighting states that are banning same-sex marriage?"All of this might have allowed Mr. Verrilli to concentrate on the case concerning the federal law and stay quiet in the California case. There is a precedent for this: the federal government took no position in 1967 in Loving v. Virginia, the case in which the Supreme Court struck down bans on interracial marriage. Nor did it weigh in on the last major gay rights case, Lawrence v. Texas, which in 2003 struck down state laws making gay sex a crime.The solicitor general in 2003 was Theodore B. Olson. He is now in private practice and is one of the lawyers challenging the California ban on same-sex marriage. On Jan. 18, he and his colleague David Boies, along with lawyers from the San Francisco city attorney's office, met with Mr. Verrilli to urge him to take a stand in the California case. Defenders of Proposition 8 made the opposite pitch a few days later.Mr. Verrilli was noncommittal, but there is now reason to think that Mr. Olson will prevail in persuading Mr. Verrilli to ignore the precedent Mr. Olson had set. That is largely because Mr. Obama's thinking on same-sex marriage continues to evolve.In his Inaugural Address last month, Mr. Obama was no longer talking about leaving the issue to the states."Our journey is not complete until our gay brothers and sisters are treated like anyone else under the law," he said, "for if we are truly created equal, then surely the love we commit to one another must be equal, as well."Mr. Verrilli has until the end of the month to file a brief in the California case. Paul D. Clement, a former solicitor general who represents House Republicans defending the 1996 federal law, said he detected some paradoxes in Mr. Verrilli's predicament."It will be interesting in the end," Mr. Clement said dryly at a Georgetown University Law Center forum last week, "if the litigation position of the Justice Department and the president's position kind of realign."Mr. Clement said the solicitor general's position always had weight at the Supreme Court. But he added that it may be less consequential in the California case than in some earlier ones, given the administration's general, if nuanced, support for gay rights.Thomas C. Goldstein, the publisher of Scotusblog and a lawyer who argues frequently before the Supreme Court, said the justices were not the only relevant audience for a brief from the Obama administration's top appellate lawyer."Part of what is going on in the Inaugural Address and part of what would happen in a brief like that is a statement of what's morally right and wrong," he said. "It could matter to Americans much more than it matters to the Supreme Court."
IRVING, Tex. — A proposed shift by the Boy Scouts of America to drop its national ban on gay leaders and scouts, and allow local scout units to decide for themselves, was the center of attention as the organization's national board gathered here on Monday for a three-day meeting and a vote on the issue.But the undercurrents of the debate — a drop in participation in the Scouts over the last decade and a deep division between conservative and liberal church groups over the proposal — are raising the stakes even higher for the vote as a kind of proxy on the question of how scouting stays relevant in a changing social climate, Scout volunteers involved in the discussions said.The strains on the historic youth organization were evident, and visible. At the organization's national headquarters, also here in Irving, supporters of eliminating the ban dropped off petitions that they said had been signed by 1.4 million people. During the weekend, President Obama, in an interview, said he favored allowing gay youths to join the Scouts, while Gov. Rick Perry of Texas expressed the opposite opinion.Two members of the Boy Scouts of America board, Randall L. Stephenson, the chairman and chief executive of AT&T, and James S. Turley, the chairman and chief executive of Ernst & Young, have already said they supported changing the policy to allow gay scouts.At the site of the meeting, a hotel near Dallas-Fort Worth International Airport, reporters were directed to a parking lot that had been cordoned off specifically for them, then barred entry into the hotel.People on both sides of the issue said that the question of how religious groups regard the proposed policy change is crucial because of the large role that faith-based organizations play in scouting. The Scouts organization says that more than 69.4 percent of all Scout units are chartered to faith-based organizations, and more than 39 percent of scouts are involved in scouting groups affiliated with the largest three religious backers — the Mormon Church, the United Methodist Church and the Roman Catholic Church.And while some churches have said in the past they might withdraw from participation if the gay ban was lifted, others are wading into the debate on the other side. The National Jewish Committee on Scouting, for example, one of the nation's oldest faith-based scouting sponsors, dating back to the 1920s, with upward of 40,000 volunteers, polled its leaders on Sunday in a teleconference and arrived here with a resolution to push for abandoning the gay ban."The proposed change is a good thing for scouting and a good thing for young men and women," the committee's chairman, A. J. Kreimer, said in an interview.A representative of the group, Rabbi Peter E. Hyman, who is also the chairman of the Boy Scouts' Messengers of Peace initiative, which works to ease conflicts around the world, said he planned to present the National Jewish Committee's statement at the meeting.Declining numbers of scouts are driving a related discussion about how scouting can stay relevant in a changing world, Rabbi Hyman and other officials said.Since 2000, the number of young people involved in scouting has fallen by close to 19 percent, according to the Boy Scouts of America's most recent figures, from 2011. The number of boys in the youngest cohort of membership, the Cub Scouts, was down more than 25 percent, marking an even more alarming portent for the future.Whether the national organization's policy on gays and lesbians has much, if anything, to do with that decline is unknown. According to a study last year by the Pew Forum on Religion and Public Life, Americans are also more likely than in the past to identify themselves as unaffiliated with any religion — with young people leading that trend.The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, which sponsors more Scout troops than any other church, has deferred comment on the proposed change. But even if gay scouts were allowed into Mormon-sponsored troops, the same church membership rules would apply as they do now, a church spokesman said.Gay and lesbian Mormons are welcomed into the church, the spokesman said, but must follow the same rules as heterosexual Mormons. That means no sex outside marriage, and in Mormon doctrine, same-sex marriage is not recognized as legitimate — even in states where it is legal.On Monday, Jon Langbert, a 47-year-old entrepreneur who lives in University Park, near Dallas, with the triplets he and his partner at the time had by surrogate, recalled a time in 2010 when he was a volunteer leader of fund-raising and was, he said, "fired" by the Scouts for being gay. They even told him he could no longer wear the Scout leader's shirt the pack had given him the year before. It began, he said, when his son Carter, then in the third grade, was in a Cub Scout pack that needed a "popcorn kernel" — the Scouts' name for a person who does fund-raising.Mr. Langbert says the pack sold popcorn — and raised three times as much money as the previous year."They asked me to do it again the next year," Mr. Langbert said. "Then, another father said a gay guy couldn't run their fund-raising."The national office later issued an edict that agreed with the other father, Mr. Langbert said: no fund-raising by a gay man would be allowed.
The Boy Scouts of America, which confirmed last summer its policy barring openly gay people from participation, then said last week that it was reconsidering the ban, announced Wednesday that it would postpone a decision once more, until May, as talk of gay men and lesbians in the ranks has roiled a storied organization that carries deep emotional connection and nostalgia for millions of Americans.An end to the national ban, which the United States Supreme Court said in 2000 was legal free speech by a private organization, would create a new moment of risk, experimentation and change, people on both sides of the issue said. The proposal floated last week would allow local scouting units to decide membership rules for themselves, a middle road.Even proposing the change created fracture lines. Some supporters of the ban said they feared a wave of departures by conservative church-sponsored troops, while supporters of a new policy said the risk was in not going far enough — although each side acknowledged that scouting, with fewer boys every year wearing the uniform, needed to find new ways to connect with young people.Those scout leaders who favored an about-face on gay men and lesbians — prohibiting discrimination everywhere in the organization — said local choice would leave scouting open to criticism because discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation would still be tolerated.The Boy Scouts said in a statement that it had received "an outpouring of feedback from the American public.""After careful consideration," the statement said, "and extensive dialogue within the scouting family, along with comments from those outside the organization, the volunteer officers of the Boy Scouts of America's National Executive Board concluded that due to the complexity of this issue, the organization needs time for a more deliberate review."The debate, according to scout leaders and parents, was shaped by two great forces that have defined scouting for decades: The huge role played by churches in sponsoring scout troops, and the tradition of local control, which can differ greatly from urban downtowns to rural farm country.Maintaining local control became a crossroads of the debate. Although many of the church sponsors — almost 70 percent of local scout units are backed by a religion-based group — are culturally conservative, they also hugely cherish the right to make scouting an adjunct of their respective belief systems. In Mormon-led scout troops, a Mormon-style prayer usually opens and closes a troop's meeting, while in a Catholic group, it might be the Lord's Prayer."In a free society, organizations fail or flourish according to the private choices of innumerable families," the Boy Scouts said in a brief to the United States Supreme Court in the 2000 case. "A society in which each and every organization must be equally diverse is a society which has destroyed diversity," the Boy Scouts argued.Jay L. Lenrow, who grew up in scouting as a Jewish boy in New Jersey, and stayed involved as an adult scout volunteer in Baltimore, where he works as a lawyer, said he thought that eventual acceptance of opposing views about gay leaders — troops and families and churches choosing different paths, to allow gay volunteers or not — will become an enriching element of the scouting experience going forward.Mr. Lenrow called the decision to defer a vote on the proposed change "hugely disappointing.""As a youth in scouting, I sat in tents during the night after lights out with my Catholic friends and my Protestant friends, and kids who were Armenian Orthodox or Greek Orthodox, and we would tell each other what it meant to us to be a member of our religious grouping and what the principles were and what we were taught," he said. "What that led to is, first of all, an understanding of what made my friends tick and, second of all, an appreciation for their feelings and their religious beliefs."Others urged the board to hold firm to the ban when it resumes discussion in May. "Do not back off against the principles you've had for 100 years," said Kelly Williamson, 52, a second-generation scout in the suburbs of Dallas. "Really, this is nothing against the gay community," he added. "Have them form their own organization. It's kind of ironic, gay scouts come in and saying, 'We want you to change how you've done this for 100 years.' "A national poll released Wednesday by Quinnipiac University said that 55 percent of voters supported opening up scouting to gay men and lesbians, to 33 percent opposed. The poll of 1,772 registered voters, taken from Jan. 30 to Feb. 4, after the proposed change was announced by the Boy Scouts, had a margin of sampling error of plus or minus two percentage points. Women, 61 percent to 27 percent, were more likely than men to favor dropping the ban. Among men, 49 percent approved ending the ban, compared with 39 percent opposed.
WASHINGTON — The Senate, with broad bipartisan support, voted overwhelmingly Tuesday to expand the reach of the landmark Violence Against Women Act of 1994 by fortifying the power of American Indian tribal courts and explicitly protecting gay victims of domestic abuse.The 78-to-22 vote raised the pressure on the House to act and expanded by 10 votes the margin of approval that a nearly identical bill garnered in the Senate last April. Twenty-three Republicans backed the measure on Tuesday, up from 15 last year. The vote came after 17 House Republicans on Monday wrote Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio and Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the House majority leader, demanding immediate action on a domestic violence bill that could get bipartisan support, unlike the House bill that passed largely on party lines last year.The new version "must reach all victims and perpetrators of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault and stalking in every community in the country," the letter stated, echoing the language used by supporters of the Senate bill, which expands the law's focus to include homosexual and American Indian victims and assailants.The law, reauthorized twice before with almost no controversy, has been stuck this time in the broader fight over the size and scope of government, and a more specific battle over the powers Congress should afford tribal courts, which now cannot pursue non-Indians who attack Indian women on tribal land. Conservative groups like the Heritage Foundation and the Independent Women's Forum have blasted the law as an ineffective waste of money and the new version as a dangerous expansion of governmental powers."I never thought the day would come when this issue would become politicized, but I'm afraid it has," said Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, as he led conservative opposition to the bill.But the 2012 election results — and the yawning gender gap that kept the White House in President Obama's hands, expanded Democratic control of the Senate and chipped away at the Republicans' House majority — may have changed the political dynamics on the antiviolence bill."Quite honestly, we can't afford to be sitting on this for months or another year," said Senator Lisa Murkowski, Republican of Alaska and a supporter of the Senate bill.After the vote, President Obama called on the House to act."Delay isn't an option when three women are still killed by their husbands or boyfriends every day," the president said in a statement. "Delay isn't an option when countless women still live in fear of abuse, and when one in five have been victims of rape. This issue should be beyond debate — the House should follow the Senate's lead and pass the Violence Against Women Act right away. This is not a Democratic or Republican issue — it's an issue of justice and compassion."House Republican leaders find themselves squeezed between moderate — and many conservative — Republicans who want to put the issue behind them and some senior Republicans who remain adamantly opposed to reauthorizing the act. Aides to Mr. Cantor have been meeting with both sides for weeks, and say they will not move legislation to the House floor until both sides sign off on a bill that will have broad support.The biggest sticking point is the expansion of tribal court authority, which many Republicans see as an unconstitutional power grab by the tribes that will deprive non-Indians of their fundamental constitutional rights. Social conservatives object to a provision in the Senate bill that clarifies that victims rights and prosecution programs created by the law can be used in cases of domestic abuse involving same-sex couples.But as senior Republican leaders like Mr. Cantor urge their party to project a more can-do image on issues beyond budget cuts and taxes, moderate Republicans say a bill like the Violence Against Women Act is a crucial test."At a time like this, we have to show we can get something done," said Representative Charlie Dent of Pennsylvania, one of the signers of the House letter. And, he added, legislation like the Violence Against Women Act "should not be a heavy lift."
CHICAGO — With a Valentine's Day vote, the Illinois Senate approved a bill on Thursday that would legalize same-sex marriage , inching the home state of President Obama closer to becoming the 10th in the nation, plus the District of Columbia, to allow gay couples the right to wed.The legislation passed 34 to 21, a margin many considered almost impossible, even in the Democratic-controlled legislature, just a few years ago. The result was seen not just as a hard-fought victory for gay-rights advocates in Illinois, but also as part of a broader, rapid shift in public opinion on same-sex marriage across the country."It wasn't too long ago that people did not think they would see this day," said State Representative Greg Harris, who will be advocating for the bill in the House. "A lot of parents said they didn't think their children would see this day."The vote comes two years after lawmakers passed civil-union legislation in Illinois. At the time, it was considered a major victory for supporters.Advocates said that was never the end goal. Less than a month after Mr. Obama first voiced his support for gay marriage last spring, two dozen same-sex couples filed lawsuits in Illinois to push for full marriage rights.While that legal action is still pending, Jim Bennett, director of the Midwest office of Lambda Legal, a civil-rights group for gay men and lesbians, said his organization has seen a significant change from Illinois lawmakers since even the November elections."The people we would have assumed were 'no' votes two months earlier now wanted to have a conversation and understand this issue more," Mr. Bennett said. "Since then, it really feels like a snowball."Addressing concerns about protections for faith-based communities that oppose gay marriage, the bill that advanced Thursday would exempt churches from being forced to perform same-sex wedding ceremonies or host the receptions.Opponents expressed concern that religious-backed institutions like schools, businesses and hospitals would not be covered under those same legal safeguards. "People have a right to live as they choose; they don't have the right to redefine marriage for all of us." said State Senator Kyle McCarter, a Republican.It was unclear on Thursday when the Illinois House, where support is believed to be thinner, would take up the legislation. Gov. Pat Quinn, a Democrat, is expected to sign the bill if it reaches his desk.
Right to Marry: Margaret Hoover, a Republican strategist, speaks about why she wants her party to support gay marriage.WASHINGTON — Dozens of prominent Republicans — including top advisers to former President George W. Bush, four former governors and two members of Congress — have signed a legal brief arguing that gay people have a constitutional right to marry, a position that amounts to a direct challenge to Speaker John A. Boehner and reflects the civil war in the party since the November election.The document will be submitted this week to the Supreme Court in support of a suit seeking to strike down Proposition 8, a California ballot initiative barring same-sex marriage, and all similar bans. The court will hear back-to-back arguments next month in that case and another pivotal gay rights case that challenges the 1996 federal Defense of Marriage Act.The Proposition 8 case already has a powerful conservative supporter: Theodore B. Olson, the former solicitor general under Mr. Bush and one of the suit's two lead lawyers. The amicus, or friend-of-the-court, brief is being filed with Mr. Olson's blessing. It argues, as he does, that same-sex marriage promotes family values by allowing children of gay couples to grow up in two-parent homes, and that it advances conservative values of "limited government and maximizing individual freedom."Legal analysts said the brief had the potential to sway conservative justices as much for the prominent names attached to it as for its legal arguments. The list of signers includes a string of Republican officials and influential thinkers — 75 as of Monday evening — who are not ordinarily associated with gay rights advocacy, including some who are speaking out for the first time and others who have changed their previous positions.Among them are Meg Whitman, who supported Proposition 8 when she ran for California governor; Representatives Ileana Ros-Lehtinen of Florida and Richard Hanna of New York; Stephen J. Hadley, a Bush national security adviser; Carlos Gutierrez, a commerce secretary to Mr. Bush; James B. Comey, a top Bush Justice Department official; David A. Stockman, President Ronald Reagan's first budget director; and Deborah Pryce, a former member of the House Republican leadership from Ohio who is retired from Congress.Ms. Pryce said Monday: "Like a lot of the country, my views have evolved on this from the first day I set foot in Congress. I think it's just the right thing, and I think it's on solid legal footing, too."Jon M. Huntsman Jr., the former Utah governor, who favored civil unions but opposed same-sex marriage during his 2012 presidential bid, also signed. Last week, Mr. Huntsman announced his new position in an article titled "Marriage Equality Is a Conservative Cause," a sign that the 2016 Republican presidential candidates could be divided on the issue for the first time."The ground on this is obviously changing, but it is changing more rapidly than people think," said John Feehery, a Republican strategist and former House leadership aide who did not sign the brief. "I think that Republicans in the future are going to be a little bit more careful about focusing on these issues that tend to divide the party."Some high-profile Republicans who support same-sex marriage — including Laura Bush, the former first lady; Dick Cheney, the former vice president; and Colin L. Powell, a former secretary of state — were not on the list as of Monday.But the presence of so many well-known former officials — including Christine Todd Whitman, former governor of New Jersey, and William Weld and Jane Swift, both former governors of Massachusetts — suggests that once Republicans are out of public life they feel freer to speak out against the party's official platform, which calls for amending the Constitution to define marriage as "the union of one man and one woman."By contrast, the brief, shared with The New York Times by its drafters, cites past Supreme Court rulings dear to conservatives, including the Citizens United decision lifting restrictions on campaign financing, and a Washington, D.C., Second Amendment case that overturned a law barring handgun ownership."We are trying to say to the court that we are judicial and political conservatives, and it is consistent with our values and philosophy for you to overturn Proposition 8," said Ken Mehlman, the former chairman of the Republican National Committee, who came out as gay several years ago. He is on the board of the American Foundation for Equal Rights, which brought the California suit, and has spent months in quiet conversations with fellow Republicans to gather signatures for the brief.In making an expansive argument that same-sex marriage bans are discriminatory, the brief's signatories are at odds with the House Republican leadership, which has authorized the expenditure of tax dollars to defend the 1996 marriage law. The law defines marriage in the eyes of the federal government as the union of a man and a woman.Polls show that public attitudes have shifted drastically on same-sex marriage over the past decade. A majority of Americans now favor same-sex marriage, up from roughly one third in 2003.While Republicans lag behind the general population — the latest New York Times survey found a third of Republicans favor letting gay people marry — that, too, is changing quickly as more young people reach voting age. Several recent polls show that about 70 percent of voters under 30 back same-sex marriage."The die is cast on this issue when you look at the percentage of younger voters who support gay marriage," said Steve Schmidt, who was a senior adviser to the 2008 Republican presidential nominee, Senator John McCain of Arizona, and who signed the brief. "As Dick Cheney said years ago, 'Freedom means freedom for everybody.' "Still, it is clear that Republican backers of same-sex marriage have yet to bring the rest of the party around to their views. Mr. Feehery said there are regional as well as generational divisions, with opposition especially strong in the South. Speaking of Mr. Boehner, he said, "I doubt very seriously that he is going to change his position."Experts say that amicus briefs generally do not change Supreme Court justices' minds. But on Monday some said that the Republican brief, written by Seth P. Waxman, a former solicitor general in the administration of President Bill Clinton, and Reginald Brown, who served in the Bush White House Counsel's Office, might be an exception.Tom Goldstein, publisher of Scotusblog, a Web site that analyzes Supreme Court cases, said the amicus filing "has the potential to break through and make a real difference."He added: "The person who is going to decide this case, if it's going to be close, is going to be a conservative justice who respects traditional marriage but nonetheless is sympathetic to the claims that this is just another form of hatred. If you're trying to persuade someone like that, you can't persuade them from the perspective of gay rights advocacy."
MOSCOW, Idaho — The border with Washington State is just two miles from the home that Henry D. Johnston and his partner, Alex Irwin, own here in western Idaho, but for a gay couple it might as well be a thousand. Over there, just a brisk morning's walk away, same-sex marriage was approved by a majority of statewide voters last fall; over here, the Idaho Constitution, through an amendment passed by voters in 2006, says that even a civil union granted elsewhere has no validity."Set your clock back," Mr. Johnston said of his daily commute home from a job in Pullman, Wash.The nation's patchwork geography of same-sex marriage laws was not much of an issue when just a few states allowed it. But now nine states and the District of Columbia allow such unions, with Maine, Maryland and Washington voting to join the list last fall. And the Supreme Court could decide this summer whether equal marriage protections are a right under the Constitution.The Obama administration is expected to file a brief on the question this week. On Monday, a group of prominent Republicans got there first, signing a brief to the court arguing that marriage is a constitutionally guaranteed right.All that has made the borders, and the sharp disparities between states, more important and complex than ever for gay couples, and for interstate tourism as well. The marriage license office in Clark County, Wash., across the Columbia River from Portland, Ore., had to increase its hours to serve border couples when Washington's new law took effect.The Episcopal Church said last month that the National Cathedral in Washington would soon begin conducting same-sex marriages. But if newlyweds drive home to the city's suburbs in Virginia, any rights granted under the vaulted limestone arches will disappear under Virginia's Constitution.Mr. Johnston and Mr. Irwin, both proudly gay and proudly Idahoan, said they had thought about taking a Sunday drive to get married and then dismissed the idea out of hand. Marrying across the border and returning home to a place where none of it had legal meaning, they said, or picking up and moving to Washington to obtain marriage protections would represent equal measures of surrender and defeat. For them, the battle for rights and recognition is to be waged here at home, in a deeply conservative state where same-sex marriage remains, for now, an unlikely dream."How are things going to change if people aren't there to help make them change?" said Mr. Irwin, 25, who grew up mostly in Pullman.Mr. Johnston, 27, who was born and raised in an Idaho timber-cutting town, said he rejected the idea of marrying just to make a statement. "The minute we drive across the border it would become invalid and we'd be back to just being two guys who own a house together," he said in an e-mail.The message is clear, Mr. Johnston added in an interview, that they are staying put to fight. "We're not going anywhere," he said.Hardly anyone imagines that Idaho and conservative places like it — voters in 30 states have banned same-sex marriage by statute or constitutional amendment — are likely to be moved anytime soon to a full embrace of gay life. The portrait, or caricature, of the American West in films like "Brokeback Mountain" has not entirely faded.Even adding protections for gay men and lesbians to Idaho's Human Rights Act has hit a wall, with advocates unable to get the Republican-controlled Legislature to print a bill, let alone hold a public hearing, after years of trying.But on the local level, the picture is changing, slowly, and it depends on where couples live.In just the last two months, two Idaho cities, Ketchum and Boise, have passed nondiscrimination ordinances protecting gay, lesbian and transgender people in housing and employment. Three more communities, including Mr. Johnston and Mr. Irwin's town, are debating it. Before December, only one place, the small town of Sandpoint in the state's Panhandle, had enacted such protections.Changes beyond Idaho's borders, including a subtle shift in policies in Utah by the Mormon Church, which has a huge influence in Idaho, have given gay people here added resolve and have provided crucial political cover for their supporters. In late 2009, the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints said it would support nondiscrimination protections for gay people in Salt Lake City, home to the church's headquarters. About one-fourth of Idaho's population is Mormon, a higher percentage than any state besides Utah.
More than two dozen Republicans — including a top adviser to Mitt Romney, the 2012 Republican presidential nominee — have added their names to a legal brief urging the Supreme Court to declare that gay couples have a constitutional right to wed.The brief comes as the White House is considering whether to weigh in on the same-sex marriage case; at this point, the Republicans who signed the document are taking a more expansive stance than President Obama, who favors same-sex marriage but has said he would leave it to the states, as opposed to making it a constitutional right.The list of Republicans on the brief now tallies more than 100, organizers say. It now includes Beth Myers, who ran Mr. Romney's 2008 campaign and was a senior adviser to him in 2012; Charles Bass, a former member of Congress from New Hampshire; and Douglas Holtz-Eakin, an economist who advised Senator John McCain's 2008 presidential campaign. Also on the list is B. J. Nikkel, who made national news last year when she became the only Republican on the Colorado House Judiciary Committee to vote in favor of same-sex civil unions. She previously worked as district director for Representative Marilyn Musgrave, a former congresswoman whose signature issue in Washington was banning same-sex marriage.The brief, organized by Ken Mehlman, a former chairman of the Republican National Committee who is gay, will be filed on Thursday as a friend-of-the-court, or amicus, brief to a lawsuit that seeks to overturn Proposition 8, a California ballot initiative that forbids same-sex marriage, and all similar bans. The landmark case will be heard alongside a request that the court overturn the 1996 federal Defense of Marriage Act, which defines marriage for the purposes of federal law as the union between a man and a woman.Mr. Obama strongly supports the repeal of the defense of marriage law, and has instructed his Justice Department not to defend it in court. His move prompted the House speaker, John A. Boehner, and the House Republican leadership to authorize the expenditure of tax dollars to defend the law; Mr. Boehner, who is personally opposed to same-sex marriage, has said he believes it is up to the Supreme Court, not the Obama administration, to determine the constitutionality of the measure.Last week, the administration filed its brief in the Defense of Marriage case, asking the court to declare the measure unconstitutional. The brief notes that same-sex couples may already legally marry in some states and argues that singling them out is "a harsh form of discrimination that bears no relation to their ability to contribute to society."But the administration has been far more cautious in the Proposition 8 case. A White House official said Tuesday morning that no decision had been made on whether to file an amicus brief; the deadline is Thursday. The Wall Street Journal, citing unnamed sources, reported Tuesday evening that the administration was still weighing its decision, and was "looking at options that fall short of embracing a constitutional right'' to same-sex marriage.Mr. Obama has made supporting same-sex marriage a central theme in his recent speeches, including his second inaugural address, and has often stated that Americans ought to have equal rights, "no matter who you love." He announced during his re-election campaign last year that, after months of saying his views were "evolving," he had concluded that gay couples ought to be allowed to marry.But in announcing that decision, Mr. Obama said he believed the issue would be "worked out at the local level," because marriage has traditionally been the province of the states, not the federal government.That position enrages many gay rights activists, who view it as immoral and note that it was the same explanation opponents of interracial marriage once used to prevent couples like Mr. Obama's own parents from marrying.The elder Obamas married in 1961 in Hawaii, which permitted interracial unions. But it was not until the landmark Loving v. Virginia case — decided in 1967, when Mr. Obama was 6 — that the Supreme Court declared interracial marriage a constitutional right and overturned a Virginia ban.
The Obama administration threw its support behind a broad claim for marriage equality on Thursday, and urged the Supreme Court to rule that voters in California were not entitled to ban same-sex marriage there.In a forceful argument, the administration claimed that denying gay couples the right to marry violates the Constitution's equal protection clause. It said that Proposition 8, the state's ban on same-sex marriage, should be subjected to "heightened scrutiny" — a tough test for any law — and stated flatly that "Proposition 8 fails heightened scrutiny."That argument is similar to the one made in the administration's brief in a second case before the Supreme Court concerning the Defense of Marriage Act of 1996, which the administration has also asked the court to declare unconstitutional.The latest brief, filed late Thursday, does not, however, ask the court to declare such bans unconstitutional nationwide; instead, it focused on Proposition 8, which was approved by voters in 2008 and is before the court in this case. That law was passed by a voter initiative just months after the state's Supreme Court ruled that same-sex couples could marry. The brief notes that opponents of same-sex marriage in the California case have argued that the state offers, through the equivalent of domestic partnerships, a marital state in all but the name.The government also points out that seven other states — Delaware, Hawaii, Illinois, Nevada, New Jersey, Oregon, and Rhode Island — have a similar all-but-marriage frameworks, and says that "the designation of marriage, however, confers a special validation of the relationship between two individuals and conveys a message to society that domestic partnerships or civil unions cannot match."While the brief does not call explicitly for the court to strike down the laws in the seven other states, the implication of its argument is clear. Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. issued a statement that tied the government's argument into the fundamental struggle against discrimination and for civil rights, saying that the brief "seeks to vindicate the defining constitutional ideal of equal treatment under the law." He said that the court's decisions concerning the two same-sex marriage cases "are not just important to the tens of thousands of Americans who are being denied equal benefits and rights under our laws, but to our nation as a whole."The government's brief concludes with a ringing denunciation of the California ban on same-sex marriage, which it said is based in "impermissible prejudice."It then cited a concurrence in a 2001 Supreme Court case that said prejudice might not rise "from malice or hostile animus," and might well be the result of "insensitivity caused by simple want of careful, rational reflection or from some instinctive mechanism to guard against people who appear to be different in some respects from ourselves."No matter, the brief said. "Prejudice may not, however, be the basis for differential treatment under the law."The author of that concurrence is Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, who is expected to be a crucial voice within the court in both of the current cases.Andrew P. Pugno, the general counsel for supporters of Proposition 8, called the administration's brief very disappointing. "By arguing that Proposition 8 is rooted only in irrational prejudice, the president has impugned the motives of millions of Californians, turned his back on society's longstanding interest in both mothers and fathers raising the next generation, and disregarded the rights of each state to decide for itself whether to redefine marriage," he said.The federal government is not a party to the California case, Hollingsworth v. Perry, No. 12-144, and was not required to take a position in it. But the lawyers who filed the challenge to Proposition 8, Theodore B. Olson and David Boies, along with gay rights groups, lobbied for the brief, saying the administration could not stay silent on the issue.The broad outlines of the administration's position in the California case are similar to those it filed in a brief last week in a same-sex marriage case in which it is a party, United States v. Windsor, No. 12-307. But that case presents only the narrower question of the constitutionality of part of the federal Defense of Marriage Act, which defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman for the purposes of more than 1,000 federal laws and regulations.The Supreme Court's ruling in the Defense of Marriage Act case will at most decide whether the federal government can discriminate against same-sex couples even if they married in states that allow such unions. Nine states and the District of Columbia allow same-sex marriage.The case from California presents the broader question of whether there is a constitutional right to same-sex marriage in the states that do not allow it, which is why the brief is significant. It is uncertain, however, that the Supreme Court will end up deciding that broad question. The court may well avoid the issue on technical grounds or rule in a way that applies only to California.Until not long ago, the administration was thought likely to stay out of the California case, partly as a matter of historical practice and partly to be true to President Obama's public position on same-sex marriage. The federal government took no position in 1967 in Loving v. Virginia, the case in which the Supreme Court struck down bans on interracial marriage, or in 2003 in the last major gay rights case, Lawrence v. Texas, which struck down state laws making gay sex a crime.Moreover, when Mr. Obama announced his support for same-sex marriage, he said the matter was for the states to decide.On the other hand, Mr. Obama has long opposed Proposition 8."I am not in favor of gay marriage," Mr. Obama told MTV News in 2008. "But when you start playing around with constitutions, just to prohibit somebody who cares about another person, it just seems to me that's not what America's about. Usually, our constitutions expand liberties, they don't contract them."But Mr. Obama has since embraced a more sweeping view of marriage equality. "Our journey is not complete until our gay brothers and sisters are treated like anyone else under the law," he said in his Inaugural Address, "for if we are truly created equal, then surely the love we commit to one another must be equal, as well."Supporters of marriage rights for same-sex couples applauded the brief. Chad Griffin, who founded the organization that filed the legal challenge to Proposition 8 and now heads the Human Rights Campaign, an advocacy group in Washington, called it "another historic step forward consistent with the great civil rights battles of our nation's history." He said President Obama had "turned the inspirational words of his second Inaugural Address into concrete action."Both briefs argue that courts should subject laws making distinctions between straight and gay people to "heightened scrutiny," requiring a showing that such laws are "substantially related to an important government objective."The administration argues that the factors, including a history of discrimination, that led courts to require heightened scrutiny for laws on gender and illegitimacy should also require it for those addressing sexual orientation.The California case is scheduled to be argued March 26 and the one concerning the federal law March 27. Solicitor General Donald B. Verrilli Jr. will probably present the federal government's position in both cases, and he is likely to be questioned closely about changes and possible inconsistencies in the administration's position.
The Boy Scouts of America is reaching out to parents and scouts as it decides whether to continue or rescind the group's ban on gay members and leaders. Surveys went out in recent days to 1.1 million scouts and their families around the nation.The questionnaire goes far beyond a simple yes or no, gays in or gays out. Even sleeping arrangements are addressed.Should gay and straight scouts, for example, be allowed to share a tent on a camping trip? What role should faith play in scouting, if a church sponsoring a local scout troop has taken a position on the inclusion or exclusion of gays and lesbians in its congregation? Does the scout oath, with its language about staying "morally straight," declare a value about sexual orientation or just a general, admirable code of conduct?The Boy Scouts said in January that it was considering lifting the ban and allowing local sponsoring organizations to decide membership policies for themselves, but then quickly changed course and said that leaders needed more time and would take up the issue at the national annual meeting in May.The survey offers possible outcomes should the Boy Scouts decide to keep or change its policy. Some address the widespread fear that the scouting movement could fracture or face an exodus no matter what it does."If the Boy Scouts of America makes a decision on this policy that disagrees with your own view, will you continue to participate in the Boy Scouts, or will you leave the organization?" one of questions says. The suggested answers, fittingly, read like responses to a course on map reading: "I believe I can find a way to continue" is one choice. "I do not believe I can find a way to continue" and "I have not yet made up my mind," are the others.A spokesman for the Scouts, Deron Smith, said the answers to the survey would be provided to national leaders before the May meeting. A second round of surveys, he wrote in an e-mail, will be sent soon to about 325,000 people in scouting alumni groups, including members of the National Eagle Scout Association. The survey was developed by a third-party research provider, North Star Opinion Research, with assistance from volunteers and professionals, Mr. Smith said, with "diverse viewpoints.""No specific weights have been assigned to any particular element, and the report will be reviewed as a whole," Mr. Smith said.Some polling experts said the population being sampled — those with a connection to scouting, in the past or present — could create a bias in the findings, since people generally tend to support the status quo of voluntary institutions they are involved with. That could perhaps tilt the results toward keeping the ban on gays if change is perceived as a threat to the organization.But Christopher P. Borick, director of the Muhlenberg College Institute of Public Opinion, who has two sons in the Scouts, said he thought the wording of the questions seemed relatively neutral and not intended, as he put it, "to provide a certain outcome."Professor Borick said that as a scouting father, he is strongly opposed to the ban on gays and hopes to see it lifted. He said that what the survey appears to be looking for is less what course to take than what impact a change, or a continuation of the status quo, might have.Some questions, for example, address freedom of religious expression. The Scouts organization says that more than 70 percent of all Scout units are chartered by faith-based organizations."A troop is chartered by an organization that does not believe homosexuality is wrong and allows gays to be ministers," one question reads. "The youth minister traditionally serves as the Scoutmaster. The congregation hires a youth minister who is gay. Is it acceptable or unacceptable for this youth minister to serve as the Scoutmaster?"Another question takes on that same issue from a different perspective."David, a Boy Scout, believes that homosexuality is wrong. His troop is chartered to a church where the doctrine of that faith also teaches that homosexuality is wrong. Steve, an openly gay youth, applies to be a member. Is it acceptable or unacceptable for this troop to deny Steve membership in their troop?"Respondents are asked to provide their opinions on a scale ranging from totally acceptable to totally unacceptable.But even before May's national meeting, some donors are already voting about the membership issue — with their wallets.Last fall, for example, the United Way of Greater Cleveland announced that it would no longer make grants to the Scoutreach program — which works with urban and rural boys — because the ban on gays was in conflict with the organization's diversity and inclusion policy.Since then, about $200,000 in donations to the Cleveland United Way has evaporated, a spokeswoman said. But in a reflection of divided local opinion, a $20,000 increase in donor-directed contributions to the Boy Scouts arrived as well — an 11 percent increase from the previous year.The money question is widespread, as families pledge to withhold further donations or increase them depending on how things go."I made a modest $50 donation to Friends of Scouting this year," Susan Buchanan, the mother of a 16-year-old scout in Bethesda, Md., wrote in a letter to her local scout council. "I am prepared to quadruple that donation as soon as the ban on gays is lifted."
DENVER — Colorado lawmakers passed legislation on Tuesday to legalize civil unions for same-sex couples, following several years of bitter debate over the issue.Pushed by the Democrat-led legislature and backed by a handful of Republicans, the bill had been widely expected to gain approval this year, after Democrats retook control of the State House of Representatives last November.But Tuesday's victory was no less meaningful for supporters who had come frustratingly close to passing the legislation in 2012. And it signaled the latest shift in a state that was once seen as hostile toward gays and lesbians."This is a historic moment to be seized and to be cherished," said Representative Pete Lee, a Democrat from Colorado Springs, as the House weighed civil unions for the final time on Tuesday."We vote today to redeem our friends," he added. "Our aunts, our uncles, our sisters, our children and, dare I say, our colleagues, from the scourge of discrimination and inequality."Leading the efforts to pass the legislation were Senator Pat Steadman and Mark Ferrandino, the House speaker, both Democrats from Denver and two of eight openly gay state legislators here. The bill passed the House by a vote of 39-26. The legislation had previously cleared the Senate, where Democrats also hold a majority. Gov. John Hickenlooper is expected to sign the bill into law in the coming weeks.Currently 19 other states and the District of Columbia recognize civil unions, marriage and domestic partnerships, or other benefits for same-sex couples, according to the National Gay and Lesbian Task Force.For weeks, Colorado's legislative session has been dominated by a tense fight over proposed new gun laws — a far cry from last year, when civil unions took center stage. With Republicans then controlling the House, the legislation was never called to the floor for a full debate, despite the fact that Democrats had seemingly drummed up enough bipartisan support to pass it.After Mr. Hickenlooper convened a special legislative session, the bill was defeated by a House committee, infuriating its backers. But its fate was never really in question this year, and Democrats were able to beat back a number of Republican-proposed amendments that would have altered the legislation.Opponents had argued that civil unions would lead to gay marriage in Colorado and unfairly restrict those with religious objections. As the final vote call was read, supporters in attendance let out a collective whoop."This has been a long time coming," said Jeff Ball, who was at the Capitol on Tuesday with his partner. "We wanted to feel like we're a part our own state."
WASHINGTON — Senator Rob Portman of Ohio, a rising national star in the Republican Party, announced on Friday that he has a gay son and could no longer justify his opposition to same-sex marriage .Mr. Portman's revelation makes him the only sitting Republican senator to publicly support giving gay men and lesbians the right to marry, and one of the most prominent so far of a growing number of Republicans to publicly oppose their party on the issue.In a series of interviews and an op-ed article published in The Columbus Dispatch, Mr. Portman, at times nervously wringing his hands, said that he did not want his son Will, who is 21, treated any differently because of his sexuality."I've come to the conclusion that for me, personally, I think this is something that we should allow people to do, to get married, and to have the joy and stability of marriage that I've had for over 26 years," he told CNN. "That I want all of my children to have, including our son, who is gay."Mr. Portman's announcement raises more difficult questions for the Republican Party, which is trying to rebuild after the loss of the 2012 presidential election but still holds firmly to positions on issues like gay marriage and immigration that are alienating to many voters.His position drew a cool response from some quarters and puts him at odds with his party's leaders in Congress, who have long looked at him as a faithful conservative and loyal ally. A spokesman for Speaker John A. Boehner, who is also from Ohio, said Friday that while Mr. Boehner "respects" Mr. Portman's position, "the speaker continues to believe that marriage is between a man and a woman."A spokesman for Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, had no immediate comment but said that Mr. Portman did call the senator this week to inform him that he would be making the announcement.In making the argument for same-sex marriage, Mr. Portman chose not only to articulate his thoughts in personal terms, but did so in a way intended to resonate with conservatives as well."We conservatives believe in personal liberty and minimal government interference in people's lives," he wrote in the op-ed. "We also consider the family unit to be the fundamental building block of society. We should encourage people to make long-term commitments to each other and build families, so as to foster strong, stable communities and promote personal responsibility."Mr. Portman, a former budget director for President George W. Bush, was on the Romney campaign's short list of possible vice-presidential candidates last year. And he said that he had disclosed his son's sexuality — which he learned of two years ago — to the campaign.Beth Myers, the Romney adviser who led the vice-presidential candidate search, said on Friday that the issue had nothing to do with the decision not to select Mr. Portman.Mr. Portman was a sponsor of the 1996 Defense of Marriage Act that is now being reviewed by the Supreme Court, with arguments scheduled for this month. That case, he said, was a factor in his decision to speak out.Last month, dozens of prominent Republicans — including top aides to Mr. Bush, four former governors, two members of the House of Representatives and Ms. Myers — signed a legal brief urging the Supreme Court to declare that gay couples have a constitutional right to wed.As a congressman and later as a senator, Mr. Portman received low ratings from the Human Rights Campaign, a national group promoting gay rights. He received a zero out of 100 as a member the House in the 108th Congress. And in the 112th Congress from 2011 to early 2013, he received a 15 out of 100 after his election to the Senate."At the time, my position on marriage for same-sex couples was rooted in my faith tradition that marriage is a sacred bond between a man and a woman," he wrote in the op-ed. "Knowing that my son is gay prompted me to consider the issue from another perspective."Religious conservatives reacted strongly to Mr. Portman on Friday, with some saying that he had turned his back on Christianity. "Senator Portman speaks like so many who call themselves Christians but actually don't spend much time dwelling on the Word of God," wrote Erick Erickson, the conservative commentator, on Twitter.Others were harsher. The Traditional Values Coalition, a religious group that is often vocal on gay issues, issued a statement that equated homosexuality with drunken driving and mocked Mr. Portman, writing, "My child is a drunk driver and I love him."Will Portman did not respond to e-mails seeking comment on Friday. But he posted on his Twitter page, "Especially proud of my dad today."
SAN FRANCISCO — Nine years ago, city officials here sued to strike down a state ban on same-sex marriage. It was the first government challenge to such a law, and it set in motion a legal chain reaction that gave rise to a momentous Supreme Court case to be argued next Tuesday.The move was also the beginning of a kind of civil disobedience movement by government officials. Around the nation, executive branch officials started to abandon their traditional role, which is to enforce the laws and defend them when they are challenged in court."We're defense lawyers," Dennis J. Herrera, the city attorney, said in his office in San Francisco's palatial City Hall. "We defend laws that are on the books. And we got a lot of heat at the time for stepping out of that traditional defense role."In the years that followed, Mr. Herrera's office — which now includes five former Supreme Court law clerks, more than some major law firms — has been involved in every phase of the legal war over same-sex marriage in California.San Francisco's strategy eventually spread to the State of California and the federal government. Instead of defending state and federal laws defining marriage as a union between a man and a woman, President Obama and Gov. Jerry Brown of California urged courts to hold them unconstitutional.That has complicated the Supreme Court's job in challenges to Proposition 8, California's ban on same-sex marriages, and to the federal Defense of Marriage Act. Because the plaintiffs and defendants in both cases agree that the laws under review are unconstitutional, there is a question about whether the justices have anything to decide. Indeed, when the justices in December agreed to hear the two same-sex marriage cases, they went out of their way to ask for briefs on whether the court has the power to decide them in light of the actions of government officials.John C. Eastman, a law professor at Chapman University in Orange, Calif., and the chairman of the National Association for Marriage, which opposes same-sex marriage, said government officials in the two cases had demonstrated "a cavalier attitude toward their duties to enforce the law." He was particularly critical of Mr. Herrera's suit, which followed a brief period in 2004 during which Gavin Newsom, then the mayor of San Francisco and now the state's lieutenant governor, instructed city officials here to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples. "It was exhibiting lawlessness," Professor Eastman said.Mr. Herrera said it was sometimes necessary for government lawyers to attack the laws they are charged with defending. "When a disfavored minority is being targeted," he said, "it's up to a public law office to stop it."San Francisco's role in the Proposition 8 case, Hollingsworth v. Perry, No. 12-144, has been overshadowed by that of Theodore B. Olson and David Boies, the prominent lawyers who in 2009 filed the suit challenging the initiative. The city promptly intervened, and the two teams of lawyers worked closely together at the trial.Mr. Olson, a former United States solicitor general who has argued some 60 cases in the Supreme Court, said the quality of the work from Mr. Herrera's office was exceptional."Their briefs have been superb," Mr. Olson said.That is probably partly a testament to the credentials of the team Mr. Herrera assembled. Even in a difficult job market for lawyers, Supreme Court clerks command enormous payments for just joining private firms."Bonuses my year were $225,000," recalled Christine Van Aken, who in 2004 and 2005 clerked for Justice David H. Souter. (Signing bonuses are now in the neighborhood of $280,000.)Vince Chhabria, who clerked for Justice Stephen G. Breyer and joined the city attorney's office after a stint at a firm, questioned Ms. Van Aken's judgment. "I remember telling you," he told her, "that you were insane to give up a quarter-million-dollar bonus."There are two other clerks from the chambers of the more liberal justices — Aileen McGrath worked for Justice Breyer, and Sara Eisenberg for Justice John Paul Stevens — along with one surprise.Leila Mongan served as a law clerk to Justice Clarence Thomas, who is by some measures the most conservative justice on the current court. Ms. Mongan said she had joined the office because "it's a place to do public law in an ambitious office that takes on important cases."Therese Stewart, Mr. Herrera's chief deputy, said Ms. Mongan was an important sounding board. "She's our outside perspective," Ms. Stewart said.Mr. Herrera said he was not surprised by the caliber of the talent he has been able to attract."Why do they go to law school in the first place?" he asked. "They want to be involved in cases of some moment."Besides, he added, they do not starve. "The top I can pay is about two hundred grand," he said. That is comparable to the pay of junior associates at big law firms, although it comes without the signing bonus. The San Francisco lawyers have made distinctive contributions to the case. They were largely responsible for the argument that prevailed in the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit here, one that struck down Proposition 8 but stopped short of endorsing logic that would require same-sex marriage in all 50 states. (The ruling has been stayed while the Supreme Court considers the case.)In its brief in the Supreme Court, the city repeated those arguments, telling the justices that some features of the state's experience could allow for a ruling short of establishing a nationwide right.Civil unions in California, as in seven other states, give same-sex couples all of the legal benefits and burdens of marriage while withholding only the name. California is, moreover, the only state to have withdrawn the right to marry after it had been established by its Supreme Court.Those factors, the city's brief says, could allow the United States Supreme Court to strike down the state's ban. The brief also argued that the failure of California officials to appeal deprived the appeals court and the Supreme Court of jurisdiction over the case. The brief for the proponents of Proposition 8 said that they were entitled to represent the interests of the state and that the justices should not allow executive branch officials to veto the wishes of the electorate.The brief filed by Mr. Olson and Mr. Boies is more ambitious than the city's. It calls for the application of "heightened scrutiny," requiring a showing that Proposition 8 is "substantially related to an important government objective." Victory on that point could put all same-sex marriage bans at risk.The brief makes a comparatively abbreviated argument about the proponents' standing, another indication that Mr. Olson and Mr. Boies want to win big.Ms. Stewart, one of the city's lawyers, said the two briefs were complementary and that the two teams "could not be more supportive" of each other."Our view, perhaps because we are more cautious," she said, "was to give the Ninth Circuit and the high court the whole panoply of options."
WASHINGTON — They hear that their cause is lost, that demographics and the march of history have doomed their campaign to keep marriage only between a man and a woman. But the young conservatives who oppose same-sex marriage — unlike most of their generation — remain undaunted.They identify themselves as part of the "pro-marriage movement" and see themselves at the beginning of a long political struggle, much like the battle over abortion. If they can begin shifting the terms of the debate away from gay rights and toward the meaning of marriage, they say, they have a chance to survive short-term defeats."The primary challenge that our side faces right now is the intense social pressure," said Joseph Backholm, 34, the executive director of the Family Policy Institute of Washington. "To the extent that the other side is able to frame this as a vote for gay people to be happy, it will be challenging for us."To put it another way, opponents of same-sex marriage say they must argue in favor of traditional marriage, not against gay people or gay rights. "It's really a broader defense of marriage and a stronger marriage culture," said Will Haun, 26, a lawyer and member of the Federalist Society.In the highest-profile effort, the National Organization for Marriage is gearing up for a march on the National Mall on Tuesday, the day the Supreme Court is scheduled to hear arguments on California's 2008 voter-approved ban on same-sex marriage.Last week, the Heritage Foundation released a report by Ryan T. Anderson, 31, in defense of traditional marriage, "Marriage: What It Is, Why It Matters, and the Consequences of Redefining It." Mr. Anderson, a Heritage Foundation fellow, has also held briefings for members of Congress, their staff members and others to explain his arguments against same-sex marriage, and he and two co-authors released a book last year laying out their case in depth.Still, the fight is shaping up to be a difficult one, with public opinion increasingly seeming to shift in favor of same-sex marriage. More than 100 high-profile Republicans recently filed a brief urging the Supreme Court to declare that gay couples have a constitutional right to marry. On Friday, Senator Rob Portman of Ohio became the only sitting Republican senator to publicly support same-sex marriage, citing his 21-year-old gay son, Will, as the catalyst.Beyond Washington, polling has begun to show that a majority of Americans supports same-sex marriage, with even young Republicans moving in that direction.In a New York Times/CBS News poll conducted last month, 45 percent of Republicans between 18 and 44 years old said they thought same-sex couples should be able to marry — a contrast with Republicans 45 and older, only 20 percent of whom agreed.After repeated defeats at the ballot box in recent years, same-sex marriage went four for four in statewide votes in November, with victories in Maine, Maryland, Minnesota and Washington."Proponents of same-sex marriage have done a fantastic job of telling the story of same-sex marriage through music and television and film," said Eric Teetsel, 29, the executive director of the Manhattan Declaration, which describes itself as a movement of Christians for life, marriage and religious freedom. "I think it's really a case where once they hear the other side of the issue, and really think about it deeply, we're going to win a lot of those folks back."And the other side of the issue — the case for what proponents call traditional marriage — is simple, they say."In redefining marriage to include same-sex couples, what you're doing is you're excluding the norm of sexual complementarity," said Mr. Anderson, the Heritage Foundation fellow. "Once you exclude that norm, the three other norms — which are monogamy, sexual exclusivity and permanency — become optional as well."The result, proponents of traditional marriage say, would be further rises in divorce rates and out-of-wedlock births."When you de-link marriage from childbearing, you then have to increase the complexity of that relationship," said Caitlin Seery, 25, the director of programs for the Love and Fidelity Network, which works with college groups to advocate traditional marriage.Proponents of same-sex marriage respond that no evidence links it to social ills and that, in fact, divorce rates are often lower in states more accepting of it. Moreover, they say, same-sex marriage fits with this country's long history of extending equal rights to groups once denied them.For opponents, moving the debate away from those historical analogies is crucial."Most young people think if you come out with traditional marriage views, you're a bigot," said Thomas Peters, 27, the communications director for the National Organization for Marriage. "You can't have that many people in the shadows."The issue, proponents of traditional marriage say, is one of presentation."These Republicans who are jumping ship are doing so because we have no way of messaging," said Ashley Pratte, 23, the executive director of Cornerstone Policy Research and Cornerstone Action, a New Hampshire group that focuses on social issues. "Do you want to tell your friends when you're out with them on a Friday night that they can't get married? No, you don't want to have that discussion, but you want to have a healthy discussion."Opponents of same-sex marriage say they realize they may lose the current fight, but they optimistically take the long view, pointing to Roe v. Wade, the 1973 Supreme Court case that legalized abortion. At the time, they say, opponents of abortion were told their cause was lost, but the fight continues 40 years later."If you take the longer view of history — I'm not talking just 15 years, I'm talking 40 years or even 100 years — I can't help but think that the uniqueness of man-woman marriage will be adjudicated over time," said Andrew T. Walker, 27, a policy analyst at the Heritage Foundation.Either way, they are not planning on giving up any time soon."Even if we are doomed, and I'm totally naïve, I think it's important that I do this work anyway," said Mr. Teetsel, of the Manhattan Declaration. "If what I believe is true is true, then I've got a responsibility to be on its side for as long as I can be."
The American Academy of Pediatrics declared its support for same-sex marriage for the first time on Thursday, saying that allowing gay and lesbian parents to marry if they so choose is in the best interests of their children.The academy's new policy statement says same-sex marriage helps guarantee rights, benefits and long-term security for children, while acknowledging that it does not now ensure access to federal benefits. When marriage is not an option, the academy said, children should not be deprived of foster care or adoption by single parents or couples, whatever their sexual orientation.The academy's review of scientific literature began more than four years ago, and the result is a 10-page report with 60 citations."If the studies are different in their design and sample but the results continue to be similar, that gives scientists and consumers more faith in the result," said Dr. Ellen Perrin, a co-author of the new policy and a professor of pediatrics at Tufts University School of Medicine.Other scientists called the evidence lackluster and said the academy's endorsement was premature. Loren Marks, an associate professor of child and family studies at Louisiana State University in Baton Rouge, said there was not enough national data to support the pediatric association's position on same-sex marriage. "National policy should be informed by nationally representative data," he said. "We are moving in the direction of higher-quality national data, but it's slow."The academy cited research finding that a child's well-being is much more affected by the strength of relationships among family members and a family's social and economic resources than by the sexual orientation of the parents. "There is an emerging consensus, based on extensive review of the scientific literature, that children growing up in households headed by gay men or lesbians are not disadvantaged in any significant respect relative to children of heterosexual parents," the academy said.A large body of evidence demonstrates that children raised by gay or lesbian parents fare as well in emotional, cognitive and social functioning as peers raised by heterosexuals, the academy said.One study in England compared 39 families with lesbian mothers to 74 heterosexual parents and 60 families headed by single heterosexual women. No difference was found between the groups in emotional involvement, abnormal behaviors in children as reported by parents or teachers, or psychiatric disorders in them. Both mothers and teachers reported more behavioral problems among children in single-parent families than two-parent ones, whatever their sexual orientation.A 2010 study of children born to 154 lesbian parents in the United States compared mothers' reports of their 17-year-olds to a national sample of age-matched peers. The mothers' reports indicated that their sons and daughters had high levels of competence and fewer social problems, compared with their peers."Marriage strengthens families and benefits child development, and it also increases a parent's sense of competence and security when they are able to raise children without stigma," said Dr. Nanette Gartrell, the lead author of the study and a visiting scholar at the University of California, Los Angeles, School of Law.The research on same-sex marriage has limitations, experts note, including the relatively small sample sizes of gay or lesbian parents even in long-term studies. Many studies have relied on parental assessments of their children's well-being, and there is relatively little data about the well-being of children raised by gay men compared with lesbians."Many studies compare wealthy, well-educated lesbian mothers to single heterosexual mothers instead of married couples," Dr. Marks said. "This matters, because children from married families do better on numerous outcomes including psychological and physical health and avoidance of high-risk behaviors than children of single-parent families."Timm Ryan-Young, a 48-year-old married Brooklynite and father of Zelia, 6, found the academy's support of same-sex marriage reaffirming."Whenever a formal institution validates or confirms that a same-sex family is valid," he said, "and there are no measurable negatives to it, or deterrents to it, it means a great deal, frankly."Dr. Travis Kidner, 36, a surgeon in Los Angeles, and Hernan Lopez, 42, a media executive, married in 2008 and adopted Nicholas, 2 1/2 years old, and Zoe, 21 months. "It's important for kids to know they are from a stable home and that their parents are married," Dr. Kidner said.The pediatrics academy's support for same-sex marriage heartened him. "The arc is in our favor now," he said.Another reason same-sex couples should be allowed to marry, the academy said, is that divorce law provides for a legally structured arrangement for visits and custody."If people can't get married, then they can't get divorced," Dr. Perrin said. "That legal system that exists to protect our most vulnerable, namely children, isn't in play."
DENVER — With a stroke of the governor's pen, Colorado on Thursday legalized civil unions for same-sex couples, a major shift for a Western state where voters outlawed same-sex marriages in 2006.The law makes Colorado the 18th state to allow gay marriage or some form of same-sex union, and its signing comes days before the Supreme Court hears two major cases on marriage equality.For many gay Coloradans, it was a jubilant — if almost unreal — moment."When we started fighting for it, this was a foregone conclusion that it wasn't going to happen," said Jerry Cunningham, the publisher of the magazine Out Front Colorado. "It's kind of amazing. It's creating an awareness that we can have relationships. It validates it and legitimizes it, and says it's O.K."Across Colorado, couples are already making plans. Denver's fourth annual gay and lesbian wedding expo is being held at the end of April ("Begin planning your own dream civil union!") and the county clerks in Denver and Boulder are planning to open their offices at midnight on May 1 — when the law takes effect — to hand out the first civil union licenses.Even as Gov. John W. Hickenlooper signed the law, activists and gay couples acknowledged that it failed to grant full marriage equality to same-sex couples, and they wondered whether Colorado was now — or would ever be — ready to head in that direction."We are going to move forward," said Brad Clark, executive director of One Colorado, an advocacy group for gay and transgender Coloradans.Any effort to legalize same-sex marriages would require Colorado voters to undo a constitutional amendment that limited marriages to unions of one man and one woman, and it would stir strong opposition from conservative groups across the state.But gay-marriage advocates say opinions in Colorado — and across the country — are changing fast. They cite support from politicians ranging from President Obama and Hillary Rodham Clinton to Senator Rob Portman, an Ohio Republican who changed his stance on same-sex marriage after learning his son was gay.In Colorado's statehouse, the issue still divides people along party lines.Last year, a civil union bill died after it did not receive a vote on the floor of Colorado's Republican-controlled House. This year, with Democrats controlling both chambers of the statehouse as well as the governor's office, the measure was all but guaranteed to pass.Only three Republicans voted for the bill, with others rejecting it because it lacked religious exemptions for adoption agencies and other groups, or saying the civil unions came too close to legalizing gay marriage.Mario Nicolais, a Republican lawyer in Denver who describes himself as a "straight white guy who goes to church," advocated as a conservative for civil unions, saying they would strengthen families, spread equality and be good for the state's image and its residents."We knew this would happen," he said. "There are too many people, and the demographics are changing too rapidly. It's just such a groundswell."
WASHINGTON — As gay couples fight for the right to wed, a little-known but determined force is working to stop them: Brian S. Brown, a 39-year-old father of eight who has raised millions of dollars from religious conservatives — especially his fellow Roman Catholics — to become the nation's leading opponent of same-sex marriage .Mr. Brown, president of the nonprofit National Organization for Marriage here, was instrumental in passing Proposition 8, California's same-sex marriage ban, and is working in a host of states (and recently in France) to defeat gay-friendly candidates and outlaw what he calls "the redefinition of marriage."Now his views are facing the ultimate American test: a hearing before the Supreme Court, which is considering whether to overturn Proposition 8 and perhaps declare it unconstitutional.When the justices hear oral arguments in the case on Tuesday, Mr. Brown — unfazed by polls showing that a majority of Americans disagree with him — will be on the court's marble steps, leading a march that he hopes will draw thousands who believe, as he does, that gay unions hurt children and threaten religious freedom."The notion that somehow we are on a one-way elevator to gay marriage, and that no matter what anyone does that it's going to happen, is false," he said in an interview in his sparsely decorated suite on K Street, the capital's lobbying corridor. "That is the myth of inevitability."A California native (he grew up sneaking his surfboard into the pristine stretch of private coastline known as Hollister Ranch near Santa Barbara), Mr. Brown has an open face and an easy laugh that belie his status as a divisive figure in the culture wars. Raised a Quaker, he converted to Catholicism as an adult, with a passion for traditional marriage that he says is rooted in his faith.As he said in a debate with Dan Savage, a gay columnist, last summer, "The notion of the uniqueness of men and women is not some side thing in Scripture, it's a key part of our view of humanity: that there are two halves of humanity, male and female, and that we complement each other, and that complementarity bears fruit in children."Frank Schubert, the marriage organization's national political director, said, "He has a convert's zeal."Mr. Brown also has a keen sense of strategy and a polished speaking style, traits that unnerve his opponents. When gay rights advocates began calling same-sex marriage a "civil rights issue," Mr. Brown, determined to keep the racial analogy from seeping into popular culture, enlisted black pastors to his cause. In public appearances and on television, he rarely comes across as a renegade, although his tone can grow strident when the audience is familiar."When you knock over a core pillar of society like marriage, and then try to redefine biblical views of marriage as bigotry, there will be consequences," Mr. Brown warned last August in a fund-raising letter. "Will one of the consequences be a serious push to normalize pedophilia?"Conservative Christian groups have thrown their weight behind Mr. Brown's work. The Knights of Columbus, a Catholic fraternal organization, donated about $2 million to help get the National Organization for Marriage started. Mormons contributed heavily to the Proposition 8 campaign, and Bishop Salvatore J. Cordileone, now archbishop of San Francisco, raised money to put the initiative on the ballot.In an interview, the archbishop said Mr. Brown "understands that civilization rises and falls on marriage."But gay rights advocates see Mr. Brown as the personification of evil, a man who traffics in distortions and smears with a smile.The Southern Poverty Law Center, which fights intolerance, says the National Organization for Marriage pushes the line of being labeled a hate group because it "continues to spread lies about gays" and uses its Web site to link to debunked research. The Human Rights Campaign, an advocacy group, devotes a portion of its Web site, headlined "NOM Exposed," to tracking Mr. Brown and his group."Even Governor Wallace in the end came around," said Chad Griffin, the Human Rights Campaign president, referring to George Wallace, the segregationist Alabama governor.Mr. Brown grew up in Whittier, Calif., a town with a Quaker background on the border of Los Angeles and Orange Counties, the son of an accountant and a homemaker who split when he was 13. Maggie Gallagher, his predecessor as the marriage organization's president and the author of a book about the dangers of divorce, said that Mr. Brown "shares a lot of characteristics of children of divorce" who as adults make "a really firm commitment to do something different for their children."Mr. Brown played football, ran the Republican Club and was president of the student body at Whittier College, where he threw himself into the history of conservative political thought and read theorists like Edmund Burke and Friedrich Hayek."He was somebody I expected great things from," said Frederic Bergerson, one of his political science professors.In the summer of 1996, just after graduation, Mr. Brown arrived in the Michigan village of Mecosta for research on the conservative thinker Russell Kirk. Over fireside talks in a scholarly center housed in Kirk's ancestral home, he immersed himself in Kirk's notion that "permanent things" — family and church — form the foundation of a healthy society. When a roommate introduced him to Catholic teachings, Mr. Brown plunged in and eventually converted."He was looking for history, roots, understanding of what is true culture," said Annette Kirk, Russell's widow.Mr. Brown obtained a second degree at Oxford, returned to the United States to marry a woman he met through his childhood pastor, and later went to the University of California, Los Angeles, to pursue a doctorate. But he gave up academia for activism when offered a job at the Family Institute of Connecticut, where he worked, ultimately unsuccessfully, to stop a 2005 Connecticut law that allowed same-sex couples to enter into civil unions.There, Mr. Brown's work attracted the attention of Ms. Gallagher, who by then had begun to worry that social conservatives like herself would be outmatched by organized gay rights supporters. She recalls meeting Mr. Brown at a conference."He said we needed a Club for Growth for marriage," she said, referring to the advocacy group that promotes economic freedom. "He got the strategic need."With the help of Robert P. George, a conservative scholar at Princeton, they founded the National Organization for Marriage in 2007, with Ms. Gallagher as president and Mr. Brown as executive director.If same-sex marriage becomes a cultural norm, Mr. Brown warns, heterosexual couples will no longer have preference over gay men and lesbians in adoptions, schoolchildren will be taught that same-sex parenting is normal, and those who oppose it will be labeled bigots. Already he worries about his safety and that of his handful of employees, which is why there is a security lock on his office door."Children are taught in kindergarten, first grade, that it's the same thing to grow up and marry a boy as to marry a girl," he said in a recent interview on C-Span. "That is a profound consequence."Aside from the big victory in California (Mr. Brown moved his family there for a year to help pass Proposition 8), his group helped unseat three Iowa Supreme Court justices who overturned a ban against same-sex marriage there, and helped lead last year's successful effort to ban same-sex marriage in North Carolina. But since 2009, gay men and lesbians have won the right to marry in the District of Columbia and eight states.Although his track record is now mixed, Mr. Brown is convinced that his big victory will come at the United States Supreme Court."No way the court is going to launch another Roe v. Wade," he said, referring to the 1973 decision that made abortion legal. But whatever the outcome, he said, there will be more battles, either in the courts or in legislatures, and he will fight them."If we were to lose, would it be difficult?" he asked, before quickly answering. "Of course it would be difficult. But we're never going away."
WASHINGTON — When the Supreme Court hears a pair of cases on same-sex marriage on Tuesday and Wednesday, the justices will be working in the shadow of a 40-year-old decision on another subject entirely: Roe v. Wade , the 1973 ruling that established a constitutional right to abortion.Judges, lawyers and scholars have drawn varying lessons from that decision, with some saying that it was needlessly rash and created a culture war.Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, a liberal and a champion of women's rights, has long harbored doubts about the ruling."It's not that the judgment was wrong, but it moved too far, too fast," she said last year at Columbia Law School.Briefs from opponents of same-sex marriage, including one from 17 states, are studded with references to the aftermath of the abortion decision and to Justice Ginsburg's critiques of it. They say the lesson from the Roe decision is that states should be allowed to work out delicate matters like abortion and same-sex marriage for themselves."They thought they were resolving a contentious issue by taking it out of the political process but ended up perpetuating it," John C. Eastman, the chairman of the National Organization for Marriage and a law professor at Chapman University, said of the justices who decided the abortion case. "The lesson they should draw is that when you are moving beyond the clear command of the Constitution, you should be very hesitant about shutting down a political debate."Justice Ginsburg has suggested that the Supreme Court in 1973 should have struck down only the restrictive Texas abortion law before it and left broader questions for another day. The analogous approach four decades later would be to strike down California's ban on same-sex marriage but leave in place prohibitions in about 40 other states.But Theodore J. Boutrous Jr., a lawyer for the two couples challenging California's ban, said the Roe ruling was a different case on a different subject and arose in a different political and social context. The decision was "a bolt out of the blue," he said, and it had not been "subject to exhaustive public discussion, debate and support, including by the president and other high-ranking government officials from both parties.""Roe was written in a way that allowed its critics to argue that the court was creating out of whole cloth a brand new constitutional right," Mr. Boutrous said. "But recognition of the fundamental constitutional right to marry dates back over a century, and the Supreme Court has already paved the way for marriage equality by deciding two landmark decisions protecting gay citizens from discrimination."The author of the majority opinions in those two cases, Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, seemed to address the new ones in wary terms in remarks this month in Sacramento."A democracy should not be dependent for its major decisions on what nine unelected people from a narrow legal background have to say," he said.In Justice Ginsburg's account, set out in public remarks and law review articles, the broad ruling in the abortion case froze activity in state legislatures, created venomous polarization and damaged the authority of the court."The legislatures all over the United States were moving on this question," Justice Ginsburg said at Princeton in 2008. "The law was in a state of flux.""The Supreme Court's decision was a perfect rallying point for people who disagreed with the notion that it should be a woman's choice," she added. "They could, instead of fighting in the trenches legislature by legislature, go after this decision by unelected judges."That general view is widely accepted across the political spectrum, and it might counsel caution at a moment when same-sex marriage is allowed in nine states and the District of Columbia and seems likely, judging from polls, to make further gains around the nation."Intervening at this stage of a social reform movement would be somewhat analogous to Roe v. Wade, where the court essentially took the laws deregulating abortion in four states and turned them into a constitutional command for the other 46," Michael J. Klarman, a law professor at Harvard, wrote in a recent book, "From the Closet to the Altar: Courts, Backlash and the Struggle for Same-Sex Marriage." Mr. Klarman was a law clerk to Justice Ginsburg when she served on the federal appeals court in Washington.But an article that will appear in Discourse, an online legal journal published by The UCLA Law Review, proposes a different account. "The Roe-centered backlash narrative, it seems, is the trump card in many discussions of the marriage cases," wrote Linda Greenhouse, a former New York Times reporter who covered the court and now teaches at Yale Law School, and Reva B. Siegel, a law professor there.
Bill Clinton's Regrets: The Times's Peter Baker on why the former president says signing the Defense of Marriage Act was a mistake.WASHINGTON — He had just flown across the country after an exhausting campaign day in Oregon and South Dakota, landing at the White House after dark. But President Bill Clinton still had more business before bed. He picked up a pen and scrawled out his name, turning a bill into law.It was 10 minutes before 1 a.m. on Saturday, Sept. 21, 1996, and there were no cameras, no ceremony. The witching-hour timing bespoke both political calculation and personal angst. With his signature, federal law now defined marriage as the union of a man and woman. Mr. Clinton considered it a gay-baiting measure, but was unwilling to risk re-election by vetoing it.For nearly 17 years since, that middle-of-the-night moment has haunted Mr. Clinton, the source of tension with friends, advisers and gay rights supporters. He tried to explain, defend and justify. He asked for understanding. Then he inched away from it bit by bit. Finally this month, he disavowed the Defense of Marriage Act entirely, urging that the law be overturned by the Supreme Court, which takes up the matter on Wednesday on the second of two days of arguments devoted to same-sex marriage issues.Rarely has a former president declared that an action he took in office violated the Constitution. But Mr. Clinton's journey from signing the Defense of Marriage Act to repudiating it mirrors larger changes in society as same-sex marriage has gone from a fringe idea to one with a majority."President Clinton has evolved on this issue just like every American has evolved," said Chad Griffin, who worked as a junior press aide in Mr. Clinton's White House and now heads the Human Rights Campaign, the nation's most prominent gay rights organization.Not every American has evolved in the same way Mr. Clinton has. A sizable proportion of Americans still oppose same-sex marriage, and to them Mr. Clinton's turnabout is a betrayal of sorts. But neither supporters nor opponents find it entirely surprising since both sides assumed the former president had actually signed the bill out of politics rather than principle.Mr. Clinton was the first president to openly court gay Americans. He met an openly gay man for the first time at Oxford in 1968 when a fellow Rhodes scholar, Paul Parish, revealed himself as gay. "He always had gay friends," Mr. Parish recalled last week. "He's always wanted to do the right things by gays."As a presidential candidate in 1991, Mr. Clinton flew to California for a meeting arranged by the political strategist David Mixner and other gay rights supporters. "They were pretty skeptical of the governor of Arkansas, as you can imagine," recalled Mickey Kantor, Mr. Clinton's campaign chairman at the time. But over two and a half hours, Mr. Kantor said Mr. Clinton won them over with "his empathy, his emotional connection."He tripped up in the early days of his presidency by underestimating the opposition to opening the military to gays and lesbians and accepted the "don't ask, don't tell" compromise that required they keep their sexual orientation secret. So when Republicans proposed the Defense of Marriage Act in an election year, Mr. Clinton resolved not to get burned again.The bill passed with overwhelming margins, enough to override a veto. He hoped to avoid calling attention to it with his post-midnight signature. Mike McCurry, the press secretary, got a call at home asking if they should wait until morning to announce it. "His posture was quite frankly driven by the political realities of an election year in 1996," Mr. McCurry recalled.Some gay supporters were outraged. Mr. Mixner, already alienated because of the military compromise, refused to attend the Democratic convention after Mr. Clinton made clear he would sign the bill. "He made a political calculation that was an immoral calculation," Mr. Mixner recalled.The schism widened when Mr. Clinton's campaign broadcast ads on Christian radio in 15 states boasting that he had signed the Defense of Marriage Act. But most gay voters still voted for him, according to polls. His support for employment nondiscrimination legislation, AIDS financing and removing limits on security clearances for gay civilians outweighed what at the time seemed a more theoretical issue."People screamed as loud as they could inside the building and outside right up until the minute he signed it, and then when he signed it everybody moved on," said Richard Socarides, then Mr. Clinton's White House adviser on gay and lesbian issues.In his second term, Mr. Clinton became the first president to address the Human Rights Campaign, and he nominated James Hormel as the first openly gay ambassador. "He stood up for me when he really didn't have to," Mr. Hormel said last week.Mr. Clinton did not back off the marriage law. As late as 2004, when 11 states put measures against same-sex marriage on the ballot, Mr. Clinton privately advised John Kerry to endorse a constitutional ban, according to Newsweek's history of the campaign. Matt McKenna, Mr. Clinton's spokesman, called that account "completely false."
WASHINGTON — Being a witness to history can be messy business. And for those waiting outside the Supreme Court on Monday for one of the few coveted tickets to hear oral arguments in a pair of same-sex marriage cases this week, it was also cold, wet and tedious."Yeah, this is just not comfortable," said Taylor Carter, a 19-year-old college student who was trying to stay dry beneath a large blue tarpaulin that was barely shielding her and her 12-year-old brother and 15-year-old sister from the slushy mixture falling from the sky. "Being cold isn't so bad," she said. "But being wet and cold is the worst."A spring snowstorm that blew through the capital on Monday seemed to do little to deter an eager few dozen people from huddling under soggy sleeping bags, plastic tarpaulins and oversize umbrellas as they counted down the final hours before the arguments began on Tuesday morning (the second case was scheduled for Wednesday morning).With about 20 hours to go, some had been there since Thursday night, moved by a sense of the moment and civic purpose. Others, like the Carters, had a less sentimental reason: They were being paid to wait for someone else. "It's enough," Ms. Carter said, declining to say how much she would make.In today's real-time culture of live Web streams and up-to-the-second Twitter updates, oral arguments before the Supreme Court remain sealed off from the digital world, making tickets for the approximately 400 seats inside the courtroom precious commodities.All electronic devices are banned. The only public record of the proceedings other than a transcript is an audio recording, which the court will not release until after the arguments have concluded.The majority of the tickets are held for people with special connections, like being a member of the Supreme Court bar, a journalist or a justice's guest. A lesbian cousin of Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr.told The Los Angeles Times that she planned to attend as his guest.About 100 seats will be reserved for those who stand in line — or who pay someone to. The court's public information office said that 60 to 70 of those are reserved for people who can view the entire argument, while the rest are for people who rotate in groups to watch for three to five minutes each.Despite the miserable weather, the faithful on both sides of the same-sex marriage debate were drawing inspiration Monday from their surroundings."You've got to stand in front of your issue," said Aaron Black, 39, who came from New York with a group of same-sex marriage supporters on a bus. Pointing to the Supreme Court's columned front, Mr. Black said: "Frankly the issue is right there. On the Supreme Court building it says 'Equal Justice Under Law.' "Mr. Black and about 10 others had parked themselves in front of the Supreme Court steps on brightly colored plastic lounge chairs — orange, green, blue and pink, all with American flags attached. They had slept there overnight. Around noon, their soaking wet thermal sleeping bags were drying out in a nearby building.Donna Clarke, 62, of Mountain View, Calif., drove cross-country with her partner of nearly 30 years. She had planned to attend only a couple of gay rights rallies before the arguments. Then she heard on the radio — somewhere in Virginia, she said — that there might be a chance for people to still get seats inside. She sped the rest of the way.For Ms. Clarke, who was 37th in line, the issue at hand is one of fairness. "I'm retired military," she said. "I have all sorts of benefits for myself. I have nothing for my partner."Sitting under an umbrella about 15 feet away was Nicole Hudgens, 24. "For me, I believe that all policy is going to be a moral issue," she said as a friend she was waiting with slept under their tarp. "And my morality is based on traditional biblical values."Ms. Hudgens said that she realized that her opposition to same-sex marriage made her something of a rarity among her peers. "I do know some people who are homosexual, yes," she said, recalling a recent Facebook conversation with someone who is gay who pointed out the contradiction that she would deny gay people equal rights even as she smiled at them on the street."At the same time, I believe rights were endowed to us by our creator, and our creator has a certain definition of marriage," she said. "And I'm going to stick with that."For all their discomfort at the weather, the crowd was definitely well fed and adequately caffeinated. Several groups were passing out comfort items like plastic ponchos, pizza and coffee."The only problem," Ms. Clarke said in a whisper, "is we need a bathroom."
WASHINGTON — The struggle for African-Americans' rights, symbolized by the bloody 1965 Selma march, is as old as the nation. The effort for American women's rights began at Seneca Falls, N.Y., more than 150 years ago.The modern fight for gay rights is, by contrast, less than a half-century old, dating from the 1969 Stonewall uprising in New York. But this week, as the Supreme Court hears two landmark cases on same-sex marriage, the speed and scope of the movement are astonishing supporters."We, the people, declare today that the most evident of truths — that all of us are created equal — is the star that guides us still, just as it guided our forebears through Seneca Falls, and Selma, and Stonewall," President Obama said in his Inaugural Address in January, in a moment of history for gay men and lesbians, who were included in such a speech for the first time. "Our journey is not complete until our gay brothers and sisters are treated like anyone else under the law."The changes have been so swift that it is sometimes surprising to remember how many gay men and lesbians were until recently in the closet and how many hurdles there have been along the way. "We were all hiding," said former Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of Massachusetts, who in 1987 became the first member of Congress to voluntarily disclose his homosexuality. At the time, the public disapproval of homosexuality — so powerful that gay men and lesbians hesitated to identify themselves, much less seek political change — helped stunt the movement's emergence."This was a population too shy and fearful to even raise its hand, a group of people who had to start at zero in order to create their place in the nation's culture," Dudley Clendinen and Adam Nagourney wrote in "Out for Good," their 2001 history of the gay rights movement.In the past century in American politics, the sources of that reticence were no mystery.Judeo-Christian teachings, interpreted as condemning homosexuality, provided the backdrop for political debate in a nation more religious than others in the industrialized world. In the United States after World War II, the American Psychiatric Association lent medical and scientific credence to those views by labeling homosexuality a mental disorder.But cultural changes unleashed in the 1960s began to erode those barriers.Responding to the early stirrings in major cities like New York, Los Angeles and San Francisco, George McGovern became the first presidential candidate to identify himself with the movement by permitting openly gay speakers at the 1972 Democratic National Convention.Four years later, Jimmy Carter, a Southern Baptist from Georgia, opposed discrimination against gay men and lesbians even as he marshaled support from evangelical Christians. During his presidency, Mr. Carter's public liaison, Midge Costanza, held the first formal White House meeting with gay activists.But Mr. Carter lost in 1980 to an ascendant Republican Party that, under President Ronald Reagan, melded social and economic conservatism.Before winning the White House, Mr. Reagan stood with gay activists in helping defeat a California ballot initiative that would have barred gay men and lesbians from teaching in public schools. During his presidency, however, Mr. Reagan kept his distance. Legislation extending civil rights protections to gay men and lesbians, introduced by liberal Democrats beginning in 1974, continued to languish in Congress.The emergence of AIDS in the 1980s, however, lent the movement new energy and urgency. The epidemic propelled many closeted gay men and lesbians to begin identifying themselves publicly and raised the stakes for elected officials who were suddenly facing votes over the use of tax money to respond to a public health crisis.Lawmakers aligned with gay activists began making alliances on Capitol Hill that had been impossible on more abstract issues of gay rights."When it was purely symbolic, I couldn't get them," Mr. Frank recalled of trying to round up supporters for gay rights. "When people's lives were at stake, I'd get, 'Oh, all right, I guess I have to vote with you.' "
WASHINGTON — In the conference room at the Justice Department's august Office of Legal Counsel, portraits of Theodore B. Olson and Charles J. Cooper hang side by side. Both men headed the office under President Ronald Reagan in the 1980s, with Mr. Cooper succeeding Mr. Olson. Both went on to stellar legal careers on the conservative side of Washington's divided political universe.On Tuesday, however, they faced off before the Supreme Court on opposite sides of a historic case that could remake the American legal and social landscape. Mr. Olson argued for and Mr. Cooper argued against revising the law's definition of marriage to accommodate gay and lesbian couples. It was a confrontation that their colleagues in the conservative bar never would have predicted before 2009, when Mr. Olson shocked some friends by teaming up with David Boies, a prominent liberal, to challenge California's Proposition 8 ballot initiative outlawing same-sex marriage.The nine justices, as is customary, barraged Mr. Olson and Mr. Cooper with questions so fast and varied that neither man had a chance to show off his oratorical skills. But some lawyers who know them both said they found their encounter a tribute to legal advocacy, which even in Washington can sometimes trump party affiliation."It really made me proud to be a lawyer in the United States to see Chuck and Ted — good friends from the same political party — duking it out up there today," said Theodore J. Boutrous Jr., a lawyer with long Washington experience who is on Mr. Olson's legal team in the marriage case but has litigated alongside Mr. Cooper in the past. "This is the way to decide legal issues. It made me feel good about the court and the country."Mr. Olson has spoken of being shunned by conservative friends who felt betrayed by his public embrace of the gay marriage cause — and by his unexpected alliance with Mr. Boies, whom he opposed in the presidential showdown of Bush v. Gore in 2000.But Mr. Olson, 72, has a strong libertarian streak. When he prominently battled affirmative action, he said in 2009, he saw himself as combating the same discrimination by the government that he opposes in state bans on gay marriage. Addressing the court on Tuesday, he said that marriage is a "personal right," not "society's right," and is "part of the right of privacy, association, liberty and the pursuit of happiness."Mr. Cooper, 61, is a more traditional conservative and has described himself as an "originalist," arguing for the letter of the law and the original meaning of the Constitution. On Tuesday he argued against tampering with "this age-old bedrock social institution" of marriage.Even in the four years since the legal challenge to Proposition 8 began, the tide of public opinion has turned significantly in favor of gay marriage. More and more Republicans, following the example of former Vice President Dick Cheney, have acknowledged gay family members and said they deserve the same rights as heterosexuals. Many young conservatives, like their peers on the left, take as a given the right of gays and lesbians to marry.In fact, arguing the same case in 2009 before the United States District Court in San Francisco, when Judge Vaughn R. Walker asked Mr. Cooper what harm would be done were gay men and lesbians allowed to marry, Mr. Cooper responded, "Your Honor, my answer is: I don't know. I don't know." Perhaps with those shifting public mores in mind, Mr. Cooper chose on Tuesday not to make a frontal assault on gay unions, modestly arguing instead that the court should not pre-empt what he called "an earnest debate" over the proper limits of marriage.Mr. Olson evidently thought he could afford to be more direct. When Justice Antonin Scalia asked when, exactly, it became unconstitutional to exclude gay men and lesbians from marriage, Mr. Olson's reply was not deferential. "May I answer this in the form of a rhetorical question?" he asked. "When did it become unconstitutional to prohibit interracial marriages? When did it become unconstitutional to assign children to separate schools?"Born in Chicago, Mr. Olson grew up in the San Francisco Bay Area and went to Boalt Hall law school at the University of California, Berkeley. He made partner in a Los Angeles law firm before joining the Reagan administration's Justice Department and has long been a leader in the conservative Federalist Society. Among many notable clients was Jonathan Jay Pollard, who was convicted of selling secrets to Israel and sentenced to life in prison in 1987.As the solicitor general for President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2004, Mr. Olson often defended that administration's sweeping assertions of power to take on terrorism. He was himself poignantly associated with the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks. His wife, Barbara, a lawyer and outspoken conservative television commentator, called her husband twice from the hijacked American Airlines Flight 77 before it hit the Pentagon. (In 2006, he married Lady Booth, a tax lawyer and lifelong Democrat.)Mr. Cooper, born in Dayton, Ohio, attended law school at the University of Alabama and was a law clerk to Justice William H. Rehnquist, later the chief justice. He worked in the Reagan Justice Department's civil rights division before succeeding Mr. Olson as the assistant attorney general in charge of the Office of Legal Counsel, the powerful arbiter of the government's interpretation of the law.He was a partner in two Washington firms before founding his current firm, Cooper & Kirk. He represented Duke University lacrosse players falsely accused of rape and their teammates in a lawsuit against Duke and the City of Durham, N.C.Mr. Cooper has generally maintained a lower profile than Mr. Olson. While he has played to the public in some high-profile cases, including the Duke lawsuit, he has routinely turned down interview requests about the marriage case. Colleagues describe him as a meticulous, cautious lawyer with a formal style.Back in 1987, when he testified to Congress on the Iran-contra scandal, the columnist Mary McGrory wrote in The Washington Post, "Cooper speaks in a kind of Victorian copybook prose, ever seeking the elegant variation for the blunt."In his argument on Tuesday, the cautious lawyer in effect urged caution on the court.Addressing Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, Mr. Cooper said that it would "hardly be irrational" for a California voter to conclude that same-sex marriage is so new and untested that the state should "hit the pause button and await additional information from the jurisdictions where this experiment is still maturing."
COLUMBIA, S.C. — Most United States Supreme Court cases, however significant, pass largely unnoticed when they are argued. But the opening of hearings over the legal definition of marriage was a cultural moment that brought America to its front porch.From small prayer vigils in San Diego to rallies in Boston, from Passover Seders to spiritual fasts, the weight of the decision that the nine justices will make was felt in thousands of communities far from Washington.Here in a state where sodomy was a felony until 2003 and where 78 percent of voters approved a constitutional ban on same-sex marriage three years later, about 300 people gathered under a Confederate flag that flies at the State Capitol.Like some others in rallies across the country, they were united in a belief that the cases could lead to profound, positive changes in the way gay men and lesbians are treated under the law.Deanne Summer, 54, was one of them. She grew up here, and said she wished more of her gay friends could have shown up for the rally. They were too scared to come, she said."I didn't think I'd live to see this," she said. "But even if they legalize it doesn't mean people will accept it."At the same time, others gathered to pray and march in defense of an institution that they believe should be shared only between a man and a woman."The views on marriage are not changing," said Dran Reese, the president of the Salt and Light Council, a Christian group north of San Diego that opposes same-sex marriage. She was at a rally at the San Diego courthouse, praying that the Supreme Court would uphold what has been the traditional definition of marriage."The other side, they have a little more time and a lot more money," she said. "That's an unfortunate position for us as people of faith."The sheer number of people who stepped forward this week to express their opinions spoke to the personal significance of the issue in a nation that has not been so publicly divided on a social matter since the court ruled on abortion 40 years ago or, perhaps, since the battle over racial civil rights before that."Folks are coming out either in support or opposition because this is one of the great civil rights issues of our time," said the Rev. Angela Yarber, pastor at Wake Forest Baptist Church in Winston-Salem, N.C.On Monday night, she led a prayer service for a group of about 200 people who hope the Supreme Court rules in favor of same-sex marriage.The same night, blessings were given in support of same-sex marriage at a Passover Seder in Hamden, Conn. At a Chinese Baptist Church in Houston, a special call was issued, urging the court to uphold the Defense of Marriage Act and California's Proposition 8, which limit marriage to a union between a man and a woman.The topic dominated social media platforms from the moment people woke up Tuesday."Good marriage equality morning!" a New York lawyer who uses "amaeryllis" as her Twitter name greeted her nearly 15,000 followers."Please remember to #pray today as #SCOTUS deliberates these very important marriage cases," read the first Twitter message of the day from the North Carolina Values Coalition.Holy Covenant United Methodist Church in Chicago, a small congregation where vegetarian dinners for the homeless are a weekly event, organized a virtual vigil. People were encouraged to take a moment at noon Tuesday to pray for "a pivotal opportunity for far-reaching, lasting change for L.G.B.T.Q. people and their partners."Late Tuesday afternoon, a knot of mellow demonstrators with signs and rainbow flags ruffling in the warm breeze gathered on the steps of the California state office complex in San Francisco. As sea gulls called overhead, they played a mix of songs with lyrics that included, "Don't tell me who to kiss.""This is our time," said Breana Hansen, 27, a graduate student in international and multicultural education. "We want to show the Supreme Court all the people who are going to be affected if they uphold Propostion 8. We're being heard."Billy Ray Bradford, who organized the demonstration, said: "Our lives are in the hands of nine people in Washington. They hold our relationships, our families and future. They get to make the call on whether our Constitution means what it says, equal protection under the law."A number of those at the vigil said they were not happy about comments made in court Tuesday by Justice Antonin Scalia, who asked, "When did it become unconstitutional to exclude homosexual couples from marriage?" Kirk Linn-DeGrassi, a dog walker, answered, "The right for marriage equality became a civil right when we signed the Constitution."
WASHINGTON — As the Supreme Court on Tuesday weighed the momentous question of whether gay and lesbian couples have a constitutional right to marry, six justices questioned whether the case, arising from a California ban on same-sex marriages , was properly before the court and indicated that they might vote to dismiss it."I just wonder if the case was properly granted," said Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, who probably holds the decisive vote, in a comment that showed a court torn over whether this was the right time and right case for a decision on a fast-moving social issue.Justice Sonia Sotomayor seemed to share that concern. "If the issue is letting the states experiment and letting the society have more time to figure out its direction," she said, "why is taking a case now the answer?"Those justices and others seemed driven to that conclusion by an argument in which no attractive middle ground emerged on the substance of the question before them: whether voters in California were entitled to enact Proposition 8, which overturned a State Supreme Court decision allowing same-sex marriage.Justices who appeared sympathetic to same-sex marriage indicated that there was no principled way to issue a ruling that could apply only in California or only in the nine states that have robust civil union or domestic partnership laws but withhold the word "marriage."That appeared to leave the court with an all-or-nothing choice on the merits: either a ruling that would require same-sex marriage in all 50 states or one that would say that all states may do as they wish. Neither choice seemed attractive to a majority of the justices.Five members of the court asked questions indicating that they might vote to dismiss the case on the threshold issue that supporters of Proposition 8 lacked standing to appeal a lower court's decision. Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr., whose questions on the merits indicated discomfort with requiring states to allow same-sex marriage, seemed particularly interested in the standing issue.Justice Kennedy seemed more open to the possibility that the proponents of Proposition 8 had standing, but he twice asked lawyers why the court should not dismiss the case outright. When the justices have second thoughts about agreeing to hear a case, they sometimes dismiss it as "improvidently granted."Questions from the justices do not always reliably forecast votes, of course, and many of the justices also indicated their views of the central issue presented in the case.When Justice Kennedy turned to the merits of the case, he voiced sympathy for the children of gay couples. "There are some 40,000 children in California," he said, who "live with same-sex parents, and they want their parents to have full recognition and full status. The voice of those children is important in this case."But Justice Kennedy said he was uncertain about the consequences for society of allowing same-sex marriage. "We have five years of information to weigh against 2,000 years of history or more," he said, referring to the long history of traditional marriage and the brief experience of allowing gay men and lesbians to marry in some states.Justice Samuel A. Alito Jr. echoed the thought and said the court should not move too fast. "You want us to step in and render a decision based on an assessment of the effects of this institution, which is newer than cellphones or the Internet?" he said.Many of the questions directed to Charles J. Cooper, a lawyer for opponents of same-sex marriage, concerned whether there was any good reason to exclude same-sex couples from the institution.Mr. Cooper counseled caution. "It is an agonizingly difficult, for many people, political question," he said. "We would submit to you that that question is properly decided by the people themselves."Justice Elena Kagan asked him how letting gay couples marry harmed traditional marriages. "How does this cause and effect work?" she asked.Mr. Cooper responded that "it will refocus the purpose of marriage and the definition of marriage away from the raising of children and to the emotional needs and desires of adults, of adult couples." The key to marriage, he said, is procreation.That did not seem to satisfy several of the justices.Justice Stephen G. Breyer asked Mr. Cooper about sterile opposite-sex couples. "There are lots of people who get married who can't have children," he said.
WASHINGTON — When Edith Windsor and her girlfriend got engaged in 1967, she was too nervous about how to answer the inevitable "Who is he?" queries to wear an engagement ring. So they compromised on a ring-shaped diamond brooch instead.As Ms. Windsor stood on the steps of the Supreme Court on Wednesday, wearing that same brooch on her lapel, she marveled at the fact that someone who was once so afraid of saying that she was a lesbian had become the central figure in the case that could strike down the law forbidding federal recognition of marriages like the one she and her partner, who is now deceased, entered into in 2007.Now 83, she has difficulty walking and hearing. "I'm half deaf," she said with a self-deprecating smile when asked by reporters what she made of the oral arguments in her case. She could barely see over the microphones.But age has not dulled her wit, nor muted her appreciation of the moment she found herself in on Wednesday."Hi. I'm Edie Windsor, and somebody wrote me a large speech which I'm not going to make," she said, clutching a white sheaf of paper with large-type writing on it. "I am today an out lesbian, O.K., who just sued the United States of America, which is kind of overwhelming for me."She went on to explain her case, and how when her wife, Thea Clara Spyer, died four years ago it not only left her hospitalized with what she diagnosed as a broken heart, but with a sizable estate tax bill that she would not have paid if Thea were, in her words, Theo.Even though they were married for only the final two years of their 40-year relationship, she said something intangible but unmistakable changed after they were married. "For anybody who doesn't understand why we want it and why we need it," she said, "it is magic."There were points during the news conference when she strained to hear the questions. Her lawyers often had to repeat them two or three times before she could answer. But there was one question that she heard immediately. Why are more people beginning to accept gay marriage?"As we increasingly came out, people saw that we didn't have horns. People learned that, O.K., we were their kids and their cousins" and their friends, she said. "It just grew to where we were human beings like everybody else."As the shouts of "Edie! Edie!" from the crowd at the foot of the steps grew louder, she politely excused herself. "There are a lot of people who came here to see me, and I'm just going to go see them," she said.
PORTLAND, Me. — Most Americans have never heard of Mary Bonauto. But inside the tightknit world of gay legal advocacy, Ms. Bonauto is a quiet celebrity — a lawyer and mother of twins who some say is almost single-handedly responsible for the same-sex marriage cases now pending before the Supreme Court."No gay person in this country would be married without Mary Bonauto," said Roberta Kaplan, who went before the justices on Wednesday to argue one of the cases.As the top civil rights lawyer for Gay and Lesbian Advocates and Defenders, or GLAD, based in Boston, Ms. Bonauto has spent more than a decade plotting a careful strategy to advance gay marriage rights. She prompted Vermont to create civil unions in 2000, won the 2003 case that made Massachusetts the first state to legalize same-sex marriage and last year persuaded a federal appeals court that the Defense of Marriage Act, which denies federal benefits to gay couples, is unconstitutional.Yet in a quirk of fate, Ms. Bonauto watched her life's work this week from the court's spectator seats.The justices considered a Defense of Marriage Act case on Wednesday, but it was not Ms. Bonauto's, which she argued and won before the federal appeals court in Boston but which Justice Elena Kagan has acknowledged discussing when she was President Obama's solicitor general. Instead the court took up a similar case, Ms. Kaplan's from New York, presumably so Justice Kagan would not have to recuse herself."Am I disappointed?" Ms. Bonauto asked last week in her home here. "There is an element of disappointment, but I'm also incredibly excited. I feel like after all these years, you're getting a hearing — a fair hearing — from the highest court in the land."At 51, Ms. Bonauto is serious and unassuming. "She is not going to set a room on fire," said Dean Hara, a plaintiff in Ms. Bonauto's Defense of Marriage Act case. "But when she is arguing, she is really somebody to listen to."Even her opponents offer kind words, saying they appreciate her civil tone."She has always been the consummate professional, very courteous and gentle," said Kris Mineau of the Massachusetts Family Institute, even as he said her courtroom victories had "degraded the value of marriage."Ms. Bonauto works mostly from her home in this seaport city, where she and her wife, Professor Jennifer Wriggins of the University of Maine's law school, are raising their 11-year-old twin daughters. Last year, the couple made the list of "The Most Powerful Lesbian Moms in America," published by the Web site mombian.com. But Ms. Bonauto is too busy juggling legal briefs, homework and piano lessons to see herself as a woman making history."That's not how we experience our lives," she said.Ms. Bonauto would be the first to say she builds on the work of others. As early as the 1970s, gay couples began suing for the right to marry, inspired by the 1967 Supreme Court ruling in Loving v. Virginia, which struck down state laws banning interracial marriage. In 1983, a young Harvard law student named Evan Wolfson wrote his third-year thesis on why gays should be free to marry.Mr. Wolfson was eventually hired by Lambda Legal, the gay advocacy group, where he joined what he called "a very small little network of people who at that time were dedicated to toppling the so-called sodomy laws" that criminalized homosexual sex. Among them was Ms. Bonauto.The daughter of a pharmacist and a preschool teacher from Newburgh, N.Y., she had come out, with some difficulty, while an undergraduate at Hamilton College. There, Ms. Bonauto was harassed over her sexual orientation, which she said contributed to her desire to "make life better" for others.By 1990, with a law degree from Northeastern University, she was working for GLAD in Boston. She had been there less than a week when a gay couple approached her with the idea of suing to get married. She said no, the timing was not right."I would have cases of somebody who goes to a Dunkin' Donuts and the wait person realizes it was a gay person and goes nuts," Ms. Bonauto recalled. How could she pursue a seeming luxury like marriage, she reasoned, when gay people were being discriminated against in housing, employment and adoption and being harassed by the police?In 1991, a Honolulu lawyer, Dan Foley, did what Ms. Bonauto had declined to do and sued on behalf of three same-sex couples denied marriage licenses. The case prompted intense discussion in gay legal circles, recalled Mr. Wolfson, who later became Mr. Foley's co-counsel and has since founded Freedom to Marry, a national advocacy group. Some, he said, thought marriage was "patriarchal and exclusionary," while others said the gay rights movement "was supposed to be about liberation," not joining heterosexuals. Still others, like Ms. Bonauto, worried that the legal foundation had not been laid and that a loss could lead to a gay rights setback.She was right to worry; Hawaii voters eventually amended their Constitution to allow a ban on same-sex marriage, much as California would. So the advocates opened up what Mr. Wolfson called "a second front" in Vermont — in part, he said, because the legal and constitutional climate was more hospitable there, and in part "because we had a really terrific talent in Mary."Vermont's decision to create civil unions did not entirely please Ms. Bonauto, who saw them as a "separate system" for gay people. Of all her legal victories, the 2003 Massachusetts case sticks with her. She still remembers clutching the Supreme Judicial Court's ruling, and can still recite its first paragraph, including the declaration that the Massachusetts Constitution "forbids the creation of second-class citizens."Once she had established a right to marriage, Ms. Bonauto went after the Defense of Marriage Act, which denied legally married gay couples the federal benefits that straight couples could have. Barney Frank, the former Massachusetts congressman, who is openly gay, said the move had sealed Ms. Bonauto's reputation as a "first-rate lawyer and a first-rate strategist" who built on one victory after another."She's our Thurgood Marshall," he said, referring to the Supreme Court justice who made history fighting racial discrimination.Ms. Bonauto was at first skeptical of the other gay marriage case before the court, the challenge to Proposition 8, California's ban on same-sex marriage. She feared the court was not ready to grant gay couples a broad constitutional right to marry. But public opinion has shifted so drastically since the case was filed in 2009, Ms. Bonauto said last week, she now believes the justices can find a way to "issue a marriage decision that the country would embrace." She has witnessed that shift at home; last year, Maine became the first state where voters approved same-sex marriage, reversing a decision from 2009."The things that scared people three years ago don't scare people now," Ms. Bonauto said.In the run-up to Wednesday's hearing, Ms. Bonauto focused on helping Ms. Kaplan prepare. She coordinated "friend of the court" amicus briefs, and she arrived in Washington early to participate in moot court briefings.Ms. Kaplan said it "makes me crazy" that people do not know Ms. Bonauto's work. Like Mr. Frank, she drew an analogy to Justice Marshall."She conceived of a strategy just like him, over a long number of years, and then implemented it," Ms. Kaplan said. "It was strategically brilliant, and she succeeded. No one else can say that."
DOMA Case Goes Before Supreme Court: The Times's John Schwartz dissects the questions posed in the case against the Defense of Marriage Act.WASHINGTON — The Supreme Court appeared ready on Wednesday to strike down a central part of a federal law that defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman, as a majority of the justices expressed reservations about the Defense of Marriage Act.On the second day of intense arguments over the volatile issue of same-sex marriage, Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, who most likely holds the decisive vote, returned again and again to the theme that deciding who is married is a matter for the states. The federal government, he said, should respect "the historic commitment of marriage, and of questions of the rights of children, to the states."That suggests that he is prepared to vote with the court's four liberal members to strike down the part of the 1996 law that recognizes only the marriages of opposite-sex couples for more than 1,000 federal laws and programs. Such a ruling would deliver federal benefits to married same-sex couples in the nine states, and the District of Columbia, that allow such unions.If the 1996 law stands, Justice Kennedy said, "you are at real risk with running in conflict with what has always been thought to be the essence" of state power, which he said was to regulate marriage, divorce and custody.All four members of the court's liberal wing questioned the constitutionality of the law, though they largely focused on equal protection principles rather than on the limits of federal power.Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, for instance, said the law effectively created "two kinds of marriage: the full marriage, and then this sort of skim milk marriage."Paul D. Clement, who served as solicitor general under President George W. Bush and is defending the law on behalf of House Republicans, argued that the federal government was entitled to use a uniform definition of marriage across the nation.Mr. Clement said countless laws over time had been enacted with the traditional definition of marriage in mind. When Congress approved the 1996 law, he said, it was worried that if one state extended the definition to include same-sex couples, those laws would effectively be changed."What Congress says is, 'Wait a minute,' " Mr. Clement said of what had happened in 1996. " 'Let's take a timeout here. This is a redefinition of an age-old institution.' "Justice Elena Kagan said there was something else at work."Do we really think that Congress was doing this for uniformity reasons, or do we think that Congress's judgment was infected by dislike, by fear, by animus and so forth?" she asked.She read a passage from the House record at the time that said the law had been animated by a "collective moral judgment" to "express moral disapproval of homosexuality."Mr. Clement responded: "Of course, the House report says that. And if that's enough to invalidate the statute, then you should invalidate the statute. But that has never been your approach.""Just because a couple legislators may have had an improper motive" is irrelevant, Mr. Clement said, adding that the usual question for the court was simply whether the challenged law was supported by a rational justification.Solicitor General Donald B. Verrilli Jr. said the 1996 law is deeply unfair and means, for instance, "that the spouse of a soldier killed in the line of duty cannot receive the dignity and solace of an official notification of next of kin."The arguments came a day after the court heard a challenge to California's Proposition 8, which bans same-sex marriages. That argument was murky and muddled, and many of the justices' questions suggested they were looking for a way to duck the central issue.By comparison, Wednesday's case was modest, and the arguments were clear. The court heard a preliminary 50-minute session on whether it had jurisdiction to hear the case, but those issues did not seem to threaten to send the case off the rails.The court appointed Vicki C. Jackson, a law professor at Harvard, to argue a position not fully supported by any party: that the case's odd procedural posture meant the court lacks jurisdiction.
WASHINGTON – The Supreme Court is scheduled to hear almost two hours of arguments on Wednesday morning over the constitutionality of a part of the federal Defense of Marriage Act of 1996. Here is a look at the background of the case, United States v. Windsor, No. 12-307; the issues it raises; the lawyers who will argue it; and the possible outcomes.What is at stake? The case concerns the part of the law that defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman for purposes of federal benefits. Should the court strike it down, same-sex couples in the nine states that allow such unions, along with the District of Columbia, would start to receive federal benefits. Such a ruling would not require other states to allow same-sex marriage. (That question is before the court in the case argued on Tuesday, about Proposition 8, California's ban on same-sex marriage.) Nor does the case concern a different part of the 1996 law that allows states to refuse to recognize same-sex marriages from other states.How did the case start? The case concerns two New York City women, Edith Windsor and Thea Clara Spyer, who married in 2007 in Canada. Ms. Spyer died in 2009, and Ms. Windsor inherited her property. The 1996 law did not allow the Internal Revenue Service to treat Ms. Windsor as a surviving spouse, and she faced a tax bill of about $360,000 that a spouse in an opposite-sex marriage would not have had to pay. Ms. Windsor sued, and in October the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, in New York, struck down the 1996 law.What is the Obama administration's position? Until 2011, the Justice Department defended the law in court, as it typically does all acts of Congress. That year, Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. announced that he and President Obama had concluded that the law was unconstitutional and unworthy of defense in court, though he added that the administration would continue to enforce the law. After the Justice Department stepped aside, House Republicans intervened to defend the law. Although the administration's position prevailed in the lower courts, the Justice Department filed an appeal to the Supreme Court, saying the final decision should come from the highest court.How long will the arguments last? The arguments are scheduled for 1 hour and 50 minutes. They will probably start around 10:15, after one or more of the justices summarize decisions released that day. In major cases, Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. typically allows lawyers a little extra time, so the arguments may not conclude until 12:30 or so. Transcripts and audio recordings will be available by about 2 p.m.Who is arguing? Strictly speaking, there are two arguments, one on jurisdictional questions and one on the merits. The first is scheduled to last 50 minutes, the second an hour.Vicki C. Jackson, a law professor appointed by the court to argue that it lacks jurisdiction to hear the case, will go first, for 20 minutes. Deputy Solicitor General Sri Srinivasan will go next, for 15 minutes, to argue that the federal government has standing to appeal but that House Republicans do not. Then Paul D. Clement will argue the opposite for 15 minutes on behalf of House Republicans.In the second argument, Mr. Clement will defend the constitutionality of the 1996 law for 30 minutes. Solicitor General Donald B. Verrilli Jr. and a lawyer for Ms. Windsor, Roberta A. Kaplan, will spend 15 minutes each urging the justices to strike down the law.What legal standard will the Supreme Court use? In ordinary cases, courts considering whether a federal law violates equal protection principles merely ask whether the law can be justified by a rational reason. That is a low bar, though the federal appeals court in Boston struck down the 1996 law under a version of it. In the case before the court, the federal appeals court in New York used a more robust standard of review, "heightened scrutiny," which requires a showing that the challenged law is "substantially related to an important government objective." Gay rights advocates are hoping the Supreme Court embraces that more protective standard to judge laws that discriminate on the basis of sexual orientation.What are the possible outcomes? The court may uphold the law, meaning that gay and lesbian couples married in states that allow such unions would continue to be denied federal benefits. It could strike down the law, delivering federal benefits to such couples. A third but unlikely option would be for the court to say it is powerless to decide the issue. That would, as a practical matter, probably mean that the Obama administration, relying on decisions from the two federal appeals courts, would stop enforcing the law.
WASHINGTON — When Edith Windsor and her girlfriend got engaged in 1967, she was too nervous about how to answer the inevitable "Who is he?" queries to wear an engagement ring. So they compromised on a ring-shaped diamond brooch instead.As Ms. Windsor stood on the steps of the Supreme Court on Wednesday, wearing that same brooch on her lapel, she marveled at the fact that someone who was once so afraid of saying that she was a lesbian had become the central figure in the case that could strike down the law forbidding federal recognition of marriages like the one she and her partner, who is now deceased, entered into in 2007.Now 83, she has difficulty walking and hearing. "I'm half deaf," she said with a self-deprecating smile when asked by reporters what she made of the oral arguments in her case. She could barely see over the microphones.But age has not dulled her wit, nor muted her appreciation of the moment she found herself in on Wednesday."Hi. I'm Edie Windsor, and somebody wrote me a large speech which I'm not going to make," she said, clutching a white sheaf of paper with large-type writing on it. "I am today an out lesbian, O.K., who just sued the United States of America, which is kind of overwhelming for me."She went on to explain her case, and how when her wife, Thea Spyer, died four years ago it not only left her hospitalized with what she diagnosed as a broken heart, but with a sizable estate tax bill that she would not have paid if Thea were, in her words, Theo.Even though they were married for only the final two years of their 40-year relationship, she said something intangible but unmistakable changed after they were married. "For anybody who doesn't understand why we want it and why we need it," she said, "It is magic."There were points during the news conference when she strained to hear the questions. Her lawyers often had to repeat them two or three times before she could answer. But there was one question that she heard immediately. Why are more people beginning to accept gay marriage?"As we increasingly came out, people saw that we didn't have horns. People learned that, O.K., we were their kids and their cousins" and their friends, she said. "It just grew to where we were human beings like everybody else."As the shouts of "Edie! Edie!" from the crowd at the foot of the steps grew louder, she politely excused herself. "There are a lot of people who came here to see me, and I'm just going to go see them," she said.
WASHINGTON — When President Obama decided that his administration would no longer defend the Defense of Marriage Act in court, he was presented with an obvious question with a less obvious answer: Would he keep enforcing a law he now deemed unconstitutional?A debate in the White House broke out. Some of his political advisers thought it made no sense to apply an invalid law. But his lawyers told Mr. Obama he had a constitutional duty to comply until the Supreme Court ruled otherwise. Providing federal benefits to same-sex couples in defiance of the law, they argued, would provoke a furor in the Republican House and theoretically even risk articles of impeachment.Two years later, that decision has taken on new prominence after Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. accused Mr. Obama from the bench on Wednesday of not having "the courage of his convictions" for continuing to enforce the marriage law even after concluding that it violated constitutional equal protection guarantees. The chief justice's needling touched a raw nerve at the White House. "Continuing to enforce was a difficult political decision," said an aide who asked not to be identified discussing internal deliberations, "but the president felt like it was the right legal choice."Other presidents have enforced laws that they no longer defended in court, including the first George Bush, whose acting solicitor general, a man named John Roberts, once asked the Supreme Court to overturn an affirmative action program at the Federal Communications Commission.But the fuss this week underscored the awkward balancing act for Mr. Obama, whose administration refused to refund federal estate taxes to an 83-year-old lesbian even though he thought it was wrong not to."I'm sure there are people in our community who would agree with the chief justice that the president should go farther and not enforce" it, said one leader in the fight for same-sex marriage, who declined to be named while the case was pending. But leaders in the fight came to accept the decision "because without enforcement, there's no means to challenge the law" in court.The decision to repudiate the Defense of Marriage Act came two years into Mr. Obama's term. Although the Justice Department had defended it in the past, the courts were being asked to examine the law for discrimination under a tougher standard.Some at the Justice Department argued that the administration should continue to defend the law. But Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. decided the law did not meet the higher standard. He talked the issue through with Mr. Obama, who once taught constitutional law at the University of Chicago, and the president agreed. They would no longer defend the law against court challenges.But administration lawyers researched the matter and concluded that the president should still enforce it while the courts deliberated. Even then, not every lawyer agreed. One Justice Department lawyer thought the administration should refuse to enforce the law as well.The question comes down to the president's obligation under Article II of the Constitution to "take care that the laws be faithfully executed." The meaning of that phrase has been debated at least since 1860, when the attorney general at the time concluded that the president could disregard a law purporting to appoint a government officer because it was unconstitutional.The debate played out into the next century. After President Woodrow Wilson refused to comply with a law preventing him from removing postmasters without Senate approval, the Supreme Court struck down the statute in 1926 as an encroachment on executive power in a case that was seen as implicitly agreeing that a president is not required to execute unconstitutional laws.A 1977 opinion by the Justice Department's Office of Legal Counsel under President Jimmy Carter concluded that a president could ignore a statute he considered unconstitutional, depending on the circumstances. A memorandum by the same office in 1994 said the president could do so when the law tried to improperly limit executive power or when it was "probable that the Court would agree with him."But when a reasonable argument could be made on the other side, lawyers said, the president should still comply until the courts rendered a definitive verdict. That was what President Bill Clinton did in refusing to defend in court a 1996 law expelling all H.I.V.-positive soldiers from the military even as he said he would enforce it. Congress ultimately repealed the law.Mr. Obama's lawyers leaned on that precedent in 2011 as they made their determination on the Defense of Marriage Act.
WASHINGTON — Why did the Supreme Court agree in December to hear a major same-sex marriage case and then seem to think it had made a terrible mistake on Tuesday when it came time for arguments?The answer lies in the gap between two numbers. It takes four votes to hear a case and five to decide one.If nothing else, this week's arguments provided a telling glimpse into the process through which the court selects its docket, one that is usually shrouded in exceptional secrecy. The arguments also cleared up most of the mystery of whose idea it had been to hear the case, a challenge to Proposition 8, California's ban on same-sex marriage.As it turns out, it would seem that the conservative members of the court, making a calculation that their chances of winning would not improve with time, were behind the decision to take up the volatile subject.The aha moment came on Tuesday.After Justice Anthony M. Kennedy suggested that the court should dismiss the case, Justice Antonin Scalia tipped his hand."It's too late for that now, isn't it?" he said, a note of glee in his voice."We have crossed that river," he said.That was a signal that it was a conservative grant.To see why, it will help to review the bidding. When the justices gathered for their private conference on Dec. 7, they had many choices.For starters, it was virtually certain that they would agree to hear one of several challenges to the federal Defense of Marriage Act of 1996. Two federal appeals courts had struck it down, and the court almost always reviews decisions from lower courts invalidating federal laws.The question there, moreover, was the relatively modest one of whether the federal government must provide benefits to same-sex couples married in states that allow such unions. The case did not directly concern whether there is a right to same-sex marriage in other states.So the justices chose one case on the 1996 law, United States v. Windsor, No. 12-307.They then confronted a second, much more ambitious case, Hollingsworth v. Perry, No. 12-144, concerning whether the Constitution guarantees a right to same-sex marriage. Most observers thought the court would hold the case while it worked through one on the 1996 law, and some thought it might deny review, letting stand an appeals court decision that had struck down Proposition 8.Instead, the court granted review in the case. That was a surprise and a puzzle. Who had voted to hear it?One school of thought was that the court's four liberals were ready to try to capture Justice Kennedy's decisive vote to establish a right to same-sex marriage around the nation.That theory was demolished in the courtroom as one liberal justice after another sought to find a way to avoid providing an answer to the central question in the case. The decision to hear the case, it turned out, had come from the other side.Justice Scalia, almost certainly joined by Justices Clarence Thomas and Samuel A. Alito Jr., apparently made a twofold calculation: that their odds of winning would not improve as same-sex marriage grows more popular and more commonplace, and that Justice Kennedy, who is likely to write the decision in the case concerning the 1996 law, would lock himself into rhetoric and logic that would compel him to vote for a constitutional right to same-sex marriage in a later case.It is not that the conservatives felt certain they would win. It is that their chances would not improve in the years ahead.That leaves the question of the fourth vote. The most likely answer is that it was that of Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr., though he did not sound at all pleased on Tuesday to have the case before him.There is also a chance that the fourth vote came from Justice Kennedy himself, and his very questioning provides support for that theory."I just wonder," he said, sounding a little plaintive and a little angry, "if the case was properly granted."According to "Supreme Court Practice," the leading manual on Supreme Court procedure, it is bad form for a justice who voted to deny a petition to thwart a decision on the merits."The reason strikes deep," Justice William O. Douglas explained in 1952. "If four can grant and the opposing five dismiss, then the four cannot get a decision of the case on the merits."
WASHINGTON — As Republican politicians wrestle with same-sex marriage , the daughter of a party icon — former President Ronald Reagan — said in an interview this week that she believes her father would have "been puzzled" by the political fuss and would have supported marriage for gay people.Patti Davis, a Los Angeles writer and the onetime rebellious daughter of Reagan and his second wife, Nancy, said in a telephone interview that she never discussed same-sex marriage with the former president, who died in 2004 just as it was emerging as a political issue.But Ms. Davis, now 60, offered several reasons her father, who would have been 102 this year, would have bucked his party on the issue: his distaste for government intrusion into private lives, his Hollywood acting career and close friendship with a lesbian couple who once cared for Ms. Davis and her younger brother Ron while their parents were on a Hawaiian vacation — and slept in the Reagans' king-size bed."I grew up in this era where your parents' friends were all called aunt and uncle," Ms. Davis said. "And then I had an aunt and an aunt. We saw them on holidays and other times." She added, "We never talked about it, but I just understood that they were a couple."Once when she and her father were watching a Rock Hudson movie, Ms. Davis said, she remarked that the actor "looked weird" kissing his female co-star. She said her father explained that Mr. Hudson "would rather be kissing a man," and conveyed, without using the words homosexual or gay, the idea that "some men are born wanting to love another man." Years later, in 1985, Mr. Hudson died of AIDS.Ms. Davis, a former actress who has made news over the years by posing nude in Playboy and, more recently, the magazine More, has just self-published a novel, "Till Human Voices Wake Us," about sisters-in-law who fall in love and leave their husbands. (She said it was not autobiographical.)She first shared her views about her father with a friend, Howard Bragman, who has a YouTube show devoted to gay issues and interviewed her about her book.Ms. Davis is not the only Reagan child speaking out on same-sex marriage. Michael E. Reagan, a conservative commentator and son of the former president and his first wife, Jane Wyman, recently wrote an opinion piece accusing churches of "wimping out" by not fighting harder to block same-sex marriage.But the younger Mr. Reagan did not address his father's views, and Ms. Davis said she would not "get into a family feud" with her half-brother.Mr. Reagan had a mixed record on gay rights. As president, he infuriated many gay people with his slow response to the AIDS epidemic, but as a former governor of California he joined a number of Democrats, including President Jimmy Carter, in opposing a ballot measure that would have barred gays and lesbians from working in public schools.Ms. Davis said her father "did not believe that gayness was a choice," although "as a straight man and an old-fashioned man, it's not like he understood it."Ms. Davis's comments are certain to inflame conservative admirers of her father.Phyllis Schlafly, a conservative activist and gay rights opponent, said in an interview that Mr. Reagan — who as governor signed the nation's first "no-fault" divorce law and later told his son Michael it was his "greatest regret" — would never have stood for same-sex marriage."Of course, Reagan did associate with all the Hollywood crowd, and chances are he probably knew a number of gays," Ms. Schlafly said. "I could understand that he might not have wanted to bar them from a job but that would not mean he would want them to get a marriage license."Ms. Davis said she expects conservative discontent with her, adding, "All I know is the heart of the man who raised me as my father."
CINCINNATI — No one heckled Senator Rob Portman during his first appearance before thousands of Ohioans since becoming the most prominent elected Republican in the country to endorse same-sex marriage ."Wouldn't you say," he said, turning to his wife, Jane, after marching in an opening day parade for the Cincinnati Reds on Monday,  "that most of the comments were thank yous and thumbs up and 'You did the right thing'?"True, but for some of the Ohioans who acknowledged Mr. Portman, doubts flickered below the surface. "Senator!" said one spectator, Pete Kidnocker, reaching out to shake Mr. Portman's hand. But after Mr. Portman passed, Mr. Kidnocker said he would vote for an alternative in a Republican primary and accused the senator of "betraying his principles.""If you're a Christian and you believe in those principles, whether your son or daughter is a homosexual, you can't change your principles," he said.Mr. Portman's reversal of his long-held opposition to same-sex marriage — he said it was spurred by a son's disclosure that he is gay — has intensified and quickened debate over the issue here in his home state. Though his shift has been welcomed by gay rights advocates as an example of how a family's love can change minds, social conservatives have denounced Mr. Portman and vowed to block his re-election."I totally respect their point of view," Mr. Portman said of his opponents. "I held it until not too long ago."One impact of Mr. Portman's change of heart has been to fuel a movement seeking the repeal of a constitutional amendment in Ohio that bans same-sex marriage, according to the group leading the effort, FreedomOhio.Requests to download petitions from the group's Web site more than doubled overnight, to 50 a day, after Mr. Portman's announcement, said Ian James, a co-founder of FreedomOhio. "His endorsement of freedom to marry, I would submit, has done more than any politician other than Barack Obama," Mr. James said.He said volunteers would easily gather the 385,000 signatures needed to qualify for the state ballot this November, but the group might delay a vote until 2014 to raise money in anticipation of a fierce public fight.On the other side, Phil Burress, president of Citizens for Community Values, said that he would now oppose Mr. Portman's re-election "tooth and nail," and that without the support of the 40 percent of evangelical voters in the Republican base, Mr. Portman, who will be a candidate again in 2016, "cannot win, he will not win."Mr. Burress, a longtime supporter of Mr. Portman, said the senator called him the night before he went public on March 15 and said, "I have some bad news.""I thought he was talking father to father with me," said Mr. Burress, who supports discredited therapies aimed at changing sexual orientation. "I spent four and a half years on the board of an organization that helped people walk away from homosexuality. It is not innate; you're not born that way.""That devastated me, that he embraced his son's behavior."In a column in The Columbus Dispatch announcing his change of view, Mr. Portman wrote of learning from his son Will, then a college freshman, that he is gay. "He said he'd known for some time, and that his sexual orientation wasn't something he chose; it was simply a part of who he is," Mr. Portman wrote.He added, "I believe all of our sons and daughters ought to have the same opportunity to experience the joy and stability of marriage."The Republican establishment in the state stands behind Mr. Portman, and its leaders said that if he runs for a second term in three years, most voters will judge him on his support for lower taxes and spending, his longtime issues."Should Rob Portman choose to run in 2016, he will have the full-throated support of the Ohio Republican Party," said Matt Borges, its executive director. He said the senator's willingness to stand apart from other elected Republicans, "knowing it was potentially at his political peril," was commendable. "If we're not supporting our own children, what are we doing?"Mr. Portman became a slightly less lonely figure in his party on Tuesday when a second Republican senator, Mark Kirk of Illinois, announced his support of same-sex marriage. Among Democratic senators, nearly 50 have rushed to come out in favor.Ohioans, including Ohio Republicans, are rapidly shifting on gay marriage, just as elsewhere. In a recent poll, 42 percent of Republicans in the state favored repealing the state's ban to allow same-sex marriages.The poll, conducted for The Columbus Dispatch last month (before Mr. Portman's announcement, but released after it) found that 54 percent of all Ohioans would repeal the ban, a significant shift since it was passed in a statewide referendum in 2004 with 62 percent of voters.Much of the change is driven by a generational shift: 73 percent of Ohioans under 35 favor same-sex marriage.Along the parade route, Sarah Renz, a school administrator who votes Republican, said she supported Mr. Portman. "You have to respect change, and if times change, people have to change with them."Tiffani Jackson, a Democrat, echoed a number of others both approving and disapproving who were cynical about the senator's change of heart, noting that he was against same-sex marriage until it hit close to home."I think it's sad it took his son being gay for him to flip-flop," she said.Lisa Hall, a homemaker, wished he had not changed his position. "I just don't agree with all that," she said of same-sex marriage. "It's changing families. The whole family loses stability."Jeanne and Bob Ward, whose 3-year-old grandson, Garrett, sat between them in a Reds cap, found nothing wrong with changing one's views because of a gay friend or family member.Their daughter, Shannon, who is Garrett's mother, had told them she is a lesbian a couple of years ago. She and her partner own a home north of Cincinnati and want the legal protections of marriage for Garrett's sake, Mrs. Ward said, adding, "We support gay marriage."She and her husband did not always feel that way. They voted for Ohio's ban nine years ago, before their daughter came out."We're 66 years old, and those views are instilled in you from little on," Mrs. Ward said. "As we get rid of this older generation — our generation — they're going to wonder why it was ever an issue."
WEST HOLLYWOOD, Calif. — A potentially deadly strain of meningitis, which has left one resident brain dead, has sent a shiver through the large gay community here, as public health officials have urged residents to be on the lookout for any symptoms of the disease.Although only one case has been confirmed in the area, officials said, the onset follows an outbreak of deadly meningitis among gay men in New York City. At least 22 men have contracted meningitis in New York since 2010, 4 of them this year, and 7 have died.Health officials have not yet determined if there is any connection between the cases in New York and the one here. But the similarities have ignited fears that this case could be an early sign of a bicoastal outbreak."The lesson we learned 30 years ago in the early days of H.I.V. and AIDS is that people were not alerted to what was going on and a lot of infections occurred that didn't need to occur," said John Duran, a West Hollywood city councilman and one of the few openly H.I.V.-positive elected officials in the country. "So even with an isolated case here, we need to sound the alarms, especially given the cases in New York."In New York, the city health department issued a warning last month, urging all men who regularly have intimate contact with other men to be vaccinated for meningitis. Officials here have thus far been reluctant to do the same.At a news conference on Friday, Dr. Maxine E. Liggins, with the Los Angeles County Department of Public Health, warned residents to watch for early signs of meningococcal meningitis, including a severe headache and stiff neck. The disease, a bacterial infection of the membrane surrounding the brain and the spinal cord, can be effectively treated with antibiotics if detected early, although it can intensify quickly.Ms. Liggins said the county was still investigating the case, looking for people who might have recently had close contact with Brett Shaad, the 33-year-old West Hollywood lawyer who was declared brain dead on Friday, just days after friends described him as fit and healthy. He remained on life support Saturday, pending arrangements for organ donations.Officials had not yet determined if he was infected with the same strain as the patients in New York, and they were not recommending the vaccine for gay men."Currently, we do not have an outbreak going on," Ms. Liggins said, noting that Los Angeles County had 13 cases of meningococcal meningitis last year.The health department's response has frustrated gay leaders here, who argued that at the very least the county should make the vaccine available to gay and bisexual men who want it.The Los Angeles Gay and Lesbian Center has publicly urged the health department to make the vaccine more widely available, and ordered an initial supply of the vaccine, about 100 doses, which will be offered to people without insurance or who otherwise cannot afford to pay for it at the private clinics where it is available."People are scared, and we want those who are concerned to be able to get the vaccine," said Jim Key, a spokesman for the Gay and Lesbian Center. "We don't want to wait."Mr. Duran said he would push for the City of West Hollywood to cover the cost of about 100 additional doses of the vaccine. He called the health department's response "government neglect" reminiscent of the delayed response to the outbreak of AIDS in the 1980s.It was unclear whether the supply of the vaccine could keep up with demand. As word of Mr. Shaad's condition spread through West Hollywood, the epicenter of gay culture and nightlife in Southern California, many frightened residents went in search of places where they could be vaccinated.Pharmacies and doctor's offices around West Hollywood, few of which offered the vaccine, fielded almost nonstop calls about it on Friday afternoon. By Saturday morning, multiple clinics that had been offering the vaccine in the Los Angeles metro area had already run out, and staff members did not know when they would be getting more."I don't see any reason why everyone shouldn't get vaccinated in our community," said Michael Valeo, a 41-year-old gay resident of West Hollywood, who was vaccinated on Friday. "With the cases in New York and now here, that's a lot of people in our community who have gotten sick. We have a mechanism to take care of it, so let's take care of it."
A federal appeals court in San Francisco heard arguments on Wednesday over whether a California law banning gay "conversion therapy" for minors is an unjustified infringement on free speech or a valid effort to prevent therapeutic malpractice.The law, adopted last year, was the first of its kind and an unusual effort to regulate a form of talk therapy. It bars licensed therapists from trying to change the sexual orientation of people under the age of 18.Hailed by gay rights groups as a landmark, the law was based on the conclusions of mainstream professional associations that such efforts have never been proved to work and that the therapy can harm young patients.But several therapists, along with patients who say they were helped by the treatment, challenged the law in two lawsuits, asserting that it violates the First Amendment and other basic rights.In December, two federal district judges made contradictory rulings about the law's constitutionality, with one granting a preliminary injunction to delay enforcement of the ban and another upholding the law.After Wednesday's two-hour hearing before the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, the three-judge panel will decide whether to continue the injunction or to let the law take effect. Lawyers involved in the case said that whichever way this decision goes, appeals are likely to take the case back to a lower court for a full trial and that final resolution in the federal courts could take years.The counseling, also known as reparative therapy, is promoted by a small number of therapists who challenge the prevailing scientific consensus that sexual orientation is largely inborn and cannot be changed.These therapists assert, instead, that gender confusion is a result of childhood trauma and that sexual orientation can be reshaped. Their theory is also promoted by some conservative Christian groups.But so-called gay cures are notorious among gay men, with many saying they suffered deep harm when their parents pushed them into counseling that left them filled with anguish and guilt.The lawsuits argued on Wednesday were brought by two conservative legal groups, the Pacific Justice Institute, based in Sacramento, and Liberty Counsel, which is affiliated with Liberty University in Virginia."Our case is about protecting the First Amendment rights of young people to get the counseling they feel they need, their parents may feel they need and that a licensed counselor may feel they need," said Brad Dacus, president of the Pacific Justice Institute, in an interview on Wednesday.In its brief to the court, Liberty Counsel said: "The state has gone far beyond regulation of the profession to taking sides" in a scientific dispute.Arguing for the law to take effect, the California government called it "an unremarkable exercise of the states' power to regulate professional conduct."The law "prohibits licensed mental health professionals from treating children and teenagers with a discredited, ineffective, and unsafe therapy in a misguided effort to change their sexual orientation," said the brief, prepared by the office of Attorney General Kamala D. Harris."For more than 40 years," the state said, "every mainstream mental health organization has agreed that same-sex attraction is not a disease in need of a cure."Similar bills have been introduced in New Jersey and Massachusetts, according to Wayne Besen, executive director of Truth Wins Out, a gay rights group based in Vermont.
Seeking an elusive middle ground on an issue that has divided its ranks and drawn heated national debate, the Boy Scouts of America on Friday proposed ending its longstanding ban on openly gay scouts but continuing to bar gay adults from serving as leaders. The decision must be approved by the roughly 1,400 voting members of the Scouts' National Council at a meeting in Texas the week of May 20."No youth may be denied membership in the Boy Scouts of America on the basis of sexual orientation or preference alone," the proposed policy states. But the organization "will maintain the current membership policy for all adult leaders."The proposal drew swift criticism from both sides as conservative Christians said the Boy Scouts had caved in to political pressure, and gay rights groups said they were perpetuating discrimination and dangerous stereotypes about gay men.The issue of gay members and leaders has particularly tormented the Boy Scouts over the last year as the organization first said it would not change policy, then said it would, then put off a decision until the May council meeting.The dismissal of a lesbian Cub Scout den leader, in particular, had received wide publicity, and gay rights groups stepped up a campaign for change. Several local governments and charities said they could not donate to the Scouts or sponsor troops because of its discrimination against gay people.On the other side, conservative politicians and religious groups urged the Boy Scouts to continue with the longstanding policy of ejecting boys and dismissing leaders who were openly gay.The Boy Scouts were forced to confront the question of sexual orientation at a time when the public has become more accepting of homosexuality, but the issue remains deeply polarizing. Already suffering a long-term decline in membership, the organization had to move carefully, its leaders said in private, because most of its local troops were sponsored by churches, some of which call homosexual behavior a sin.The Mormon Church and the Roman Catholic Church, together, sponsor groups enrolling about one-fourth of all scouts. Both churches have in the past said they might abandon the Boy Scouts if it altered its policy on gay members and leaders.The Mormon Church, which uses the Boy Scouts as a main program for youth training, was noncommital on Friday, saying only that it would study the proposed resolution before the May meeting.Deron Smith, a spokesman for the Scouts, declined to describe their discussions with church leaders. "We have more than 116,000 local scouting units, and reactions will no doubt vary," he said. "We value our relationship with all of them."In recent months, the Boy Scouts have conducted discussions and surveys on the issue around the country, with results that mirrored the country's changes and divisions over gay rights. They found that while a majority of adults involved with scouting supported the past policy of excluding gays, parents under the age of 50 and a majority of teenagers opposed it, according to a summary of the findings released Friday.While Mr. Smith declined to explain the reasoning behind the different treatment of leaders and youths, the study summary says that many adults had expressed particular concern about child safety and whether gay men were appropriate role models. The Scouts, like other institutions serving children, have been jarred in recent years by sexual-abuse scandals from the past.But four experts consulted by the Scouts, the summary said, said that homosexuality is not a risk factor for sexual abuse and that there was no evidence that having a gay leader would alter a child's sexual orientation.On Friday, a conservative Christian coalition of past and current Boy Scouts, parents and leaders called OnMyHonor.Net, which was formed to lobby the Boy Scouts on the issue, condemned the proposed changes with a statement titled "Boy Scouts resolution caves to outside pressure."But gay rights advocates attacked the Scouts for failing to open up their leadership ranks."The Boy Scouts have missed an opportunity to exercise leadership and usher the organization back to relevancy," said Richard Ferraro, the vice president of the Gay and Lesbian Alliance Against Discrimination. "What this resolution appears to be doing is reinforcing the outrageous idea that gay people somehow pose a threat to kids, which experts like the American Psychological Association have dismissed for more than a decade."Jennifer Tyrrell, a lesbian parent in Ohio whose dismissal last year as her 7-year-old son's den leader received national publicity, said Friday in a statement: "One year after sending a letter ousting me as my son's leader, the Boy Scouts are once again forcing me to look my children in the eyes and tell them that our family isn't good enough."But Martez Moore, chief operating officer of the Scouts' Middle Tennessee Council, said he supported the proposal, especially the continued barring of gay leaders. In surveys, he said, local parents were "overwhelmingly in support of banning gay Scout leaders."He said he did not expect that a decision to admit openly gay boys as scouts would have a major effect. "Scouts who are gay usually decide with their own families whether they want to stay in a troop," he said. "It is a decision made within a family, not usually within the Scouts."Bob Hopper, the Scout executive for the Mid-Iowa Council, which serves 400 troops with about 20,000 members, said he thought the proposal struck a good balance. "We're going to be accepting of youth and still allow those churches to have their faith standard on social issues," he said. Some people, he added, will be disappointed with the continued ban on gay leaders.Boy Scout officials stressed that they hoped to keep issues of sexuality out of their program. The proposed resolution says that "scouting is a youth program, and any sexual conduct, whether homosexual or heterosexual, by youth of scouting age is contrary to the virtues of scouting."The resolution continues, "The Boy Scouts of America does not have an agenda on the matter of sexual orientation, and resolving this complex issue is not the role of the organization, nor may any member use scouting to promote or advance any social or political position or agenda."
Rhode Island took a step on Tuesday toward becoming the 10th state to approve same-sex marriage when a major legislative committee forwarded a marriage bill to the State Senate.By a vote of 7 to 4, the Senate Judiciary Committee approved a bill that would allow gay and lesbian couples to marry, while allowing religious leaders who oppose such marriages to refuse to perform them. The landmark vote by the full Senate could come on Wednesday. Gay rights advocates said that they think they have the votes to prevail, all but ensuring adoption of same-sex marriage by the only state in New England that does not already allow it."We think that when the vote is called, we can win," Ray Sullivan, campaign director of Rhode Islanders United for Marriage, said Tuesday afternoon of the imminent Senate vote.A similar bill passed the House in January by a vote of 51 to 19, and Gov. Lincoln Chafee, a onetime Republican who is now an independent, has strongly supported "marriage equality."Brian Brown, the president of the National Organization for Marriage, which has lobbied against expanding marriage rights in Rhode Island and other states, said that "this bill can still be stopped."But his cause suffered setbacks in Rhode Island on Tuesday. The Judiciary Committee failed to support a counterproposal to let the public decide the marriage issue in a referendum, and all five Republican members of the 38-member State Senate declared support for same-sex marriage.Those five Republicans were guilty of "a massive mistake and betrayal," Mr. Brown said.Still, gay rights advocates were not taking anything for granted on Tuesday afternoon, and vowed to spend the evening making hundreds more calls and home visits, urging voters to contact senators who might be undecided.Opposition to same-sex marriage in the state has been led by the Roman Catholic Church. In a statement on Monday, Bishop Thomas J. Tobin of the Diocese of Providence warned legislators of a "grave risk" to society and urged them "to stand strong" and "defend marriage and family as traditionally defined."In addition to Rhode Island, bills to permit same-sex marriage are under active consideration in the legislatures of at least three other states: Delaware, Illinois and Minnesota.The latest action took place on Tuesday in Delaware, where the House approved a bill authorizing same-sex marriage by a vote of 23 to 18. It now goes before the State Senate."We're extremely hopeful that all four of those states will move to marriage equality this year," said Sarah Warbelow, director of state legislation for the Human Rights Campaign, a private group in Washington.Last November, same-sex marriage won in state referendums in Maine, Maryland and Washington. In six other states and the District of Columbia, it has been approved by legislatures or required by court decisions.But 30 states have adopted constitutional provisions limiting marriage to a man and a woman.Mr. Brown, of the National Organization for Marriage, said that his side could win in plebiscites in most states and that "talk of the demise of traditional marriage is premature.""It's a lot tougher to win in legislatures," he said. "A sophisticated lobbying apparatus with tons of money has been created to go into state after state and convince legislators to vote against what their constituents want."Gay rights advocates note, in response, that public acceptance of same-sex marriage is climbing rapidly, with a majority now endorsing it in national polls and the support especially strong among those under 50.
When the Rhode Island State Senate tallied up the votes against a same-sex marriage bill passed there on Wednesday, something was missing: Republicans.All five of the chamber's Republican lawmakers had voted for the bill, stunning opponents and sending the measure to the governor's desk and almost-certain victory next week.The vote reflected not only the rapidly shifting tides of public opinion on same-sex marriage, but also the influence of a new Republican advocacy group called the American Unity Fund, which spent weeks helping the state's gay rights organization cultivate Republican senators.Now the group is preparing a major push in Washington and in state capitals intended to reshape the Republican Party, by building support for same-sex marriage and bolstering its acceptance among candidates and party activists around the country.Founded and financed by some of the country's leading Republican fund-raisers and strategists, the fund expects to raise up to $7 million this year, officials said. The fund's organizers include Paul E. Singer and Clifford S. Asness, libertarian-leaning New York investors; David Herro, a prominent Chicago money manager; and Seth Klarman, a billionaire Boston philanthropist and hedge fund manager."The concept of gay unions fits very well within our framework of individual liberty and our belief that strong families make for a stronger society," Mr. Singer said in an e-mail. "The institution of marriage is in very bad shape in this country, yet gay and lesbian couples want very much to be a part of it, to live as committed husbands and wives with their children in traditional family units. This should be what we want as conservatives, for people to cherish and respect this model and to want it for themselves."The fund is one of several advocacy organizations backed by wealthy Republicans and business leaders to shift their party's stance in recent months on issues like immigration and same-sex marriage. And the new effort traces a rift between Republican elites and grass-roots voters over a handful of hot-button social issues that one group views as handcuffing the party and the other sees as essential to its identity."We were fighting for years on the life issue, with the same group of people," said Tony Perkins, president of the Family Research Council, referring to abortion rights. Mr. Perkins attended the Republican National Convention last year as a delegate and wrote the party's marriage plank, which states that "the union of one man and one woman must be upheld as the national standard."Mr. Perkins added: "They have money, but they're small in number. It's still a tension between those who care about social issues and those who would rather not deal with them."Those involved with the American Unity Fund said its initial efforts would be focused on more socially liberal states, like Illinois and Delaware, where a handful of Republican votes could enable advocates to win passage of same-sex marriage legislation in the coming months. The group has already set up shop in Minnesota, where the Legislature may vote as early as next week on a same-sex marriage bill that advocates do not yet have enough votes to pass.But the group is also beginning a long-term push in more conservative states like West Virginia and Utah, seeking to build conservative support for nondiscrimination laws that could help pave the way for same-sex marriage in coming years. A critical part of the effort, fund strategists said, is building lists of Republican supporters of same-sex marriage around the country that could be used to pressure lawmakers in Washington and elsewhere.That could prove critical at the state level, where Republicans now control majorities or supermajorities in more than half the state capitols."We want to change the complexion of which people are calling their lawmakers from these legislative districts," said Jeff Cook-McCormac, a senior adviser to the American Unity Fund. "It's usually gay people calling and saying, 'We want this.' What we want is for legislators to hear from their straight friends and neighbors, people who will say, 'I'm a Republican, and I want this for my neighbors and my friends.' "In Rhode Island, the unity fund helped Republican senators create their message in a way that would help them navigate opposition from more conservative constituents."They were a resource of experienced political professionals operating on the Republican side of the aisle," said State Senator Dawson Hodgson, a Republican who co-sponsored the marriage bill. "It was important to be able to draw on some national level experience in making sure that our Republican perspective in supporting same-sex marriage was at the forefront of our dialogue with constituents."
The Mormon Church has declared its support for the Boy Scouts of America 's proposal to end a longstanding ban on openly gay youths, while continuing to bar gay adult leaders.The endorsement on Thursday by the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, the country's largest sponsor of scout troops, is a strong indication that the proposed change will be adopted by delegates to the group's annual meeting, to start in Texas on May 22.The ban on gay youths and leaders has come under growing public scrutiny, with some cities and charities saying they cannot support an organization that discriminates. But the Boy Scouts also feared losing partnerships with conservative churches that call homosexual acts a sin.The Mormon Church sponsors 25 percent of all local Cub Scout and Boy Scout groups, accounting for 15 percent of a total membership of 2.7 million.In the past, the Mormon and Roman Catholic Churches and some evangelical Christian groups had threatened to sever ties with the Scouts if they permitted gay members and leaders. This month, after extensive surveys and discussions with scout leaders and parents around the country, Boy Scout executives said they found a mix of attitudes but widespread objections to gay leaders, in particular.Scout executives last week unveiled a new policy that "No youth may be denied membership in the Boy Scouts of America on the basis of sexual orientation or preference alone." But they proposed keeping the ban on gay adult leaders and said that any open expressions of sexuality, whether heterosexual or homosexual, had no place in scouting.The proposal drew angry responses from both aides. Conservative Christians said the Boy Scouts had caved in to political pressure. Gay rights groups sharply criticized the proposal, saying that barring gay leaders would not only perpetuate discrimination, but also reinforce the discredited fear that gay men are more likely than others to be pedophiles.In a somewhat vague statement issued Thursday, the Mormon Church praised the Boy Scouts for a "thoughtful" approach to this "complex" issue and said the new proposals contained "positive things." A spokesman for the church confirmed on Friday that the church would support the change and expected to continue its close relationship with the Boy Scouts.
Overcoming years of resistance, Rhode Island on Thursday became the 10th state in the country and the last in New England to approve same-sex marriage .The measure passed a final vote in the legislature in the afternoon. Just before 7 p.m., Gov. Lincoln Chafee, an independent who had long advocated for its passage, signed it into law in a jubilant ceremony on the steps of the Statehouse in Providence, where hundreds of people, including many state and local officials, joined the celebration."I know that you have been waiting for this day to come," Mr. Chafee said at the celebration. "I know that you have loved ones who dreamed this would happen and did not live to see it. But I am proud to say that now, at long last, you are free to marry the person you love."Same-sex unions will be legal in the state starting Aug. 1."It is an incredibly historic day for Rhode Island and the country," said Julia Harvey, a Brown University student who is gay.Approval in Rhode Island followed a 16-year struggle in the heavily Roman Catholic state, with intense opposition from clerics and many Republicans. But in a sign of the changing times, all five Republicans in the 38-member State Senate supported the measure — the only time in any state where the entire caucus of either party has approved such a measure unanimously — making Rhode Island the latest indication of growing acceptance of same-sex marriage across the country.Delaware is likely to be next, perhaps as soon as next week. Illinois and Minnesota are also on track for passage.Governor Chafee has long maintained that legalizing same-sex unions is not only fair, but good for business because it would help the state attract young people, who support gay marriage overwhelmingly."The talented workers who are driving the new economy — young, educated and forward-looking — want to live in a place that reflects their values," he wrote this week in an Op-Ed article in The New York Times.Supporters have been introducing same-sex marriage bills in Rhode Island since 1997, but none had been voted out of committee until this year. The House passed the measure overwhelmingly in January, in large part because the speaker, Gordon D. Fox, is openly gay.The higher hurdle was in the State Senate. But with an intense broad-based advocacy campaign that included the governor, business leaders and religious leaders, the Senate considered the measure for the first time. It modified the House version by expanding religious protections for those who do not approve of same-sex marriage, and then passed it last week.The measure went back to the House, where its final passage on Thursday was a foregone conclusion. On the final vote, the standing-room-only crowd of observers burst into song, with "My Country 'Tis of Thee."During the day, Thomas J. Tobin, the bishop of Providence, said in a pastoral letter that he was "profoundly disappointed" that Rhode Island was likely to legalize same-sex marriage and warned Catholics to think carefully before attending any gay or lesbian weddings."Catholics should examine their consciences very carefully before deciding whether or not to endorse same-sex relationships or attend same-sex ceremonies, realizing that to do so might harm their relationship with God and cause significant scandal to others," Bishop Tobin wrote.Other opponents said they did not see Rhode Island's action as part of any groundswell."I don't see momentum for redefining marriage," said Christopher Plante, executive director of the Rhode Island chapter of the National Organization for Marriage, who noted that 30 states have constitutional provisions limiting marriage to a man and a woman."Rhode Island is not that big a deal," he said. "It's a deep blue state and one of the least religious in the union, despite its high Catholic population."But for the crowd at the ceremony, it was a very big deal indeed. Chase Bolling, 26, who had worked on behalf of the new law, said he was inspired to do so because his older brother is gay."My homophobia ruined our relationship," he said. "And when I found out my brother had AIDS, I promised him I'd do everything I could to make sure he had the same rights I had."
Delaware on Tuesday became the 11th state to permit same-sex marriage, the latest in a string of victories for those working to extend marital rights to gay and lesbian couples.The marriage bill passed the State Senate by a vote of 12 to 9 Tuesday afternoon."It's a great day in Delaware," said Gov. Jack Markell, a Democrat, who signed it within minutes of passage before an overjoyed crowd of activists. "I am signing this bill now because I do not intend to make any of you wait one moment longer."Same-sex couples will be eligible for marriage licenses on July 1.Delaware adopted same-sex marriage just five days after a similar decision in Rhode Island and after ballot-box victories last fall in Maine, Maryland and Washington.During three hours of emotional debate before the vote Tuesday, State Senator Karen Peterson, a Democrat, said she had lived with a female partner for 24 years, and she challenged opponents of extending marriage to gay couples. "If my happiness somehow demeans or diminishes your marriage, then you need to work on your marriage," she said, eliciting cheers and laughter.A Republican opponent of the bill, Senator Greg Lavelle, said before the vote, "We won't fully understand the impact of this legislation for years to come." Mr. Lavelle, the minority whip, said it was "strange" to "have to defend traditional marriage that we have known for thousands of years."In Maine, Maryland and Washington in November, same-sex marriage won in state referendums for the first time. In eight other states, now including Delaware, and in the District of Columbia it has been adopted by legislatures or required by court decisions.Public opinion on the issue is shifting quickly, with polls showing that a majority of Americans support allowing gay and lesbian couples to marry."The momentum continues," said Evan Wolfson, president of Freedom to Marry, a New York-based advocacy group that aided the campaign in Delaware.Gay rights groups are hopeful that same-sex marriage will pass soon in Minnesota, where House members are expected to consider it this week, and in Illinois, where the Senate has approved a bill but a vote has not been scheduled in the House.Short of a sweeping decision by the Supreme Court that same-sex marriage is a right, change could come more slowly in the coming years. Thirty states have adopted constitutional amendments limiting marriage to a man and a woman — measures that can be reversed only with public ballots."We're not discouraged," said Brian Brown, president of the National Organization for Marriage, which has helped finance opposition to same-sex marriage proposals across the country."The states that have passed same-sex marriage are deep-blue liberal states," Mr. Brown said, arguing that his opponents usually find it easier to win in legislatures than in popular votes.Both sides are waiting for the Supreme Court to announce two decisions in June that could alter the marriage landscape.In one case, the court will decide whether the federal government should recognize same-sex marriage in states where it is legal. In the other, it will decide the fate of California's Proposition 8, which banned same-sex marriage in the state after a court had declared it a legal right.
The Minnesota House of Representatives on Thursday voted to permit same-sex marriage, clearing the way to add Minnesota to a string of states that have recently made it legal for gay and lesbian couples to wed.The House, which is controlled by Democrats, approved the measure by a vote of 75-59, dividing mostly along party lines. In recent months, as the debate over same-sex marriage emerged in St. Paul, a capital newly dominated by Democrats, the outcome in the House had been seen as most uncertain. State Senate leaders say that the outlook is more assured in that chamber and that they expect to approve same-sex marriage next week. Gov. Mark Dayton, a Democrat, urged approval and said he would sign the bill, which would allow same-sex marriages starting Aug. 1.If the measure is approved, Minnesota would become the 12th state, in addition to the District of Columbia, to permit marriages for gay and lesbian couples and the third to decide to do so, along with Delaware and Rhode Island, this month alone. Minnesota would also become the first state in the nation's middle to make such a choice through legislative action. Elsewhere in the Midwest, Iowa allows same-sex marriage, but that was decided in the courts. In Illinois, which allows civil unions, State House members are considering a same-sex marriage bill already approved in the State Senate.In a way, the vote here came as a remarkable shift. Just a few months ago, in November, voters had cast ballots following a hard-fought campaign aimed at amending the State Constitution to define marriage as between a man and a woman. The amendment failed, and, with Democrats winning control of both legislative chambers in the same election, a renewed effort to allow same-sex marriage emerged. Dueling campaigns — an RV tour, rallies, leaflets and advertisements — have consumed the state in recent weeks."This is a historic day for Minnesota," Representative Karen Clark, a Democrat and the bill's sponsor, said as House members debated the issue before the vote and as advocates on both sides crowded into the Capitol, chanting and cheering. "Freedom means freedom for everyone," she said.The debate lasted for several hours, sometimes growing emotional and personal."I am not a homophobe or a Neanderthal or a hater," said Representative Tony Cornish, a Republican, explaining why he would vote against the measure. "My constituents back home, the majority of them wanted me to vote that way," he said.In the weeks before the vote, supporters of same-sex marriage said they were hoping to win support from at least a few Republicans and from Democrats who represent more rural districts, where the issue was more contested, far from the Twin Cities. In the end, four Republicans voted for same-sex marriage, officials said, and two Democrats opposed it."Sometimes," said Representative Raymond Dehn, a Democrat who supported the measure, "it gets down to doing the right thing."Opponents said lawmakers had misunderstood the feelings of Minnesotans, and had misinterpreted voters' rejection in November of the constitutional amendment to mean that they now wanted to legalize same-sex marriage. Others said that same-sex marriage remained too divisive, too much of a diversion from the fiscal issues that voters truly wanted answered in St. Paul.Representative Kelby Woodard, a Republican who voted no, warned supporters about the size and significance of marriage. "We are redefining an institution that has been the bedrock of our society for generations," he said. "We're asked to empathize with the idea that we should redefine marriage, and I'm asking you to empathize with at least half of Minnesotans who disagree with that. Think about them as well."
ST. PAUL — Gay couples will be permitted to wed in Minnesota starting in August, making it the 12th state to permit same-sex marriage and the first in the Midwest to take such a step outside of a court ruling.The State Senate, controlled by Democrats, voted 37 to 30 on Monday to allow same-sex marriages, after approval by the State House last week. Gov. Mark Dayton, also a Democrat, had urged lawmakers to pass the measure and said he would sign the bill on Tuesday afternoon."In my heart of hearts, I know that today love wins," State Senator Tony Lourey, a Democrat, said Monday during a tense, often personal debate before the vote. Hundreds of people on both sides of the issue packed the halls of the Capitol here, chanting, cheering and waving signs with clashing messages — "Don't Erase Moms and Dads" and "Marriage Equality, You Betcha."Supporters portrayed the choice as a historic decision on the biggest civil rights question of this era and as a simple matter of fairness, while opponents said that the bill carried numerous unintended consequences and that Minnesotans needed more time to weigh such a divisive matter."Where does this stop?" said State Senator Torrey Westrom, a Republican. This choice, he said, will send Minnesota "down that road of taking mother and father out of our recognition of what our children need."Nationally, advocates of same-sex marriage lauded Minnesota's move, saying it would add momentum to similar efforts elsewhere, including in at least one other Midwestern state, Illinois, which is considering a provision legalizing same-sex marriage. Critics of the Minnesota measure, meanwhile, predicted that the vote on Monday would carry a lasting political price for the state's Democrats in coming elections. They also said that barring a sweeping ruling by the United States Supreme Court establishing same-sex marriage as a right, other states were not likely to follow Minnesota's lead in a sudden wave of legislative changes.In a way, Monday's vote was a startling shift in the conversation in this state. For much of 2012, Minnesotans had been debating an amendment to the state Constitution that would have done the opposite — define marriage as between a man and a woman. While 30 states have adopted such provisions, Minnesotans in November rejected the amendment and sent majorities of Democrats to both chambers of the State Legislature, setting off an intense new push to legalize same-sex marriage."That whole constitutional amendment backfired on them," Amy Britain, 46, said Monday as she and other supporters of same-sex marriage rejoiced around the echoing Capitol rotunda after the vote. She said it proved that Minnesotans, like many Americans, had changed their views on marriage."This means everything," Ms. Britain said of the vote. "It was only a matter of time before people would realize that we're just folks — we're in people's congregations, we're in the grocery store, we're everywhere."The issue had pitted this state's most urban area, around the Twin Cities, against rural sections of the state where lawmakers said support was more uncertain. In both chambers, voting fell along largely partisan lines.In the end, four Republicans in the State House and one in the State Senate voted to allow same-sex marriage, while two House Democrats and three Senate Democrats voted no.Around the state, dueling campaigns had emerged in recent days with television advertisements, leafleting and even an R.V. tour outside the Twin Cities. Opponents of same-sex marriage argued that voters had elected lawmakers to manage the state's fiscal issues, not take significant steps on divisive social issues. Some cited religious beliefs for their opposition."It's an objective reality that every baby has a mom and a dad," said the Rev. Thomas McCabe, a Catholic priest who stood among a crush of people inside the Capitol.The vote here comes as part of a wave of victories for same-sex marriage advocates around the nation. This month alone, lawmakers in Delaware and Rhode Island made similar moves, and voters last fall approved measures in Maryland, Maine and Washington.While efforts to allow same-sex marriage have flourished on the East Coast, the middle of the country has been different. Since 2009, Iowa has been the only Midwestern state that permits gay men and lesbians to wed, though that was decided in a State Supreme Court ruling. In Illinois, which allows civil unions, State House members are considering a same-sex marriage bill already approved in the State Senate.
From the day in 1983 when he graduated cum laude from Baylor University , Tim Smith fit the profile of a star alumnus. He went on to earn an M.B.A. at Harvard and to lead an information technology company with 300 employees. The business school at Baylor invited Mr. Smith to speak to classes about "entrepreneurial finance," and he was named twice to its advisory board.Then, as the fall semester began in 2005, word reached the business school's dean that Mr. Smith was gay and living with his partner. Mr. Smith was ousted from the advisory board because his sexual orientation was deemed incompatible with Baylor's Baptist affiliation and theology."You might as well tell Rosa Parks that she's welcome in the back of the bus," Mr. Smith, now 52, wrote at the time in an e-mail to the dean. "Any kind of limitation which puts people 'in their place' on some basis other than merit is not just bad business, it is wrong."A generation later, as Baylor holds its commencement ceremonies this weekend in Waco, Tex., the most famous member of the senior class will be an openly lesbian basketball star, Brittney Griner. The center on Baylor's national championship women's basketball team in 2012, twice the winner of the Naismith Trophy as the nation's top female player, first pick in the recent W.N.B.A. draft, Ms. Griner came out last month in a Sports Illustrated interview, followed by an essay in The New York Times.By dint of her celebrity status, to say nothing of her marketplace value to the Baylor brand, Ms. Griner has instantly altered the relationship between Baylor and its gay students, one that has been awkward at best and contentious at worst. Far from condemning her as a sinner, Baylor offered Ms. Griner "our admiration, appreciation and support," as the university's director of media communications, Lori W. Fogleman, wrote in an e-mail this week.Plenty of caveats should be attached to this tolerance offensive. Baylor continues to omit sexual orientation from its nondiscrimination policy. The university's official statement on sexual misconduct lists "homosexual acts" — as well as sexual harassment and adultery, among other behaviors — as "misuses of God's gifts."Even so, if it is too soon to know with certainty whether Baylor's public acceptance of Ms. Griner's sexuality will extend to the John and Jane Queer of its rank-and-file student body, a more expansive kind of change seems possible thanks to what one might call the Griner Effect."The fact that she felt free enough to do that says something about the environment becoming more accepting than in the past," Mr. Smith said in a telephone interview last week. "My impression is that the student body there is really pretty accepting, as students are at most campuses these days. The bigger issue is probably with donors and alumni of another generation."Erica Heath, 20, a junior at Baylor, has never watched the women's basketball team play, and has spotted its star player only once, eating in the same student cafeteria.Yet Ms. Heath typifies the kind of garden-variety L.G.B.T. student at Baylor who may benefit from the opening Ms. Griner has created."The fact that this celebrity comes out means that faculty and staff have to recognize that there are L.G.B.T. students on their campus," Ms. Heath said. "It can make teachers more aware of who they're speaking to. It's very easy to think you're in an all-straight, all-Christian community at Baylor. But you aren't."Baylor's history on gay issues has been a decidedly rocky one, with Mr. Smith's ouster and the policy language only part of the saga.In 2002, a law firm retained by the university issued a cease-and-desist order against a group of gay and lesbian alumni using the logo "Baylor Bear Pride." Also in the early 2000s, university employees washed off a sidewalk chalk message from a student L.G.B.T. support group called "BaylorFreedom." (Ms. Fogleman said that action was consistent with overall university policy, not directed at gay groups.)More recently, Baylor has refused formal recognition to Sexual Identity Forum, a group of L.G.B.T. and "questioning" students that includes Ms. Heath. Before becoming Baylor's president in 2010, Kenneth W. Starr helped argue the California Supreme Court case defending Proposition 8, the state's ban on same-sex marriage.Even before Ms. Griner came out, though, signs of change were appearing. The university does allow Sexual Identity Forum to meet openly in the student center.An economics professor, Aaron Hedlund, wrote an op-ed column in the student newspaper contending that one can disapprove of gay marriage on religious grounds while supporting it as a civil right.Emerson Collins, 33, who graduated in 2002 as part of Baylor's elite University Scholars program, came out only after leaving Waco. He is collaborating with another Baylor alumnus, Del Shores, on an indie film, "Southern Baptist Sissies," about four boys growing up gay in fundamentalist Christian communities. So Mr. Collins has watched the Brittney Griner affair with acute interest."Someone always has to be first," he said. "And when there's a great shining beacon who can be respected for who they are in addition to being in the L.G.B.T. community, that can make a big difference. Baylor is going to continue to tout her success in her skill set. There's so much commercial benefit to Baylor and its national profile. And you can't separate that from who she is. While it's a one-off, that's the way every important journey begins."
GRAPEVINE, Tex. — Boy Scout leaders from around the country, engulfed in a culture war over homosexuality, gathered for a vote here Thursday on a landmark proposal that would permit openly gay youths — but not openly gay adult leaders — to participate in scouting.In a secret ballot, more than 1,400 volunteer leaders from scouting's 270 councils will accept or reject a proposal that has led to strident divisions and debate.The emotions were evident Wednesday outside the conference center here in a suburb of Dallas, where dozens of conservative Christians, many in scout uniforms, carried "no" signs and waved American flags."We're trying to uphold traditional values," said Bill Lizzio, 58, a scout leader who had driven from Tennessee to register his concern.Angry parents threatened to pull their sons out of scouting, saying they would never let them share a tent with a gay boy.Current and former Boy Scouts who want to end the exclusionary policy, including several who were forced out of scouting for being gay, gave their own news briefing.David Rice, 84, of Petaluma, Calif., who said he was ejected as a scout leader in 1998 after he publicly advocated including gays, said that if scouting did not change with the culture, "it will be left behind.""We cannot afford to lose this American icon," he said.Mythologized by Norman Rockwell and a formative experience for no fewer than 181 NASA astronauts, the Boy Scouts have for more than a century been a symbol of an upright America.But over the last year, the growing public acceptance of homosexuality has collided with the social conservatism of many Boy Scout leaders and parents, as well as the churches that sponsor a majority of Cub Scout packs and Boy Scout troops. The longstanding policy of barring openly gay members — the Scouts' version of "don't ask, don't tell" — has been sharply challenged from outside the organization and from within.After publicly wavering, which only fueled the divisions, Boy Scout executives conducted exhaustive research this spring on member attitudes. They devised a plan that they hoped might defuse the debate, opening the door to gay youths but keeping it shut for gay adults, a step that, based on their surveys, they feared would cause mass defections.But more conflict appears inevitable no matter which way the vote goes. Last week the Connecticut Yankee Council promised it would defy national policy in either case, saying it intended to accept gay leaders and would be "open to all youths and adults who subscribe to the values of the Scout Oath and Law regardless of their personal sexual orientation."The vote Thursday is expected to be close. Prospects for passage improved when the Mormon Church, the largest single sponsor of scout units, indicated support for limited change, and the Roman Catholic Church, another major sponsor, also said that it would not abandon scouting so long as any new policy applied to youths and not leaders.Glaad, formerly known as the Gay and Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation, and other rights groups as well as internal advocates said that allowing openly gay youths would be a step in the right direction, but only that. They vowed to continue with a public campaign against any discrimination.Evangelical conservatives, the public spearhead of opposition, said that even the limited opening being voted on would expose youths to immoral behavior and pro-gay politics, ruining a rare bastion of traditional America."Allowing openly gay scouts will mean the blunt injection of hypersexuality and gay activism into a youth organization," said John Stemberger, head of the Florida Family Policy Council, a conservative evangelical group. Mr. Stemberger, an Eagle Scout who has crusaded against gay marriage and abortion, has sought to mobilize like-minded former scouts with a group called OnMyHonor.Net.Zach Wahls, a 21-year-old Eagle Scout who was raised by two mothers and who took this year off college to organize Scouts for Equality, called Mr. Stemberger's fears absurd. "Being open doesn't mean waving a rainbow flag or advancing some agenda," he said. "It means that two gay parents can feel comfortable going to their son's Eagle Scout Court of Honor."Those on both sides predict that once gay scouts are allowed, the Scouts will soon be forced to allow gay leaders, too, whether by lawsuits or the simple lack of logic in forcing a gay Eagle Scout to quit the day he turns 18.The Cub Scouts, Boy Scouts, Venture Scouts and other branches include more than 2.6 million youths — down by some 40 percent since the early 1970s. They are guided by about one million adult volunteers, including parents and many former scouts.Arguments over the exclusion of gays have simmered for years, and some municipal agencies, charities and corporations have ended donations because of it. The issue erupted with force last year after a lesbian in Ohio, Jennifer Tyrrell, was ousted as leader of her 7-year-old son's Tiger Cubs den.
Dissatisfaction Over Allowing Gay Scouts: The decision to allow openly gay Boy Scouts but not leaders elicited strong feelings from the scouting community.GRAPEVINE, Tex. — The Boy Scouts of America on Thursday ended its longstanding policy of forbidding openly gay youths to participate in its activities, a step its chief executive called "compassionate, caring and kind."The decision, which came after years of resistance and wrenching internal debate, was widely seen as a milestone for the Boy Scouts, a symbol of traditional America. More than 1,400 volunteer leaders from across the country voted, with more than 60 percent approving a measure that said no youth may be denied membership "on the basis of sexual orientation or preference alone."The top national leaders of the Boy Scouts, who pledge fealty to God and country, had urged the change in the face of vehement opposition from conservative parents and volunteers, some of whom said they would quit the organization. But the vote put the Scouts more in line with the swift rise in public acceptance of homosexuality, especially among younger parents who are essential to the future of an institution that has been losing members for decades.The policy change, effective January 2014, is unlikely to bring peace to the Boy Scouts as they struggle to keep a foothold in a swirling cultural landscape, with renewed lobbying and debate already starting Thursday evening.The Scouts did not consider the even more divisive question of whether to allow openly gay adults and leaders. This drew criticism from advocates for gay rights, who called the decision a breakthrough but vowed to continue pressing the Scouts to allow gay members of all ages.Some conservative churches and parents said the Scouts were violating their oath to be "morally straight" and said they would drop out.Still, for gay men who were forced out of scouting and for their allies, thousands of whom joined the push for change, the opening of membership was more than welcome."I've waited 13 years for this," said Matt Comer, now 27, who had to leave his scout troop at 14 after he started a Gay-Straight Alliance at his school. Since the fourth grade, he said Thursday, he had dreamed of becoming an Eagle Scout and was crushed when he was denied the chance."Today we finally have some justice for me and others," he said. "But gay youths will still be told they are no longer welcome when they turn 18."Leaders of the conservative faction predicted that lawsuits would soon force the Boy Scouts to allow openly gay leaders, and they accused the top leaders of ignoring the beliefs of their members."The fallout from this is going to be tremendous," said Robert Schwarzwalder, a senior vice president of the Family Research Council, a conservative Christian group, and a father of two scouts in Northern Virginia. "I think there will be a loss of hundreds of thousands of boys and parents.""This great institution is going to be vitiated by the intrusion of a political agenda," he said.After the decision was announced Thursday, John Stemberger, an evangelical leader from Florida who organized a campaign to block the change, said that like-minded groups and parents would meet next month in Louisville, Ky., to discuss creating what he called a new "character development organization for boys," an alternative to scouting.Glaad, a gay-rights group that has campaigned for change over the last year, said it would keep pressure on the Boy Scouts over the leadership issue."We'll continue urging corporate donors and public officials to withhold their support," said Richard Ferraro, the group's vice president for communications.Several sponsors, including the UPS Foundation, Merck, the Intel Foundation, and many local United Ways and city agencies had already ended financing for the Scouts because the group's policies violated their own nondiscrimination guidelines.In a closed meeting of the assembled delegates here Wednesday night, the top three leaders of the Boy Scouts — Wayne Brock, the paid chief executive; Wayne Perry, the volunteer president who is a corporate leader from Washington State; and Tico Perez, the volunteer commissioner and a consultant in Florida — made a strong plea to delegates and dissenting board members to allow gay youths, saying the goal of scouting was to reach as many boys as possible, according to people who attended."This is not about what's legal but what's compassionate, caring and kind," Mr. Brock reportedly said.No similar proposal to allow gay adults was on the agenda, and the executives have said little about how they made the distinction. But in surveys this spring, many parents and volunteers around the country said they were against the idea of openly gay scout leaders.The vote was a bittersweet one for David Knapp, 86, who spent much of his life in scouting as a boy, as a professional staff member and later as a volunteer with a council in Connecticut. He had tried to keep his sexual orientation a secret but one day in 1993, he said, two scout officials said, "We found out you are a homosexual," and forced him out."I see this as a good step, but with a lot of misgivings," he said of the limited opening to gays.Some of the most conservative parents and leaders are already thinking of what comes next.Allison Mackey of Hanover, Pa., has five sons — one an Eagle Scout, three now active in scouting and an 8-year-old who had planned to join.The family has discussed the issue and reached a decision, she said: All the sons were willing to abandon the Boy Scouts if openly gay members are allowed."The Boy Scouts are something we've really enjoyed because they celebrate manliness and leadership," she said. But, she added, she and her husband were "looking to encourage our sons in traditional Christian values."Personally, she said she would be disappointed to see her sons leave the Scouts."To stand by principles would be difficult," she said. "But we're going to have to say no. The organization is giving up freedom."In a meeting with reporters after the vote, Mr. Perry, the national president of the Boy Scouts, sought to put the rancor behind."We're moving forward together," he said. "Everyone agrees on one thing, no matter how you feel about this issue, kids are better off in scouting."
WASHINGTON — There has been a remarkable outbreak of harmony at the Supreme Court . Of the seven decisions issued in the last two weeks, six were unanimous.There have been no dissents in more than 60 percent of the 46 cases decided so far this term. At this point last year, the justices were unanimous just 48 percent of the time, according to statistics compiled by Scotusblog. In the two terms before that, 52 percent of the cases decided by now were unanimous.The harmony will dissipate in the final weeks of the term, which will probably conclude in late June. It is the divisive and hard-fought decisions that take the longest to produce, as the justices exchange draft opinions and respond to one other in evolving majority opinions, concurrences and dissents.The marquee decisions of the term — on affirmative action, voting rights and same-sex marriage — will almost certainly be closely divided on the core issues. But the overall percentage of unanimous decisions is unlikely to drop to 40 percent, the average rate for full terms in recent years.For now, consensus reigns. That is partly because some of the recent decisions were decidedly minor. One, concerning a towed car, would not have been out of place in small claims court or before Judge Judy. Another, about the meaning of the word "defalcation" in the Bankruptcy Code, must have made Justice Stephen G. Breyer, its author, wonder what he had done to deserve the assignment.But the justices were unanimous in significant cases, too. They let Monsanto protect its patented genetically modified soybeans and allowed American companies credits for some taxes paid abroad. Both times, the sums at stake were easily in the hundreds of millions of dollars.The recent unanimous cases are noteworthy for a second reason: many truly speak with a single voice. The court led by Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. has set records for faux unanimity, where the justices agree on the result but barnacle the majority opinion with concurrences expressing caveats, interpretive glosses or wholly different rationales.The recent unanimous cases are different. In five of the six, there was just one opinion.Such authentically unanimous decisions are built to last. By contrast, when the justices agree on the result but disagree about the reasons for it, the majority opinion has less force. Pamela C. Corley, a political scientist at Southern Methodist University, wrote a 2010 book on Supreme Court concurrences and found that majority opinions undermined by such concurrences are less likely to be followed in lower-court decisions and in later ones from the Supreme Court.How do the same justices who issue the bitterly contested decisions in headline-grabbing cases manage to agree so often? A new book with an apt title — "The Puzzle of Unanimity: Consensus on the United States Supreme Court" — surveys the territory and suggests some answers.For starters, the justices know that unanimous rulings carry more weight. That is why Chief Justice Earl Warren worked so hard to unite the court in 1954 in Brown v. Board of Education, the school desegregation case, and why President Richard M. Nixon found it hard to argue with the unanimous decision ordering him to turn over the Watergate tapes.A divided decision, Judge Learned Hand wrote in 1958, "cancels the impact of monolithic solidarity on which the authority of a bench of judges so largely depends."The three political scientists who wrote the new book — Professor Corley, Amy Steigerwalt of Georgia State University and Artemus Ward of Northern Illinois University — examined Supreme Court decisions between 1953 and 2004. They found that cases where the law was clear tended to produce unanimous rulings.That sounds obvious. But it is hard to measure. The authors used sensible proxies for identifying straightforward cases: ones in which the lower courts were not divided, ones where there was no dissent in the ruling under review, ones addressing two or fewer legal issues, ones concerning statutes rather than the Constitution and ones that attracted no more than one supporting brief."Even the most ideologically polarized court finds agreement," the authors wrote, "in cases where the available information points to a single legal answer."But they found that just 17 percent of decisions on civil liberties had no concurrences or dissents. In cases concerning government powers or economic matters, almost a third of the decisions were unanimous in that strict sense.And of the 500 cases that appeared on the front page of this newspaper, they found, only 12 percent had no dissents or concurrences.Justice Breyer, interviewed on NPR's "Fresh Air" in 2010, said such coverage could obscure the real work of the court."The press's job is to take those decisions that usually have very great visibility because they're political. So they're in the newspaper," he said. "But you should remember, first of all, that probably 30 to 40 percent of our decisions are unanimous."
CHICAGO — With time running out on Illinois's legislative session, State House members on Friday night chose not to call a vote on whether to permit same-sex couples to wed, apparently because supporters of same-sex marriage did not have enough votes to pass the measure in the Democratic-controlled House.The outcome — which, at a minimum, delays the question for months — came as a grave disappointment to supporters, who had hoped to make Illinois the 13th state to permit same-sex marriage. The state has allowed civil unions for same-sex couples since 2011.Critics of same-sex marriage said the outcome was a rejection of the entire notion, while supporters said a vote was merely delayed and could now come in the fall during a later session.The State Senate approved the measure in February. Gov. Pat Quinn, a Democrat, had long urged House members to support the measure and promised that he intended to sign it. And during a fund-raising event in Chicago on Wednesday, President Obama mentioned the likelihood of a vote in Springfield, where he was a state senator, saying, "It's something that I deeply support."On Friday night, State Representative Greg Harris, a Democrat and the bill's chief sponsor, tearfully announced that the votes were not there, but he told his colleagues on the House floor, "We will be back, and we will be voting on this bill."Supporters of same-sex marriage had a string of victories in other states in May.
For more than a century, the Boy Scouts of America has had something of a monopoly on neckerchiefs, knot-tying, merit badges and all manner of backcountry skills for boys, treating snakebite and frostbite alike.No more. The protracted debate over whether to allow gay scouts and scout leaders has angered many church leaders and parents across the political and religious spectrums. The result is a surge of enrollments in alternative outdoor and character-building programs that cater to pagans and Pentecostals and everyone in between."Before the Boy Scouts was founded in 1908 you had all these independent scouting groups like the Sons of Daniel Boone and the League of Woodcraft Indians," said Jay Mechling, professor emeritus of American studies at the University of California, Davis, and the author of "On My Honor: Boy Scouts and the Making of American Youth." "Now we are starting to see those types of groups again."Some parents are seeking to sever ties with the Boy Scouts because of the May 23 vote to allow gay youths into the program. Still others are indignant that the scouts have not moved more quickly to adopt more inclusive policies.The variety of choices include the Royal Rangers, which offers "Christ-like character formation" for boys, as well as SpiralScouts International, founded by the Aquarian Tabernacle Church of Wicca, which awards badges named for pagan holidays.Churches sponsor 70 percent of the Boy Scouts' 116,000 troops and packs. The two largest chartering organizations nationwide, the Mormon and the United Methodist Churches, have said they will continue their support. But other churches are rallying to dissolve their Boy Scout groups in favor of ones that take a more religious approach.At its annual meeting this month, the Southern Baptist Convention is expected to urge its nearly 46,000 churches in the United States to join or increase their participation in the Bible-based Royal Ambassadors program rather than continue sponsoring Boy Scout troops, said Roger Oldham, the Baptists' spokesman.Days after the Boy Scouts' vote on gay members, the Rev. Ernest Easley, pastor of Roswell Street Baptist Church in Marietta, Ga., used his Sunday sermon to press church members to enroll their boys in the Royal Ambassadors.Roswell Street Baptist had sponsored Troop 204 since 1945, but Mr. Easley said the church had no choice but to leave the Scouts. "We cannot and will not put our arms around any organization that stands morally opposed to what God's word teaches," he said.A meeting of church leaders from a half-dozen denominations and parents who oppose the inclusion of gay scouts is scheduled this month in Louisville, Ky., to discuss building what the organizer, John Stemberger, calls a new "character-development organization for boys."Permitting gay scouts will lead to a "mass exodus from the Boy Scouts program," according to a statement posted on the Web site of the Royal Rangers, a Pentecostal program with about 81,000 members in the United States. Its spokesman, Keith Surface, said inquiries about new groups have doubled since May 23."There have been some organizations and members that have decided not to continue with scouting, but we can't quantify the impact," Deron Smith, a Boy Scouts of America spokesman, said in a statement. If any church abandons scouting, the Boy Scouts of America will help them identify other suitable sponsors, Mr. Smith said.For some parents, the Boy Scouts were never an option for their children."It was hard because I had this organization that I loved and got so much out of as a boy, but I just could not bring myself to sign my own son up," said Todd Schweikert, who was an Eagle Scout, the group's highest rank, in Ames, Iowa, and now lives in Brooklyn. "I just disagree with the Boy Scouts' policies that discriminate against people."This year, Mr. Schweikert, 33, started the 5th Brooklyn Scouts, a secular program for both boys and girls chartered by the Baden-Powell Service Association, named after Robert Baden-Powell, who founded the Boy Scout movement in the early 20th century. Mr. Schweikert's group has 45 members, including his son, Jonathan, 8. They have taken a wilderness survival class in Central Park and on Saturday will volunteer at a run hosted by Brooklyn Pride, which supports gay rights.
Under pressure from legislators and a vigorous campaign by religious and civil rights groups to legalize same-sex marriage in New Mexico, the state's attorney general, Gary King, cautioned city clerks on Thursday against issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples — but at the same time invited litigation, saying that the state's statute was "vulnerable to challenge.""There's a significant issue relating to our equal-protection clause and whether or not the statute would withstand" a legal challenge over giving same-sex couples the same rights granted to other couples who are married in New Mexico, Mr. King said.Hours after his statement, delivered to reporters in Albuquerque, Alexander Hanna and Yon Hudson, who are longtime partners, filed a lawsuit against the Santa Fe County clerk for denying them a marriage license when they applied for it earlier in the day. In March, the American Civil Liberties Union of New Mexico filed a similar lawsuit, which is pending, on behalf of two gay couples in Albuquerque."We believe that the clerk, like other public officials in New Mexico, supports the issuance of marriage licenses to all loving couples who wish to get married," Kate Ferlic, a lawyer for Mr. Hanna and Mr. Hudson, said in an interview. The lawsuit, she said, "is meant to be the means by which they get the legal clarification they need to proceed with issuing licenses."The definition of marriage in the New Mexico Constitution — "a civil contract, for which the consent of contracting parties, capable in law of contracting, is essential" — makes no mention of gender, and that is the central argument of both lawsuits. The distinction exists, however, in marriage license applications used by county clerks across the state, which contain spaces to list the bride and the groom, terms that Mr. King said are "gender-specific."It is exactly this ambiguity in the "statutory framework," he said, that has made the state's marriage statute the subject of conflicting interpretations, fueling battles in court and in the court of public opinion. According to recent polls, more voters support making same-sex marriage illegal than legalizing it, though by small margins. Among young voters, though, there is solid support for same-sex marriage, mirroring national surveys.Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican, has said she believes marriage ought to be between a man and a woman, and she has repeatedly blocked efforts to extend rights to domestic partners and legalize same-sex marriage in New Mexico. She is up for re-election next year. Mr. King, a Democrat, has said he will vie for his party's nomination.On Thursday, he made his opinion on same-sex marriage clear, saying, "If I had the authority to overrule the statutory scheme that is out there, I'd certainly consider doing that." The decision, however, "resides in the Legislature and the courts," he said.New Mexico is the only state in the country that does not have any laws that recognize or prohibit the recognition of same-sex relationships, though it is  surrounded by states whose constitutions restrict marriage to people of opposite sexes. (Colorado approved same-sex civil unions in March.)The battle over legalizing gay marriage in New Mexico began to gather steam in April, when the Santa Fe City Council approved a resolution recognizing it and urging county clerks across the state to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples. The vote was largely symbolic, but it put pressure on Mr. King after the council members asked in their resolution that he weigh in on the issue.In May, 94 of New Mexico's religious leaders signed a statement in support of gay marriage, an idea rejected by the state's three Catholic bishops in a separate statement.On Thursday, Mr. King said, "Policy precludes us to issue opinions when there is pending litigation," referring specifically to the A.C.L.U. lawsuit, the only one that had been filed at the time.Peter Simonson, executive director of the A.C.L.U. of New Mexico, said the state's courts had ruled on several challenges to the equal-protection statute, applying to issues other than same-sex marriage. The decisions, he said, "offer strong precedent for the courts to agree with us."
American Views and Supreme Court Issues: Rulings are expected soon on three big cases: same-sex marriage, affirmative action and voting rights. Here is what the latest New York Times/CBS News poll found about views on those issues.A solid majority of Americans opposes a broad national right to same-sex marriage, saying the power to legalize gay unions should rest with the states — even as most support marriage equality for gay people, according to the latest New York Times/CBS News poll.The survey comes as the Supreme Court is preparing to issue decisions this month on two high-profile same-sex marriage cases. Justices are weighing the constitutionality of California's ban and the Defense of Marriage Act, a 1996 law that denies federal benefits to same-sex couples; the public appears squarely in favor of overturning that law.The poll also found Americans are increasingly upbeat about the economy, with 39 percent of respondents calling the economy's condition good, the highest percentage since late 2007. And it found stark racial and partisan divisions on two other matters before the Supreme Court: affirmative action and voting rights.On national security, Americans expressed strong skepticism about taking the lead in trying to solve overseas conflicts, but support for action against Iran if it is on the verge of acquiring a nuclear weapon. The public continues to support the Obama administration's use of unmanned drone aircraft; 72 percent back their use against people suspected of being terrorists, but 66 percent are concerned the drone program suffers from "not enough oversight."The poll found mistrust of the federal government, amid national debate about whether it has grown too intrusive; in subsequent interviews, several respondents said the federal government should stay out of private lives, and one cited the recent controversy at the Internal Revenue Service, which has acknowledged targeting Tea Party conservatives, in arguing marriage should be left to the states."The federal government is too involved in too many personal things that they don't need to be involved in," said Frances Narramore, 75, a retired teacher in Arizona, who calls herself an independent. "Just look at what's happening at the I.R.S., and you see what I mean by that."Asked whether same-sex marriage rights should be "determined by the federal government or left to each individual state government to decide," 60 percent preferred leaving it to the states, and 33 percent the federal government.Yet respondents also wanted equal treatment for gay people who are already legally married. By a 17-point margin — 56 percent in favor, 39 percent against — they said the federal government should recognize legal marriages of same-sex couples and provide them the same federal benefits given legally married heterosexual couples.In addition to the same-sex marriage cases, the Supreme Court is also likely to issue decisions on two other major cases — one on the Voting Rights Act of 1965 and one on whether public universities can consider race as a factor in admissions — by the end of June.Americans are divided over whether the voting act is necessary; 49 percent said it is, but 44 percent said it is not. Black respondents and Democrats were far more apt to say the act was still needed. The Supreme Court is now reviewing the part of the act that bars jurisdictions with a history of discrimination from changing voting laws without federal approval.More than half of Americans, 53 percent, favor affirmative action programs for minorities in college admissions and hiring, the poll found. (Other surveys that frame the question in terms of giving minorities "preference" find less support.)In a case brought by Abigail Fisher, a white student denied admission to the University of Texas at Austin, the Supreme Court is considering whether to affirm, limit or overturn a 2003 ruling allowing public universities to consider race as one factor in an "holistic review."In the Times/CBS News Poll, those who favor affirmative action said by large margins that they believe achieving diversity is a stronger rationale for it than making up for discrimination.
WASHINGTON — As Justice Lewis F. Powell Jr. was struggling with how to cast the decisive vote in a 1986 Supreme Court case that would end up devastating the gay rights movement, he told his fellow justices that he had never met a homosexual.In truth, one of his four law clerks that term was gay.The atmosphere at the court today is far different from 1986, with a pace of change that may have surpassed that in the rest of society. Openly gay law clerks are now common in the chambers of both liberal and conservative justices. In January, Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. formally admitted about 30 members of the National LGBT Bar Association to the Supreme Court's bar.As the justices consider two major cases on same-sex marriage, with decisions expected this month, they are, of course, focused on legal issues. But students of the court say other factors may also play a role."In addressing for the first time whether the law must recognize lesbian and gay couples as families," said David C. Codell, who served as a law clerk to Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, "certain of the justices undoubtedly will reflect upon their real-world experiences of getting to know and to understand lesbian and gay people as individuals and as members of families."The justices are weighing whether to strike down a federal law that denies federal benefits to married same-sex couples in states that allow such unions, as well as California's ban on same-sex marriage. The second case could establish a nationwide constitutional right to same-sex marriage, though most observers expect a narrower ruling.Over the years, the court's embrace of gay rights has closely tracked changes in popular attitudes, in the legal culture and, perhaps especially, in the visibility of openly gay people at the court. In 1986, when Justice Powell made his remark, there had never been an openly gay law clerk at the Supreme Court. At the time, it was often professionally hazardous for gay lawyers to come out.Although no comprehensive record of gay Supreme Court law clerks exists, Joyce Murdoch and Deb Price — authors of "Courting Justice," a 2001 history of gay rights cases at the court — identified 18 gay men and four lesbians who had been clerks. Ms. Murdoch and Ms. Price also found that the justice most likely to hire gay clerks was the one who said he had never met a homosexual."For six consecutive terms in the 1980s," they wrote, "one or more of Powell's four clerks was gay."Daniel R. Ortiz, who clerked for Justice Powell in 1984 and 1985 and is now a law professor at the University of Virginia, said the clerks of that era kept their sexual orientations to themselves in professional settings. "I certainly wasn't out to anyone who worked at the court," he said.In the next term, the court issued Bowers v. Hardwick, the 5-to-4 decision in which Justice Powell's vote was crucial. The decision upheld a Georgia law that made sodomy a crime.Former clerks and court historians agree that Justice Powell made the remark about having never met a homosexual during a private conference with his fellow justices as they considered the case. According to many accounts, he made a similar statement in front of a clerk.Pamela S. Karlan, now a law professor at Stanford, heard about the comment from her boss that term, Justice Harry A. Blackmun. In a recent interview, she also recalled Justice Blackmun's response: "Look around your chambers."C. Cabell Chinnis, a gay lawyer who practices law in Palo Alto, Calif., was one of Justice Powell's clerks as the justice was struggling with how to vote in the Hardwick case. In an interview, Mr. Chinnis said his boss must have known about his sexual orientation. "He had met my boyfriend," Mr. Chinnis said.Indeed, the justice sought him out for advice precisely because he wanted to learn about the mechanics of gay sex, Mr. Chinnis said, recalling an uncomfortable exchange on the subject. "This 78-year-old man is asking me about erections at the Supreme Court," he said.The conversation was unusual, as Mr. Chinnis was not the clerk who had been assigned to work on that case. But the two kept talking as the justice wrestled with the issues in the case. At one point, Mr. Chinnis recalled, he made a plea to his boss based on a comparison to a pending case about the right to vote in judicial elections."It's more important to me to make love to the person I love," Mr. Chinnis remembered saying, "than to vote for a judge in a local election."Mr. Chinnis said he had a theory about one of Justice Powell's motivations in saying something untrue to the other members of the court: to protect his clerk and perhaps others."Even though he knew one or more people who were gay, they were young and vulnerable," Mr. Chinnis said. "Coming out in a professional setting could be very dangerous."
As the Supreme Court considers overturning California's ban on same-sex marriage , gay people await a ruling that could change their lives. But the case has already transformed one gay man: Ken Mehlman , the once-closeted Republican operative who orchestrated President George W. Bush's 2004 re-election on a platform that included opposition to same-sex marriage.Now Mr. Mehlman, a private equity executive in Manhattan, is waging what could be his final campaign: to convince fellow Republicans that gay marriage is consistent with conservative values and good for their party. His about-face, sparked in part by the lawyer who filed the California lawsuit, has sent him on a personal journey to erase what one new friend in the gay rights movement calls his "incredibly destructive" Bush legacy.He remains controversial, both applauded and vilified. On the left, he is either an unlikely hero or a hypocritical coward. On the right, some Republicans embrace him; others deem him a traitor.Coming out "has been a little bit like the Tom Sawyer funeral, where you show up at your own funeral and you hear what people really think," Mr. Mehlman said in a recent interview in his office at Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, on the 42nd floor of a Midtown skyscraper. "A big part of one's brain that used to worry about this issue has now been freed to worry about things that are much more productive."Mr. Mehlman, 46, remains the hyper-intense, guarded strategist he was in his Bush days, with the same habit of looking past people instead of meeting their eyes. He shuns most interviews and still deflects personal questions, as he did back when rumors about his sexuality swirled."I have a happy life today, and I had a happy life before," he said. Freed of the burden of secrecy, he lives in the gay-friendly Chelsea neighborhood and summers in the Hamptons. Another friend called him "more and more comfortable in his skin." He dates, but said he was not ready to marry.He will not talk about any guilt he might feel for serving as the 2004 campaign manager, when Mr. Bush, courting Christian evangelicals, called for a federal ban on same-sex marriage and conservatives marched to the polls. Mr. Mehlman was rewarded with the chairmanship of the Republican National Committee, a job he held until 2006.Some who once taunted him now praise him, saying coming out is difficult and anyone can change. "If you're going to have an epiphany, do it like Mehlman," said John Aravosis, a gay blogger.Others are still furious. "I doubt Ken Mehlman will ever be anything more than a bitter footnote in the history of our movement," said another blogger, Joe Jervis.And in Ohio, where Mr. Bush's re-election coincided with voter approval of a constitutional ban on same-sex marriage, Mr. Mehlman is persona non grata, said Eric Resnick, a gay journalist who in 2005 confronted the party chairman about his sexuality at a dinner. (Mr. Mehlman ducked the question.)"Ken Mehlman did a lot of damage in Ohio," Mr. Resnick said. "He has not come back to Ohio and said, 'I'm sorry for what I did to you.' "Despite or perhaps because of this past, Mr. Mehlman has carved a rare niche as a go-to Republican in the overwhelmingly Democratic gay advocacy world.Deploying his vast Rolodex but staying mostly behind the scenes, he has worked with the White House (President Obama was his classmate at Harvard Law School) to repeal the military's "don't ask, don't tell" policy; lobbied lawmakers to legalize same-sex marriage in states like New York, Minnesota and New Hampshire; served as an informal adviser to Republicans including Senator Rob Portman of Ohio, who backed marriage rights after learning his son is gay; and recruited Republican donors, helping to raise $4.5 million for gay causes, including an antibullying campaign.He also founded a small nonprofit, Project Right Side, to develop polling data to appeal to conservatives. He sits on the board of the group that brought the case challenging Proposition 8, California's same-sex marriage ban, and gathered the signatures of more than 100 Republicans on a legal brief supporting the suit. When advocates in Maine, where voters rejected same-sex marriage in 2009, tried again last year, Mr. Mehlman helped retool their advertising. They won."He brought a totally fresh perspective that nobody else had, and because he was so prominent, people had to take note," said Matt McTighe, who managed the Maine effort.In articulating a conservative case for gay marriage rights, Mr. Mehlman invokes the term "civil marriage" as a reminder, he said, that he is talking about "marriage under the law, as opposed to marriage as a religious sacrament." In speeches, he likes to say Republicans should back same-sex marriage "because we are conservative, not in spite of being conservatives." He uses Republican-friendly words like "freedom" and "'liberty" as opposed to "equality" — language that Mr. McTighe said resonated with Republicans and conservative Democrats in Maine.
WASHINGTON — Frederick Douglass, the slave turned abolitionist, believed in freedom and equality for "all of us, regardless of our race, gender, religion or sexual orientation," his great-great-granddaughter said Wednesday at the unveiling of a statue of Douglass in the Capitol.The descendant, Nettie Washington Douglass, spoke beneath the bronze statue of Douglass in Emancipation Hall on the day known as Juneteenth, or Emancipation Day, before a crowd of 600 visitors that included Congressional leaders, relatives, current and former city officials, rights activists and historians.Ms. Douglass's nod to her ancestor's support of equality came as the Supreme Court, in chambers just across the street, was preparing to decide cases involving same-sex marriage, affirmative action and voting rights.Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. joined Ms. Douglass and other leaders in hailing Douglass's rise from slavery to prominence as a writer and orator who helped pioneer the abolitionist movement. Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, said Douglass was the "consummate self-made man," while Mr. Biden said he was "one of my favorite Republicans.""He was born in horrific circumstances sanctioned by the laws passed in this very building," Mr. Biden said. "But instead of condemning the nation who made him a slave, he embraced the sustaining principles and used them as a sword to try to free others." He fought, Mr. Biden added, to make "this Capitol, this country" live up to "those ennobling words in the Constitution."Douglass is one of four African-Americans who have been honored with a statue or a bust in the Capitol. The others are the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr., Rosa Parks and Sojourner Truth.The statue of Douglass stands seven feet tall and depicts him in his 50s, leaning against a lectern while giving a speech. It is a gift from the residents of the District of Columbia, presented after Congress passed a law in September to allow the district to be represented among the 50 states in the Capitol's collection of statues.Douglass was born into slavery in Talbot, Md., sometime around February 1818. After teaching himself to read, he escaped at age 20 and fled to New York, where he founded the abolitionist newspaper The North Star and advocated women's suffrage. In 1845, he wrote a memoir, "Narrative of the Life of Frederick Douglass, an American Slave," which became a best seller and an influential abolitionist text. He spent the last 23 years of his life in Washington, where he died at age 77. He was buried in Rochester, where he lived for 25 years.During his time in Washington, Douglass pressed President Abraham Lincoln to end slavery and endorse voting rights for black Americans. Lincoln and two other Republican presidents appointed him to political positions. He also pushed for self-governance and voting rights for the residents of Washington.Eleanor Holmes Norton, a Democrat who is Washington's nonvoting delegate to Congress, has taken up that mantle, repeatedly introducing legislation in Congress that would grant statehood to Washington."Some may know of my strongly held views that D.C. residents must enjoy equal Congressional, voting and self-government rights with other Americans," she told the crowd. "I must defer, however, to Mr. Douglass, whose fervor on this issue is unmatched by any I know or have heard on the subject."The Senate majority leader, Harry Reid, Democrat of Nevada, has thrown his weight behind the latest effort. He announced that on Tuesday he had signed on as a sponsor of legislation that would grant statehood to Washington.
IRVINE, Calif. — For 37 years, Exodus International was the leading beacon of the "ex gay" movement, which maintained that gay men and lesbians could change their sexual orientation through prayer and psychotherapy.But on the opening night of the group's 38th annual conference here, Exodus International announced that the organization would disband, amid growing skepticism among its top officials and board members that sexual attractions can be changed.For the past year, the group's president, Alan Chambers, has been increasingly vocal in proclaiming that therapy could not change a person's sexual orientation. In a statement posted Wednesday on the group's Web site, he cited a recent letter he had written to gay men and lesbians."I am sorry for the pain and hurt many of you have experienced," he said in the letter. "I am sorry that some of you spent years working through the shame and guilt you felt when your attractions didn't change. I am sorry we promoted sexual orientation change efforts and reparative theories about sexual orientation that stigmatized parents."In an interview on Thursday on the campus of Concordia University Irvine, Mr. Chambers said that he believed Exodus International had helped many Christians with same-sex attractions, including himself. But, he added: "Any good we could do in the future would be greatly overshadowed by the real stories of trauma and real stories of shame. So we decided, we can't do anything but close this down. We can't just change our name or change our mission."The closing of Exodus International signals a major upheaval for the ex-gay movement, which has been the target of increasing criticism.Professional associations have denounced its focus on reparative therapy to "cure" homosexuality as not only ineffective but potentially harmful. At the same time, polls have shown a rising number of Americans are more accepting of homosexuality and approving of gay marriage. Last year, California banned gay conversion therapies for minors, although a legal challenge is pending.Still, as Exodus has backed away from efforts to cure homosexuality, other conservative Christian groups have moved to fill the void, and have continued to assert that homosexuality is not innate but an immoral choice.Since last year, when Mr. Chambers — who gave up same-sex relationships to marry a woman — announced that he no longer believed homosexuality could be cured, Exodus's fund-raising has dwindled, officials conceded. Some affiliated ministries and churches have also cut ties with the organization.The Restored Hope Network, which was founded last year after Mr. Chambers's announcement, will hold its own conference this weekend in Oklahoma, competing with the annual Exodus conference.Andrew Comiskey, a Restored Hope board member, wrote on Twitter, "How merciful of God to shut down Exodus, which under Alan Chambers leadership had completely veered off the course of its mission." The Restored Hope Network did not respond to requests for comment.Aaron Bitzer, a plaintiff in the lawsuit challenging California's ban on gay conversion therapy, said that Exodus's closing would do nothing to diminish his faith that such treatment can work, as he said it had for him. A Christian who said he had been attracted to men all his life, he still hoped to one day marry a woman."Will the orientation change completely? I don't know," Mr. Bitzer, 36, said. "I don't think any organization should ever promise 100 percent change. But I have noticed changes in myself. I am satisfied with what I've experienced so far with reparative therapy."Exodus officials said they did not know exactly when the organization would be shut down. The board members plan to start a new ministry whose doors will be open to everyone, including openly gay members, Mr. Chambers said. They are setting up a Web site called reducefear.org.Many gay rights advocates applauded Exodus's closing, as well as Mr. Chambers's apology to gays and lesbians."This is an earthquake that changes everything," said Wayne Besen, director of Truth Wins Out, a group that rebuts what it considers misinformation about gay men and lesbians. "This is like McDonald's shutting down and saying they reject hamburgers. It really highlights the futility of trying to change your sexuality."Yet Mr. Besen remained critical of the views expressed by Mr. Chambers, who has said he still believes that acting on homosexual desires is not condoned by Scripture. Mr. Chambers said he would not push his personal belief on others, but several other Exodus officials, at least, shared his view.Julie Rodgers, 27, said she came to Exodus 10 years ago, hoping to rid herself of same-sex attractions. Speaking on the lawn of the Concordia University campus where she was one of about 250 attending the Exodus conference, she said she no longer believed her attractions could be changed, nor was she willing to date women."Right now, that means a call to singleness," she said. "In the future, I'll trust the Lord."
Curaçao, the Dutch island off the Venezuelan coast, is nice this time of year. Actually, it's nice any time of year. The temperature is in the low 80s and the seawater is nearly as warm. It must be a nice place to give a sermon. But for Katharine Jefferts Schori , since 2006 the presiding bishop of the Episcopal Church in the United States, memories of Curaçao will always be associated with the controversy that greeted her upon her return — another controversy in what has already been a rocky tenure as the head of a troubled, shrinking church.On May 12, Bishop Jefferts Schori preached in All Saints Church in the town of Steenrijk. Curaçao is part of the Episcopal Church's small Diocese of Venezuela, and Bishop Jefferts Schori was making a pastoral call to a distant congregation. Her text was Acts 16:16-34, which includes the story of a slave woman and fortuneteller whom Paul encounters in Philippi, Macedonia.As Luke, who Christians believe is the narrator, tells the story, the woman "had a spirit of divination and brought her owners a great deal of money by fortunetelling. While she followed Paul and us, she would cry out, 'These men are slaves of the Most High God, who proclaim to you a way of salvation.' " After many days, "Paul, very much annoyed, turned and said to the spirit, 'I order you in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her.' And it came out that very hour."This story has historically been read as a tale of exorcism, in which Paul delivers the woman from some sort of indwelling spirit — or, alternatively, strikes a blow for monotheism against local beliefs in plural gods. But as Bishop Jefferts Schori interpreted the passage, Paul was guilty of failing to value diversity, to see the slave girl's beautiful "difference.""Paul is annoyed at the slave girl," Bishop Jefferts Schori preached. "She's telling the same truth Paul and others claim for themselves. But Paul is annoyed, perhaps for being put in his place, and he responds by depriving her of her gift of spiritual awareness. Paul can't abide something he won't see as beautiful or holy, so he tries to destroy it."Within a week, angry Episcopalians — yes, that could be an Updike title — took to the Web with outrage. Articles in Anglican Ink, The Christian Post, and other conservative publications questioned the presiding bishop's exegetical acumen, even her standing as a Christian.Disdain for Bishop Jefferts Schori is common among church conservatives. She is supportive of marriage and ordination for gay men and lesbians, and she has taken a very hard line against dissenting dioceses, many of whose members hold more traditional views. Under her leadership, the Episcopal Church has spent millions of dollars in legal fights to keep the church buildings of congregations whose members have voted to leave the Episcopal Church, often to affiliate with more traditionalist organizations.No presiding bishop could be truly popular right now. Bishop Jefferts Schori assumed her post at a time when, on issues of sexuality and theology, it would be impossible not to make enemies in the church. That said, her rereading of Paul's actions toward the slave girl are indeed provocative."Bishop Jefferts Schori simply ignores what the text says, in order to give a reading that portrays Paul as a patriarchal oppressor who fails to recognize the voice of God in a low-status young girl," said Jordan Hylden, who writes for Christian publications and will soon be ordained an Episcopal priest. The bishop's interpretation is "so obviously wrong," Mr. Hylden continued, in an e-mail, "that the deeper question is: Why does she feel at liberty to give a reading of Scripture that doesn't even try to understand and explain what the text is saying?"Fidelity to the Bible text is obviously never trivial for Christians, but it is especially sensitive for Episcopalians right now. Conservatives believe that the church leadership, which now consecrates gay and lesbian bishops and permits its priests to perform same-sex marriage ceremonies, ignores biblical teachings about sexuality, in both the Old and New Testaments. Although a spokesman for the Episcopal Church said the exact number of members who have departed during Bishop Jefferts Schori's tenure is not available, to take one example, the Anglican Church in North America, which was founded in 2009 and claims to have 1,000 congregations representing 100,000 worshipers, includes many ex-Episcopalians. Their departure has a lot to do with disagreements over how one reads the Bible.Mikeal C. Parsons, a Baylor University professor and author of a book about Acts, wrote in an e-mail that Bishop Jefferts Schori's critics are probably right that "she interprets the text in a direction" that the original author would not recognize. "That is to say," Dr. Parsons wrote, "I do not think the author of Acts is criticizing Paul's actions in any way, certainly not for failing to recognize her 'gift of spiritual awareness.' "On the other hand, Dr. Parsons continued, "there is nothing in the text to suggest" that the spirit in the woman was "evil." The story is not necessarily about an "exorcism" of demonic powers. Rather, after driving the spirit out, Paul is thrown in prison, because "her owners are incensed that their financial exploitation of the girl's divining powers have ended" — they can no longer profit from her fortunetelling. In that sense, Paul is definitely her liberator, in a literal as well as spiritual sense.But Bishop Jefferts Schori pointed out, in an interview on Friday, that elsewhere in the Bible, Paul appears to condone slavery. Her sermon was thus part of a necessary, continuing tradition of interpretation."If the church had never reinterpreted Scripture," the bishop said, "we would still have slavery — legal slavery." Scripture must be read "in our own time and our own context," because prior generations had "a limited view," she said."They had to have a limited view, because none of us is God."
Awaiting a Supreme Court Ruling: The New York Times asked readers how Supreme Court decisions on gay marriage might affect them. For Hampton and Michael Catlin, a binational couple, the ruling could determine where they live.WASHINGTON — Within days, the Supreme Court is expected to issue a series of decisions that could transform three fundamental social institutions: marriage, education and voting.The extraordinary run of blockbuster rulings due in the space of a single week will also reshape the meaning of legal equality and help define for decades to come one of the Constitution's grandest commands: "the equal protection of the laws."If those words require only equal treatment from the government, the rulings are likely to be a mixed bag that will delight and disappoint liberals and conservatives in equal measure. Under that approach, same-sex couples who want to marry would be better off at the end of the term, while blacks and Hispanics could find it harder to get into college and to vote.But a tension runs through the cases, one based on different conceptions of equality. Some justices are committed to formal equality. Others say the Constitution requires a more dynamic kind of equality, one that takes account of the weight of history and of modern disparities.The four major cases yet to be decided concern same-sex marriage, affirmative action in higher education and the fate of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, which places special burdens on states with a history of racial discrimination.Formal equality would require that gay couples be treated just like straight couples when it comes to marriage, white students just like black students when it comes to admissions decisions and Southern states just like Northern ones when it comes to federal oversight of voting. The effect would be to help gay couples, and hurt blacks and Latinos.But such rulings — "liberal" when it comes to gay rights, "conservative" when it comes to race — are hard to reconcile with the historical meaning of the 14th Amendment's equal protection clause, adopted in the wake of the Civil War and meant to protect the newly freed black slaves. It would be odd, said David A. Strauss, a law professor at the University of Chicago, for that amendment to help gays but not blacks."What's weird about it would be the retreat on race, which is the paradigm example of what the 14th Amendment is meant to deal with," he said, "coupled with fairly aggressive action on sexual orientation."But actual as opposed to formal racial equality has fallen out of favor in some circles, Professor Strauss said. "One thing that seems to be going on with these historically excluded groups," he said, "is that they come to be thought of as just another interest group. Blacks seem to have crossed that line."Justice Antonin Scalia appeared to express that view during the argument in February in the voting rights case, Shelby County v. Holder, No. 12-96. "Whenever a society adopts racial entitlements," he said, "it is very difficult to get out of them through the normal political processes."Gay men and lesbians have yet to achieve formal legal equality. They are not protected against job discrimination in much of the nation, may not marry their same-sex partners in most of it and do not have their marriages recognized by the federal government in any of it. The fact that they are asking for equal treatment may help their cause in the cases challenging the federal Defense of Marriage Act, or DOMA, which for purposes of federal benefits defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman, and Proposition 8, the California voter initiative that banned same-sex marriage there.But Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. suggested in March that ordinary politics would sort things out. "As far as I can tell," he told a lawyer challenging the federal marriage law in United States v. Windsor, No. 12-307, "political figures are falling over themselves to endorse your side of the case."In the three months since that argument, three more states have adopted same-sex marriage, raising the total to 12, along with the District of Columbia.Kenji Yoshino, a law professor at New York University, said the two different conceptions of equal protection are animated by different concerns. One is skeptical of government classifications based on race and similar characteristics, whatever their goals. The other tries to make sure that historically disfavored groups are not subordinated."Under Jim Crow," Professor Yoshino said, "both horses ran in the same direction." Southern states enacted laws that drew formal distinctions, and those distinctions oppressed blacks."These days," Professor Yoshino said, "the two horses are running in opposite directions."Consider the case of Abigail Fisher, a white woman who was denied admission to the University of Texas. She says the university, an arm of the state government, should not classify people on the basis of race because that violates a colorblind conception of the Constitution's equal protection clause.Defenders of the university's affirmative action program say the purpose of the classification must figure in the equal protection analysis. "What we're really trying to do is try to make sure there aren't castes in our society, and we will try to lift up castes," Professor Yoshino said.A formal conception of equality helps Ms. Fisher in her case, Fisher v. University of Texas, No. 11-345. A dynamic one helps the university.Whichever side loses a major Supreme Court case is likely to say the decision was an example of judicial activism. That term can be an empty insult, but political scientists try to give it meaning. They say a court is activist when it strikes down a law as unconstitutional. There is a chance the court will be activist in that sense twice this week.It may strike down central provisions of the federal marriage law and of the Voting Rights Act. Should that happen, said Pamela Harris, an adviser to the Supreme Court Institute at Georgetown's law school, "the left will be saying out of one side of its mouth, 'How dare you strike down the considered judgment of Congress in the Voting Rights Act?' " In the same breath, she said, liberals will add, "But great job on DOMA."There is another possibility: one or more of the cases could fizzle, said Walter E. Dellinger, who served as acting solicitor general in the Clinton administration and filed an influential brief in the Proposition 8 case, Hollingsworth v. Perry, No. 12-144. It argued that the failure of officials in California to appeal the judgment against them deprived the Supreme Court of jurisdiction to decide the case, and it was discussed at the argument in March.Mr. Dellinger said all four remaining blockbuster cases suffer from plausible procedural flaws that could lead to their dismissal. "I've never heard of this before," he said of such an end-of-term possibility.An effort to harmonize all of the court's big decisions may in the end prove impossible. "It's hard to imagine somebody happy with everything they do, except Justice Kennedy," Professor Strauss said, referring to the member of the court at its ideological center, Justice Anthony M. Kennedy.That may be just as well for the court's reputation. In giving something to liberals and something to conservatives, as it often does, Professor Strauss said, "the court has avoided putting itself in a position where either side wants to declare war on them."
LOS ANGELES — Less than five years after California voters approved a constitutional amendment banning same-sex marriage , the fate of that referendum — and the ability of thousands of gay men and lesbians to marry — is expected to be decided by the United States Supreme Court this week.But even as the decision is awaited, there is not much apprehension here, in the current epicenter of the fight over same-sex marriage.Proponents now say they have little doubt that even with the worst outcome from the court — upholding the ban — California voters would legalize gay marriage if the measure made it on the ballot again. That level of confidence is evidence of how the cultural and political landscape has shifted here, but also of the lessons learned from the unexpected defeat of five years ago. Even opponents of same-sex marriage, looking at many of the same polls, say they would have a far more difficult battle if California voters were given another chance to vote on the issue.In the four years since the legal challenge to the state's constitutional amendment, Proposition 8, was first filed, gay marriage has become legal in eight more states. Last year, President Obama became the first sitting president to speak out in favor of same-sex marriage, and voters in Maine, Maryland and Washington approved same-sex marriage proposals.Many prominent Republicans — most recently Senator Lisa Murkowski of Alaska — now say they favor same-sex marriage, a significant change from just several years ago.A poll from the Pew Research Center last month showed that 51 percent of Americans supported same-sex marriage, up from less than 40 percent in 2009. Several polls show overwhelming support from young people; a recent Field Poll in California showed that 78 percent of voters under 39 favor making gay marriage legal."There's no other social issue that you could compare that has had this pace of progress," said Chad Griffin, the president of the Human Rights Campaign and founder of the American Foundation for Equal Rights, which filed the legal challenge against California's constitutional amendment in 2009. "When we filed the case, there was far less national support for marriage, but now we've had the single greatest public awareness campaign we've ever had. It has woken up the world and infused some incredible fuel for the movement for equality."Couples all over the state, almost unconcerned with the law, say they are simply waiting for the time when they can have a state-recognized marriage, drawing up wedding plans that they hope to put into action soon."We're going to live our lives the same way anyway — if they say no, we're still going to be together and create a family," said Katie Woodrick, a 33-year-old teacher. She proposed to her partner, Suzanne Murphy, 34, three years ago, though they have held off getting married until the case is decided. "But until it's legal, I worry it will feel fake or pretend. We want the recognition that we're not different from anyone else, that this is a normal thing to do and that we're accepted."In many ways, the preparations for the decision are heading down two tracks: Countless same-sex couples are taking steps to plan weddings, while public officials are preparing for the possibility that they will have to return to the ballot as early as next year."There is no doubt that if we need to put this back on the ballot, we will and that would absolutely favor marriage equality," said Gavin Newsom, the state's lieutenant governor and former mayor of San Francisco, who was a prominent opponent of Proposition 8. "There is no real worse case here. If the court rules to uphold Prop. 8, there will be such a backlash that it would galvanize everyone in the state."Still, some advocates caution against too much optimism, pointing out that in 2008, polls initially showed that voters were against Proposition 8. But it passed with 52 percent of the vote."We were the underdog the last time around, too," said Frank Schubert, a political strategist who spearheaded the fight against the gay marriage ban in California and several other states. While same-sex marriage proponents would most likely have a significant financial advantage, he said, a win would be far from inevitable. "If we win in the courts, then all of the sudden it's a replay with the wind at our backs. People haven't changed their beliefs; some of them have just been cowed into silence."Many advocates say the most important changes have come from one-on-one conversations — that having gay neighbors, co-workers or family members has changed the minds of many people once opposed to same-sex marriage."The level of visibility we have now is just tremendously different," said Lorri L. Jean, the chief executive of the Los Angeles Gay and Lesbian Center. "But the last thing we should say is that this is a slam dunk. If the decision comes our way, it is going to be a death knell for the other side, but we are still going to have a lot of things left to fight for."Last summer, Jason Rodich, 31, a rabbinical student at Hebrew Union College in Los Angeles, married his longtime partner, Fran Benjamin, 26, in their hometown, Minneapolis. The Jewish ceremony had no legal standing, but the two wear rings and refer to each other as husband. Since the Minnesota State Legislature legalized same-sex marriage last month, the couple has considered returning home to get legal status. But with both of them in graduate school here, they are eagerly awaiting the Supreme Court's decision on the state's same-sex marriage ban. As they have begun to look for jobs, they are limiting their search to states with strong protections for gay parents."We never thought about waiting for a legal piece of paper, but right now there is a whole patchwork of laws we have to consider," Mr. Rodich said. "Things have changed, yes, so I would like to think it is inevitable. Legal status would make it clear we are welcome. It is deeply important to our generation and everyone who comes after us."
When the Supreme Court justices announce their decisions in two cases that could reshape marriage in America, few people will be listening more closely than Paul M. Smith, whose life and career have been entwined with the court's three-decade evolution on gay rights.As a secretly gay lawyer in the 1980s, Mr. Smith watched in silent disappointment as his former boss, Justice Lewis F. Powell Jr., joined the majority in a 1986 case that upheld a Georgia sodomy law. Out of the closet by the early 1990s, Mr. Smith went on to successfully argue a 2003 Supreme Court case that overturned sodomy laws in more than a dozen states.It is that case, Lawrence v. Texas, that many legal experts believe laid the groundwork for the same-sex marriage cases before the court today. Mr. Smith worked on one of several challenges to the law barring federal recognition of same-sex marriage. He had also been asked to participate in the other case, about California's ban on same-sex marriage.Beyond his professional interest, Mr. Smith, 58, has a personal stake as a gay man who married his partner in 2010."I'm a member of the affected class," he said in an interview last week, with a note of understatement.The tall, redheaded Yale Law School graduate served as a law clerk for Justice Powell in 1980 and 1981. He did not tell his employer about his sexual orientation. "Very few of us thought we could come out and have a full career," he said.Several years later, in 1986, Justice Powell would cast the deciding vote in Bowers v. Hardwick, the case that upheld the constitutionality of Georgia's sodomy law. Mr. Smith says his reaction was muted. The decision came at a time when, he said, "I had pretty well walled off my gay self."Like many gay men of his generation, Mr. Smith married a woman (in 1983) and started a family. They divorced several years later; his two sons are now in their 20s. After his clerkship with Justice Powell ended, Mr. Smith joined a law firm originally known as Onek, Klein & Farr, that specialized in arguing before the Supreme Court, and racked up a string of appearances that would place him among the nation's elite litigators.By the early 1990s, he had come out but was not widely known as a gay advocate, until his work on Lawrence. The case began with an arrest in Houston of two men accused of violating the state's law against homosexual acts. The lead lawyer on the case, Ruth E. Harlow, had gotten it to the Supreme Court with the help of a team of lawyers from her group, Lambda Legal, and private firms. Then she made a difficult decision to hand off the oral argument to Mr. Smith."If I had argued the case I would have been seen as an activist lawyer from a special interest group," explained Ms. Harlow, now a partner in the law firm of Pepper Hamilton. Mr. Smith was well known to the justices and, she said, would be "the living example of a very accomplished, openly gay man."By then, much had changed from the time of Bowers. On the day of oral argument, as Mr. Smith was getting ready to begin, he got word that Justice Sandra Day O'Connor, who had voted with the majority in Bowers, had recently presented a baby gift to a clerk in a same-sex relationship."It was unimaginable a generation before," said Dale Carpenter, a professor at the University of Minnesota Law School who has written a book on the case.Mr. Smith recalled that he could not put too much stock in the gesture, but felt it offered "a little encouragement."Six justices voted to overturn the Texas law, Justice O'Connor among them.In an angry dissent, Justice Antonin Scalia argued that the majority had "largely signed on to the so-called homosexual agenda." He cited a litany of laws that Justice Anthony M. Kennedy's majority opinion could one day help to overturn, including bans on same-sex marriage. Justice Kennedy countered that the case "does not involve whether the government must give formal recognition to any relationship that homosexual persons seek to enter."Yet now, after 10 years, same-sex marriage is indeed before the court. While few legal experts expect the justices to issue sweeping decisions recognizing a constitutional right to same-sex marriage, neither case could have reached the Supreme Court without Mr. Smith's efforts, Mr. Carpenter insisted."We would not be here today if not for Lawrence v. Texas," he said.
LOS ANGELES — For nearly a year now, Alex Webster has painstakingly planned her July wedding to her longtime partner, Sasha Klein. They chose a location, hired a caterer and even wrote the ceremony. They just did not know whether it would be legal.And even with a decision from the Supreme Court effectively permitting legal gay marriage in California, one basic question remained unanswered: When would same-sex marriages actually begin to happen again?While Gov. Jerry Brown urged local officials to begin taking steps to issue marriage licenses for gay and lesbian couples immediately, public officials and legal scholars said it would probably be about a month before those marriages could be performed. When a lower court threw out the state's ban on same-sex marriage, it issued a stay on new marriages while the case wound its way through the Supreme Court.So for Ms. Webster, Ms. Klein and other gay and lesbian couples in the state, the decision prompted a mix of elation and confusion. And yet, across the country, gay rights advocates welcomed the court's decision as a significant victory at a time when public opinion is shifting sharply."We're going to be celebrating, without a doubt," Ms. Webster, 26, said from her apartment in Davis, Calif. "I've been looking all over to understand what I need to do and when. All of the sudden, we have a lot more questions to deal with, but I've never been happier about that."At a packed San Francisco City Hall, people stood in silence waiting for the decision to be blared on a big screen. Deafening shouts of joy echoed across the rotunda when the news came that the Defense of Marriage Act had been struck down. But there was mere chatter and a smattering of applause as they saw news of the ruling on California's ballot measure banning same-sex marriage, known as Proposition 8.In West Hollywood, as people ran to the streets honking horns and donning rainbow flags in celebration, some advocates initially believed weddings could start this week. And while it soon became clear that the change would not come so quickly, that fact did little to dampen their enthusiasm."Today is the first day I feel like a real citizen in my country," said Kathleen Sullivan, 47, who has been with her partner, Rebecca Levison, for 15 years. The two married in Oregon in 2004, but the marriage was later annulled by the state. While Ms. Levison said she would run to a California courthouse at the first chance she could marry, Ms. Sullivan said she was eager to plan an event that her entire family could attend. "Now it's easy for them to understand," she said. "It's marriage, just like your marriage. And that acknowledgment is really important to me."Kamala Harris, the state attorney general and a longtime supporter of same-sex marriage, wrote in a letter to Mr. Brown that the state's Department of Public Health "can and should" tell county officials that they must resume issuing and recording marriage licenses for same-sex couples as soon as the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit lifts the stay.A spokesman for the Ninth Circuit said that typically it waits 25 days after the Supreme Court decision is finalized. Backers of Proposition 8 said they expected to continue the legal battle, arguing that the lower court's decision applied only in San Francisco and Alameda Counties, where the two couples who sued are from. But during a news conference in Los Angeles, Ms. Harris said she would urge the court to act more quickly and that she would fight any county clerk who refused to issue licenses."As soon as they lift that stay, marriages are on — the wedding bells will ring," she said. "It will happen in all 58 counties."Hours after hearing the court's ruling, Bruce Schwartzmann, 55, and Kurt Harris, 48, went to a post office in San Francisco to mail the invitations to their October wedding. For months now, they had felt confident that the court would strike down Proposition 8. Both have been living with AIDS for the last 25 years and said the decisions were a sign of how much the country had changed in their lifetimes."It's the end of discrimination," Mr. Harris said. "I was bullied and harassed and teased." He read a message he had written on Facebook: "For years, decades, people told us we were different and we went out of our way to prove them right. And now we've finally come to realize we are no different and we must go out of our way to prove them wrong."There is likely to be a flurry of weddings throughout the state. Still, for all the celebration, some saw the court's ruling that the backers of Proposition 8 did not have standing as something of a disappointment."I am satisfied with the outcome, but I'm not ecstatic in the sense that they took the weakest route," said John Iglar, 41, as he stopped for his morning coffee in West Hollywood. "They chose not to stand up, and instead cover their eyes and ears and let someone else deal with it."Ms. Webster, too, said she was disappointed that the ruling would not have any impact in dozens of other states. Still, she saw the day as a victory.By most estimates, her July 13 wedding would take place just eight days before the court is expected to lift the stay, allowing same-sex marriages to begin. And while Ms. Webster said she had no intention of making her ceremony next month a political event, she was considering rewriting parts of the ceremony. Still, she was already searching the Internet for any sign that local officials might somehow begin sooner. Ms. Klein's sister was already planning to officiate, but now the couple is trying to determine whether she should become ordained by the state."We have never had the opportunity to think about what it means to have something legally significant, not only a commitment to each other in front of our families," Ms. Webster said. "It's an honor to think about what that means for our marriage now."
WASHINGTON — Consider two women living at Keesler Air Force Base in Biloxi, Miss., who travel to Maine to get married. When they get back to the base, the military will now recognize their marriage, affording them a variety of benefits that would go to any married couple, like health care and a housing allowance.But once they exit Keesler's gates, they will find their marriage license means nothing to the state of Mississippi, where same-sex couples cannot adopt children and employers can fire someone who is gay.What about the case of a gay couple who married in Des Moines but decide to move to Miami to spend their retirement away from the punishing Iowa winters? If one of them dies there, the other may not be able to collect the surviving spouse's Social Security benefits.The Supreme Court's decision on Wednesday, in United States v. Windsor, to declare that the Defense of Marriage Act violated the Constitution went further than the federal government ever has in extending equal rights to same-sex couples. But it left untouched the thicket of conflicting state and local laws that deny gays and lesbians in the vast majority of states the benefits and legal recognition that marriage provides.A state line — not a minister, a rabbi or a justice of the peace — still decides who is married and who is not. This disparate treatment under the law is likely to remain unless the 37 states that do not permit same-sex unions reverse course, or if the Supreme Court revisits the question in a broader case and issues a ruling that establishes a constitutional right to marriage. Given the court's decision in a case involving California's Proposition 8 on Wednesday, the number of states where gay marriage is legal rose to 13.Even as gay rights advocates celebrated a historic step forward on Wednesday, many of them were already eyeing the next legal frontier that could deliver the universal recognition of marriage rights that eluded them this time."Living in this kind of patchwork country is becoming less and less tenable," said Susan Sommer, the director of constitutional litigation for Lambda Legal, the gay rights group. "If we're going to have federal benefits and recognition, it certainly makes a state's withholding of the freedom to marry come with that much greater a cost — an impairment of liberty."Even factoring out the conflicts and inequities that remain in state law, federal law and policy will need an overhaul to accommodate the court's Windsor decision.Despite its historic sweep, the court's ruling came with a large question mark: It may require Congress to make some of the legal changes necessary to ensure that all married same-sex couples can receive the benefits of federal programs like Social Security and veterans' payments.President Obama said Wednesday that he had directed the attorney general to conduct a prompt review of federal benefits and obligations to ensure that the decision is "implemented swiftly and smoothly." The White House has told gay rights advocates that it has already started looking into what changes it might be able to make through administrative and executive orders, steps that would not require Congressional approval. The Justice Department has created a special task force for the job.The Democrat-controlled Senate is expected to act quickly on legislation introduced by Dianne Feinstein of California on Wednesday that would ensure same-sex couples are not excluded from federal benefits even if they live in states where their marriages are not recognized. But without the Republican-led House's approval, any such measure could not become law.The confusion arises from the various ways the government considers eligibility for spousal benefits. Different agencies use different criteria in judging whether a marriage is valid. They could, for instance, consider the marriage valid only if the state where the couple currently live recognizes it. Or they could look to the state where the couple filed their most recent tax return, or where they lived when they applied for benefits, or where they were married.
Defense of Marriage Act Overturned: The Times's Marcus Mabry on what married same-sex couples can expect after the Supreme Court's decision Wednesday that the law is unconstitutional.WASHINGTON — For more than two weeks, gay rights advocates stood at the steps of the United States Supreme Court waiting to hear decisions from the justices about two cases affecting millions of gay men and lesbians across the nation. With each day that passed without a ruling, they left disappointed.But on Wednesday, the last day the court convened for this term, crowds erupted in cheers just after 10 a.m. as the court overturned the Defense of Marriage Act.Same sex couples who had been waiting for the decision hugged and kissed one another, crying."I can't believe it," Joshua Schneider, an Israeli-American who married his partner last year in New York, said on hearing that the marriage act had been ruled unconstitutional. "I have to call my husband."Gay rights advocates predominated in the crowd, but they were not alone. A few proponents of the Defense of Marriage Act and Proposition 8, which banned same-sex marriage in California, held signs with images and text that supported opposite-sex marriage.The Rev. Robert Schenck, chairman of the Evangelical Church Alliance, called the court's ruling on the marriage act "a bittersweet outcome" in that it took away from the government the capacity to determine the nature of marriage. "We want to preserve marriage to its true nature," he said, which he defined as men and women uniting to form families.Dozens of people made their way to the court building beginning around 7:30 Tuesday night to sit in line in order to be admitted inside on Wednesday morning to hear the decisions. By 7 a.m., the line stretched down the front steps and wrapped around the corner. People stood up to start walking into the building about 7:15 a.m., and court officials started handing out tickets to enter.Coffee cups and candy wrappers lined the sidewalk, and a few sleepy college-aged boys brushed their teeth in the street. "You only can sleep on the cement and witness history once," said Joanne Joseph, a law student at Cornell who is studying religious freedom.Larry Cirignano, a Washington resident from New Jersey, held a sign supporting marriage between a man and a woman."I think this says it all," Mr. Cirignano said. "Man plus woman equals marriage. I think we will continue this discussion across the country for a long time. Thirty-eight states still haven't made it legal."Supporters of the two cases drowned out Mr. Cirignano's words as they chanted: "What do we want? Equality! When do we want it? Now!" The crowd also sang verses of "God Bless America."The scene was relatively tame compared with the throngs outside the hearings that took place in March, but bigger crowds were expected. News media crews clogged the sidewalk in front of the building.Maureen Mentrek and Karna Adam, both sophomores at Dartmouth, said they came to the court at 9:30 Tuesday night to get in line. They said they had slept for about an hour, with pillows and sleeping bags on the sidewalk."It's a huge landmark case and to actually be able to see it and to see these people in line so passionate about it is really great," Mr. Adam said. "It is a changing time for us and these cases are like the civil rights cases used to be for past generations."Jared Milrad, a lawyer who lives in Washington, arrived at the court about 11 p.m. Tuesday night. He said he had come to hear the decisions because DOMA personally affected him. He and his boyfriend were engaged last year in New York and hope to be married within a year."I came for those who couldn't be here whether living or dead, including those heroes of mine in the L.G.B.T. community," Mr. Milrad said.
WASHINGTON — In a pair of major victories for the gay rights movement, the Supreme Court on Wednesday ruled that married same-sex couples were entitled to federal benefits and, by declining to decide a case from California, effectively allowed same-sex marriages there.The rulings leave in place laws banning same-sex marriage around the nation, and the court declined to say whether there was a constitutional right to such unions. But in clearing the way for same-sex marriage in California, the nation's most populous state, the court effectively increased to 13 the number of states that allow it.The decisions will only intensify the fast-moving debate over same-sex marriage, and the clash in the Supreme Court reflected the one around the nation. In the hushed courtroom Wednesday morning, Justice Anthony M. Kennedy announced the majority opinion striking down the federal law in a stately tone that indicated he was delivering a civil rights landmark. After he finished, he sat stonily, looking straight ahead, while Justice Antonin Scalia unleashed a cutting dissent.The vote in the case striking down the federal Defense of Marriage Act was 5 to 4, and Justice Kennedy was joined by the four members of the court's liberal wing. The ruling will immediately extend many benefits to couples married in the states that allow such unions, and it will allow the Obama administration to broaden other benefits through executive actions.The case concerning California's ban on same-sex marriage, enacted in a ballot initiative known as Proposition 8, was decided on technical grounds, with the majority saying that it was not properly before the court. Because officials in California had declined to appeal a trial court's decision against them, and because the proponents of the ban were not entitled to step into the state's shoes to appeal the decision, the court said, it was powerless to issue a decision. That left in place a trial court victory for two same-sex couples who had sought to marry.The vote in the California case was also 5 to 4, but with a different and very unusual alignment of justices. Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. wrote the majority opinion, and he was joined by Justice Scalia and Justices Ruth Bader Ginsburg, Stephen G. Breyer and Elena Kagan. The four dissenters — Justice Kennedy and Justices Clarence Thomas, Samuel A. Alito Jr. and Sonia Sotomayor — said they would have decided whether Proposition 8 was constitutional. But they did not say how they would have voted.The case on the federal law was the more important one from a legal perspective, setting the terms for challenges to state bans on same-sex marriage. Justice Kennedy's reasoning, as Justice Scalia noted at length in dissent, could just as easily have applied to state laws as to the federal one."The federal statute is invalid, for no legitimate purpose overcomes the purpose and effect to disparage and injure those whom the state, by its marriage laws, sought to protect in personhood and dignity," Justice Kennedy wrote. "By seeking to displace this protection and treating those persons as living in marriages less respected than others, the federal statute is in violation of the Fifth Amendment."He said the law was motivated by a desire to harm gay and lesbian couples and their families, demeaning the "moral and sexual choices" of such couples and humiliating "tens of thousands of children now being raised by same-sex couples."The constitutional basis for striking down the law was not entirely clear, as it had elements of federalism, equal protection and due process. Justice Kennedy said the law's basic flaw was in its "deprivation of the  liberty of the person protected by the Fifth Amendment."He added that the ruling applied only to marriages from states that allowed gay and lesbian couples to wed.Dissenting from the bench, Justice Scalia said that that declaration took "real cheek."
With the expected addition of Californians after Wednesday's Supreme Court ruling, some 30 percent of Americans will live in states offering same-sex marriage.Now the two sides of the marriage wars are gearing up to resume the costly state-by-state battles that could, in the hopes of each, spread marriage equality to several more states in the next few years, or reveal a brick wall of values that cannot be breached. There is wide agreement from both sides on where the next battlefields will be.Proponents of same-sex marriage were already energized by victories in six states over the last year, bringing the total number authorizing such unions to 12 states, before California, and the District of Columbia. They are hoping for legislative victories this fall or next spring in Illinois and possibly New Jersey and Hawaii.Twenty-nine states — not including California —have constitutional amendments defining marriage as between a man and a woman. Some advocates expect that in the November 2014 elections, Oregon and perhaps Ohio could become the first states to undo their amendments. At the same time, a court case in New Mexico could extend marriage rights.These strategists agree they are unlikely to win over more conservative states in the South and the West in the foreseeable future. But, looking at the historical experience with issues like bans on interracial marriage, which the Supreme Court outlawed only in 1967, they feel confident that if equality spreads to more states and public attitudes continue shifting, a future Supreme Court will find that marriage is a right for gay men and lesbians as well as heterosexuals."Building a critical mass of states and a critical mass of public support — that's how social movements succeed," said Evan Wolfson, the founder of Freedom to Marry. "We'll pursue this strategy until we finish the job," he said, "and I think it will be a matter of years, not decades."The opponents of same-sex marriage, while unhappy that the Supreme Court struck down a key part of the Defense of Marriage Act and opened the door to gay marriage in California, are taking heart that the court did not declare same-sex marriage a constitutional right.After a recent succession of stinging defeats in Delaware, Maryland, Maine, Minnesota, Rhode Island and Washington State — after political campaigns in which they were heavily outspent — the groups have also vowed to step up fund-raising for advertising and mobilizing supporters."These court decisions could be a real boon to our fund-raising," said Frank Schubert, a conservative political consultant and vice president of the National Organization for Marriage. "People tend to react when the wolf is at the door."The conservatives also think their opponents have harvested the "low-hanging fruit" of liberal states and are nearing a limit."The lines are being drawn between states that stand with natural, traditional marriage and states that redefined it," said Tony Perkins, president of the Family Research Council, a conservative Christian organization. He predicts that more Americans will turn against same-sex marriage when they see what he called its pernicious consequences — like introducing teachings in school that parents consider immoral or forcing Christian business owners like florists and caterers to participate in gay marriages against their will.Perhaps the most immediate battle will be in Illinois, a populous state with a Democratic legislature where the Senate has already approved same-sex marriage. Gov. Pat Quinn, a Democrat, urged legislators on Wednesday to "redouble our efforts to make it happen."Many had expected the marriage bill to be adopted in May. But at the last minute, its House sponsor did not offer it for a vote, apparently fearing that the bill could lose. Gay rights groups say they think the votes are there for a victory at a brief legislative session this fall. But they, and the National Organization for Marriage on the other side, are raising funds for an all-out public campaign over the next few months.The New Jersey Legislature enacted same-sex marriage in 2012, but the measure was vetoed by Gov. Chris Christie, a Republican, and the Legislature has not taken further action. Gay rights groups are working to gain votes, but they are also hopeful that Wednesday's Supreme Court decision to strike down parts of the Defense of Marriage Act, thus extending federal benefits to same-sex married couples, will gain them a rapid victory in state courts or the Legislature.New Jersey, like six other states, offers legal civil unions but not marriage to gay couples. According to a 2006 decision by the State Supreme Court, such unions must provide legal protections equal to those offered heterosexual couples. But even after Wednesday's decision, the federal government will not recognize civil unions, said Troy Stevenson, executive director of Garden State Equality — bolstering the argument that unions and marriage are not equal.In broader ways, the end of the Defense of Marriage Act's ban on federal benefits for same-sex spouses will strengthen the gay-marriage cause nationally by highlighting inconsistencies and unfairness among the states, said Fred Sainz, a vice president of the Human Rights Campaign in Washington.Wednesday's rulings, he said, will shine a light on the "two Americas: one in which legally married gay couples live and the other in which unmarried gay families live," with basic protections still out of reach.
LOS ANGELES — The two couples who sued to overturn California's ban on same-sex marriage were married late Friday afternoon, just hours after the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, in San Francisco, lifted the stay that had been in place.The court had stopped same-sex marriages while the case wound its way through the Supreme Court, which issued its decision to clear the path for same-sex marriages in California on Wednesday.Attorney General Kamala Harris rushed to San Francisco City Hall within minutes of the ruling to perform the wedding for Kris Perry and Sandy Stier, who have been together for more than 15 years and have four sons.Many legal experts and advocates had expected the court to wait for an official decision from the Supreme Court, as is the normal practice. But after the initial ruling was issued on Wednesday, Ms. Harris urged the Circuit Court to act immediately and said she would ensure that all counties in the state were prepared to issue licenses to same-sex couples.Just after 3 p.m. Friday, the three-judge panel issued a one-sentence ruling lifting the stay on a district judge's injunction to not enforce the ban on same-sex marriages.Gov. Jerry Brown issued a statement late Friday afternoon saying that he had directed the state's Department of Health to notify all 58 counties in the state that "same-sex marriage is now legal in California and that marriage licenses must be issued to same-sex couples immediately."While Sacramento County officials said they planned to stay open late Friday to issue licenses, most applicants were probably waiting until Monday, when all counties will be open for regular business.Mayor Antonio R. Villaraigosa of Los Angeles, on his last workday in office, officiated at the Friday evening wedding of Paul Katami and Jeffrey Zarrillo, the two other plaintiffs in the case. Until Friday afternoon, they had no idea when their marriage could take place."Nobody really knew; that's what our lawyers are there for. We don't really care about any of that at this point, but we're on our way to see the mayor," Mr. Zarrillo told KCRW, a public radio station in Los Angeles.The pair were stuck in traffic en route from their home to the county office to obtain their marriage license and then to City Hall downtown. But by 6:30 they walked in front of dozens of television cameras, kissed Mayor Villaraigosa and were pronounced married."Your relationship is an inspiration to us all," Mr. Villaraigosa said. "Today, your wait is finally over."John J. Duran, a councilman from West Hollywood, said that within hours of the court ruling Friday he had promised to officiate at two weddings next week.Andy Pugno, the general counsel for ProtectMarriage.com, said the court had rushed a decision on Proposition 8, the state's ban on same-sex marriage, and called it a "disgraceful day for California.""This outrageous act tops off a chronic pattern of lawlessness, throughout this case, by judges and politicians hellbent on thwarting the vote of the people to redefine marriage by any means, even outright corruption," he said in a statement.Six months after the State Supreme Court ruled that gay men and lesbians had the right to be married, California voters approved the constitutional amendment banning same-sex marriages.An estimated 18,000 couples were married during that six-month window in 2008, and while the state's highest court ruled that the ban was legal, it said same-sex marriages that had already occurred remained valid.In City Hall in San Francisco, hundreds packed the rotunda — some weeping with joy — to watch Ms. Perry, in a beige suit, and Ms. Stier, in an eggshell dress, marry.After standing in silence for the ceremony, the crowd erupted into cheers when Ms. Harris announced them "spouses for life.""These marriages are legitimate, they are legal and they are going to continue, and it's about time," Ms. Harris said.Dozens of couples were lined up to follow the brides. The San Francisco County Clerk planned to stay open three hours later on Friday and from 9 a.m. until 5 p.m. Saturday to issue marriage licenses and perform weddings.Cathy Sutton, 57, and Christina Segatto, 56, were having lunch in their apartment nearby when they heard the news that weddings would begin immediately."We ran over here," said Ms. Sutton, her brow still sweaty. "We didn't even have time to change."So Ms. Sutton was married wearing a faded Super Bowl sweatshirt and Ms. Segatto in jeans. They planned to celebrate over drinks Friday night."Since we didn't have time to plan our wedding we're going to go plan our honeymoon," Ms. Segatto said.
WASHINGTON — In the dining room of their town house here, David Huebner and John Barabino were the picture of prosperous domesticity this week. A housekeeper padded about, work on their outdoor patio continued and their 3-year-old son, Miles, napped upstairs.But together, they put a human face on an uncomfortable truth: Mr. Huebner and Mr. Barabino's union, although legal, is still not equal to that of their heterosexual friends, even after historic Supreme Court rulings to grant federal benefits to legally married gay couples and restore same-sex marriage in California.While the plaintiff in the Defense of Marriage Act case, Edith Windsor, will get back $363,000 in federal estate taxes — "with interest," her lawyer, Roberta Kaplan, said — the future is not so clear for Mr. Huebner and Mr. Barabino. They married in California (before the now-overturned ban) and adopted their son there. Their primary home is in Utah, which does not recognize their marriage. But they live part time in Washington, which does.They are among thousands of legally married same-sex couples, wed in one state but living in another, caught in a confusing web of laws and regulations. It is a predicament the Obama administration is only beginning to grapple with: how to extend federal rights and benefits to same-sex couples when states, not the federal government, dictate who is married."The couples in those states also have skim-milk marriages," said Ms. Kaplan, referring to a remark by Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg. "It's just the flip side, in the sense that they may have marriages that are recognized by federal law, but not state law."Taxes are a big concern. The Internal Revenue Service will determine whether Mr. Huebner, 40, a psychology professor at the University of Utah, and Mr. Barabino, 44, a former Google executive and stay-at-home father, may file jointly and claim the marriage deduction long offered to heterosexual couples. But no matter what the agency decides, they must still file separately in Utah.Should one die in Washington, the other would receive Social Security benefits because of the court's decision, legal experts said. But in Utah, the surviving spouse would get nothing since federal law dictates payments based on the "state of domicile," not the "state of celebration." Only Congress can change that."There are two standards," Mr. Huebner said. Given their residence in two states, "for us, it's even more complicated."Eliminating these cross-border inequities and making same-sex marriage the law of the land is the next frontier for gay rights advocates. A day after the ruling, Chad H. Griffin, the president of the Human Rights Campaign, appeared at a gay community center in Utah — where gay couples cannot adopt and even domestic partnerships are banned — to draw a pointed distinction with California, where gay men and lesbians will be able to begin marrying again soon."We cannot tolerate the persistence of two Americas when it comes to equality," Mr. Griffin said.If the prospect of "two Americas" is a problem for Mr. Griffin, it also troubles Brian S. Brown, the president of the National Organization for Marriage, a conservative advocacy group. In an interview, he vowed to "roll back gay marriage" wherever it exists, adding, "Ultimately, as Lincoln said, we can't have a country half slave and half free."There are an estimated 650,000 same-sex couples in the United States, and 114,000 of them are legally married, according to the Williams Institute at the University of California, Los Angeles. It will be easy for the federal government to extend more than 1,000 benefits to those living in states where they wed. For the rest, the path is murkier.After their daughter, Soleil, was born six years ago, Mindy Stokes and Katie Rathmell left Florida for a friendlier climate in Oregon, where they registered as domestic partners. Last year, same-sex marriage became legal in neighboring Washington State. Two weeks ago, they drove across the Columbia River from their home in Astoria, crossed the border and had a wedding.
NEW YORK — When the television series "Mad Men" debuted in 2007, virtually everyone it portrayed was steadily (if not thrillingly) married, children tended to grow up with their fathers, women kept to their place, and nobody was known to be gay.And then, over eight plot years, the future happens.Women rise and seek equality. Marriages are fled more easily. Children start to grow up without fathers. Grandparents step in to help single mothers. Gay people peek out of the closet, and some straights seem unfazed. Marriage and childbearing are delayed for careers. Couples cooperate in child rearing without marrying. Double-income households let children slip through the cracks.For a fictional series set half a century ago, "Mad Men" does a remarkable job of reflecting America's present-day struggles with changing family patterns. It takes care to show how progress and decay walk arm in arm, how good change can sour into bad.Alas, this nuance and complexity are virtually absent from the nonfiction realm of the national political conversation. In a period of stunning change in the structures of family life, America isn't having an honest, broad-based discussion about how to cope.In part, that's because same-sex marriage has consumed so much of the oxygen surrounding the issue. With the Supreme Court this past week giving a pair of victories to proponents of such marriage, it may be time to have the rest of the discussion.Of course, the conversation has also been limited because of polarization. Whether on Capitol Hill in Washington or at dinner tables from coast to coast or in the blogosphere, Americans are bitterly divided over how to talk about the changing family.Discussions on the right typically narrate a nostalgic story centered on the collapse of marriage. It used to be strong and stable, the story goes; now it's threatened by gays, premarital sex, careerism, divorce, absent fatherhood and a too-permissive culture. This worldview tends to see other social problems — like crime and the drug war — as inevitable byproducts of weak families."Communities, neighbors, states and nations bear large costs at the collective levels when families break down," W. Bradford Wilcox, director of the National Marriage Project at the University of Virginia, has said. "Evidence suggests to us that intact, biological marriage is still the gold standard."Discussions on the left tend to be haunted by history. For too long, the story goes, state power has been used to sanction one type of family life, at the expense of all those who failed to conform to that standard: gays, minorities, the childless, divorcés. Far better, the logic goes, to leave people to make their own choices and provide government support so that families are luxuries, not economic necessities. Where the fraying family is discussed, it tends to be presented as a consequence of other social problems — like unemployment and mass incarceration — rather than a cause."Surely a country that claims compassion and democracy as core values should reject as inadequate and misleading the marriage and fatherhood formula as a response to poverty," said a report published in 2008 by the liberal groups Political Research Associates and the Women of Color Resource Center. "True compassion and democracy would respect the right of low-income women to make their own decisions and provide proven pathways out of poverty as the first line of assistance."Starkly opposed positions may be good for think-tank fund-raising, but they do not a good society make. Is there a middle ground between doing too much and doing nothing? Between family conformity and family dissolution? Between nostalgia for a perfect family that's never coming back (and may never have existed) and a refusal of the idea that life is easier when you're not alone?That middle ground may be found by thinking of the family as, in effect, a huddle: a way of sharing risk and joy, having others to lean on when life makes it hard to stand. It will be hard for the extremists to swallow, but it may be possible to argue, in the very same breath, that the huddles people form are inevitably growing ever more diverse; and that huddling makes life easier than not."Is 'the family' a barbaric, premodern holdover institution, perpetuating irrational relations and inherited forms of inequality?" Philip N. Cohen, a University of Maryland sociologist who studies the institution, writes on his blog. "Or is it a 'haven in a heartless world,"' he asks, "one of the few places where people still have any loyalty to anyone but themselves? I think it's both."If that is so, it is worth continuing to argue, as we have been, about the appropriate forms, legally and otherwise, of huddle. But the more urgent discussion may be about the unhuddled.Gay or straight, old or young, a staggering number of Americans live isolated today. They struggle to make reliable commitments and to have reliable commitments made to them. They create children they cannot raise. They grow up with too few hours of devoted parenting. They live alone, one doctor's bill from ruin.Everyone has their preferred culprit: welfare, bad schools, tax policy, drug laws, hip-hop, the vaporization of manufacturing jobs.Perhaps all these things are involved. But if the national dialogue continues to dwell on what forms of huddling should be legal, it risks missing the forest for the trees — leaving behind the millions whose problem is having no one with whom to huddle.Join an online conversation at http://anand.ly and follow on Twitter.com/anandwrites
SAN FRANCISCO — The words "spouses for life" echoed throughout City Hall on Saturday as hundreds of same-sex couples were married in stairways, rotundas and seemingly every open space in the building.Hundreds of thousands of gay men and lesbians from across the country were already en route to San Francisco for the city's annual gay pride parade this weekend when news broke on Friday afternoon that the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit had lifted the stay on same-sex marriages, allowing counties to immediately begin issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples.The county clerk's office here, usually open only on weekdays, extended its hours on Friday and planned to stay open through Sunday to accommodate the hordes of same-sex couples wanting to become newlyweds. And city officials planned for record attendance — as many as 1.5 million people — at the gay pride parade."I already feel less stressed and more secure just knowing we can get married today," said Antoinette Torri, 31, who woke up at 4:30 a.m. and drove down from Sonoma, Calif., with her soon-to-be wife, Petra.The couple were first in a line of more than a hundred same-sex couples that began forming in front of City Hall hours before officials opened the doors at 9 a.m. Some wore formal wedding gowns, others matching Hawaiian shirts and khaki shorts. There were those pushing strollers and quieting crying infants and a handful who looked to be nursing hangovers. "Congratulations! It's about time!" yelled a driver passing by in a car, honking."Welcome to San Francisco. Step right this way," said Gabriel Breitzke-Rivera, who wore a black robe while directing eager couples as City Hall finally opened its doors. By midmorning on Saturday, Mr. Breitzke-Rivera, a deputy marriage commissioner, had already performed dozens of same-sex marriages. "I wept through the first three ceremonies I did yesterday," said Mr. Breitzke-Rivera, 61, a retired sheriff who now volunteers at the county clerk's office officiating vows.As a gay man who married his partner during the six-month window in 2008 when some 18,000 couples were legally married in the state, Mr. Breitzke-Rivera is a strong supporter of the institution of marriage. "Marriage strengthened my relationship. It gave us a legitimacy," he said. "It is also something you feel deep in your heart."Even as weddings were under way here, lawyers for a group that opposes same-sex marriage filed an emergency motion on Saturday requesting that the United States Supreme Court step in to stop counties from issuing marriages licenses to same-sex couples. In their petition to the court, lawyers for the group, Alliance Defending Freedom, claimed that the federal appeals court had acted prematurely when it lifted the stay on same-sex marriage on Friday before the standard 25-day waiting period during which parties can request that the court rehear a case.Despite the legal maneuvering, the city was in a festive mood Saturday. Outside City Hall, a light breeze off the Pacific Ocean made a line of rainbow flags flutter, and law enforcement officials began blocking off major streets in preparation for Sunday's parade. Inside, couples high-fived after signing their marriage licenses and clerks busily passed out standard-issue booklets titled, "Your Future Together."Capt. Michael Potoczniak, 38, wore his camouflage uniform to marry his partner of 10 years, Todd Saunders, 47. A Veterans Affairs psychologist, Captain Potoczniak was to fly to Texas on Sunday for Army Reserves basic training."I can sleep easier now," said Captain Potoczniak, "because I know that if anything happens to me anywhere in the world, he is my husband now, and we have the rights of other married people."
LARAMIE, Wyo. — For State Representative Cathy Connolly, Wyoming's only openly gay legislator, this winter brought a rare moment of promise: her bill to create domestic partnerships advanced further than anything like it in the history of this deep red state — sailing through committee and onto the floor of the full House. Victory seemed possible. But when a crucial vote came, the bill failed.Afterward, a colleague who had voted against the measure hugged Ms. Connolly, a Democrat from Laramie, and told her that it was nothing personal. "I had to say, 'Yes it is,' " Ms. Connolly said, recalling the conversation several months later.Being gay in Wyoming, known as the Equality State, has never been simple, and last week's Supreme Court rulings, hailed as a victory for same-sex marriage, did little to change that. While many gay couples here cheered the decisions, they also said they woke up the next morning not feeling much more equal than they had the day before."It's remarkably frustrating," said Carl Oleson, who lives with his partner of 16 years, Rob Johnston, in Casper, near the center of Wyoming's oil and gas boom. "There are no protections here. None."Nationwide, the movement to legalize same-sex marriage may be bolstered by court rulings, growing political support and shifting public opinion. But for gay couples who live in the conservative rural heartland, like Mr. Oleson and Mr. Johnston, any changes in the landscape feel as slow as the upwelling of mountain ranges.Like 36 other states, Wyoming limits marriage to a man and a woman. State lawmakers have voted down attempts to include gay and transgender people in Wyoming's antidiscrimination laws. There are no hate-crime laws on the books, according to the Human Rights Campaign, a gay rights advocacy group.For gay couples, life can be a delicate balance. The closest gay bar is often a long drive south to Colorado. Some couples said they introduce their partners as friends or roommates and shy away from holding hands or kissing in public."You have to balance between so many things here," said Mr. Oleson, who said he manages a retail store but declined to be more specific. "I still have to be a little bit discreet."Wyoming has never been easy to pigeonhole when it comes to gay rights. Republicans dominate state and local politics, and support for gun rights, low taxes and small government runs as deep as groundwater. But so does a cowboy libertarian streak, residents say, rooted in ranches, homesteads and a notion of "You live your life, and I'll live mine."Wyoming repealed its sodomy law in 1977, a generation before the Supreme Court declared such laws unconstitutional. Several times in recent years, Republican lawmakers have rejected efforts by social conservatives to ban the recognition of same-sex marriages from other states or to add "defense of marriage" amendments to the State Constitution.Eight years ago, an openly gay 27-year-old named Guy Padgett served a term as the mayor of Casper. People who would never support same-sex marriage nonetheless gave him a fair shake, he said. In a state where many voters are on a first-name basis with the governor and see their elected officials in church or cafes, it is harder to vilify people you disagree with, residents said."I've never felt uncomfortable or threatened or out of place," said Mr. Padgett, a Democrat who now lives in Denver. "There is a strong streak in the Republican Party in Wyoming to let people live their lives — that sort of respect for space."In some more conservative quarters, the Supreme Court's decision to strike down the federal Defense of Marriage Act felt like an attack on that let-live ethos. Mark Baker, a Republican state representative from Rock Springs, said Wyoming was comfortable with marriage as it stood in the state. He said he had considered the arguments for allowing everyone to marry — his half sister is a lesbian, he said — but called same-sex marriage the first step on a "slippery slope.""Once you go down that path, where do you stop?" Mr. Baker said. "Is it going to be legal for four or five people to marry because they love one another?"Ms. Connolly said she was aware of that argument when she introduced her bill last winter to create domestic partnerships for gay couples — the latest of several failed attempts to cajole her conservative colleagues.Ms. Connolly, a professor of women's studies at the University of Wyoming, had forged friendships and close working relationships with many Republican colleagues, but to at least a few of them she was still a source of discomfort.This year, one legislator approached Ms. Connolly and told her, "I love you, but I don't want to know anything about your personal life," which that legislator called "offensive.""I had to walk away," Ms. Connolly said, "and say, 'I am not offensive.' "Ms. Connolly found allies among several moderate Republicans — critical support in a chamber with 52 Republicans and eight Democrats. The two biggest newspapers in the state endorsed the measure. And it passed a committee vote, 7 to 2.When it came time to argue the measure on the floor of the Wyoming House, the bill's supporters decided that their best hope was to let its Republican supporters do the talking. Ms. Connolly and the other Democrats sat quietly.It was defeated by a vote of 35 to 24.Despite the loss, to some it was a sign that things were changing. Slowly, but changing.The Rev. Dee Lundberg, the openly gay pastor of the United Church of Christ in Casper, has been called Satan's spawn at least once since coming to Wyoming in 2008, and she said she had been treated coldly at times by the city's ministerial groups. But during last summer's rodeo parade, the church flew a big rainbow flag on the back of its trailer and, Ms. Lundberg said, "only got flipped off once.""It's a slow crawl," she said. "But every year there's been a teeny tiny bit of progress. A generation from now, it'll be a nonissue."
LOS ANGELES — Sinai Temple is a Conservative Jewish congregation perched on a hill in Westwood, famous for its wealth, its sizable population of Persians, many of whom fled Iran after the fall of the shah, and a well-known and outspoken rabbi who has at times pushed his congregation on ideologically adventurous paths.So it was that three weeks before the Supreme Court cleared the way for same-sex marriage in California, the rabbi, David Wolpe, announced in a letter to the synagogue that gay marriages would be performed in this 107-year-old congregation, as soon as the court ruling he anticipated was handed down.Celebrating same-sex marriages is hardly a new stand for Conservative Jewish congregations. But the decision in this distinctive synagogue has set off a storm of protests in recent days, particularly from Persian Jews, reflecting not only the unusual makeup of the congregation but also the generational and cultural divisions among some Jews over how to respond to changing civil views of homosexuality."To officiate a union that is expressly not for the same godly purpose of procreation and to call such a relationship 'sanctified' is unacceptable to a sound mind," M. Michael Naim, an architect, said in an open letter to other Iranian members of the congregation. "Homosexuality is explicitly condemned in Scripture and has been categorically and passionately rejected by all classical Jewish legal and ethical thinkers as a cardinal vice in the same category as incest, murder and idolatry."This is not the first time that Rabbi Wolpe, 54, has attracted national attention for the views he has pressed on his congregation. In one noted sermon, he expressed doubt about one of the great stories of Jewish life, the exodus of Jews from Egypt into the wilderness.The synagogue is an anchor of the Los Angeles Jewish community, and Rabbi Wolpe himself is such an entrenched figure there that there seems little chance that its existence, or his tenure, is endangered. Still, the argument within the congregation offered a striking contrast to the images of gay couples across this state rushing to be married, reflected in smiling faces in newspapers and on evening television.Mr. Naim said he was leaving the congregation. Rabbi Wolpe said that 10 families had told him so far that they intended to either leave the synagogue or withdraw their children from its school, to protest a policy they denounced as a violation of Jewish teachings and the traditions they had brought here when they fled the Iranian revolution of 1979.Rabbi Wolpe said that based on letters he had received, and comments voiced to him as he walked the aisles of the sprawling, sunny sanctuary on Wilshire Boulevard during Saturday morning service, close to half of the congregation of 2,000 families, which is about half Persian, was unhappy with the new policy."The Persian community is pretty heavily weighted against the idea of same-sex marriage," Rabbi Wolpe said. "And there are some non-Persians who also oppose it, and have made their convictions clear to me.""I've been wanting to do this for a long time," Rabbi Wolpe said. "I was doing it on my internal timetable in the synagogue, which was to try to bring people along slowly because I knew this would be very difficult for many people. I think it's the most controversial thing I've ever done or will do."The decision by Rabbi Wolpe, who has been at this synagogue for 15 years and is one of the country's best known rabbis, was very much in accordance with other Conservative congregations. Conservative Judaism is perched between the more liberal Reform and Reconstructionist movements, which have long accepted gay clergy members, and the Orthodox, which rejects it.Some Conservative congregations have gay rabbis and cantors. But the announcement and its aftermath served as a reminder of one of the things that distinguish Sinai Temple and nearby Beverly Hills: a heavy and at times insular presence of Persians, as many call themselves, and many of them are fiercely protective of their past and religious beliefs.At Saturday services last week, the roll call of deceased members read off during the memorial conclusion of the service, in preparation for the chanting of the mourners' Kaddish, was rich with Persian names, a notable addition to the usual roster of names like Abramowitz and Schwartz. And the girl who read from the Torah to observe her bat mitzvah was the daughter of Persian immigrants.The resistance Rabbi Wolpe is finding among Persian Jews is, like much of the country, generational. Rabbi Ed Feinstein of Valley Beth Shalom in Encino, which also has a significant Persian population, said that he has long performed same-sex ceremonies, without any pushback.
WASHINGTON — The federal government is moving quickly to extend benefits like health care and life insurance to gay and lesbian married couples in response to the Supreme Court decision that struck down the Defense of Marriage Act.And in a sign that the political momentum from that ruling is being felt elsewhere, a Senate committee is expected to approve a bill on Wednesday that would grant protection from discrimination to people on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity. It would be the first measure of its kind to advance to the floor in either house of Congress.In recent days, officials from all three branches of government have notified their workers of the expanded eligibility standards for spousal benefits.The latest and perhaps most striking example of the shift, coming after 17 years in which the federal government was expressly prohibited from recognizing same-sex marriages, was announced on Tuesday when the House of Representatives issued a memo alerting its employees to the changes.Word came from the chief administrative officer of the House, who was nominated by the Republican speaker and confirmed by the Republican majority. House Republicans spent millions in lawyers' fees defending the marriage law, after the Obama administration decided it would no longer do so.But with the Supreme Court having the final say in the matter, the House had few options but to notify all 435 representatives and their staff members in all 50 states that they have 60 days to enroll their same-sex spouses in an array of benefits like vision, dental, long-term care and survivors' annuities. "I'm pleased that they're proceeding, but I don't think they had a choice," said Representative David Cicilline, Democrat of Rhode Island, who is one of the seven openly gay, lesbian or bisexual members of Congress. "I think people expect that once the court has spoken, even though they might disagree with the particular decision, it is the law of the land. And it's our responsibility, especially those in government, to honor and follow the law."The Senate and the Administrative Office of the United States Courts have also sent out advisories in recent days pointing to a directive issued by the Office of Personnel Management, the executive branch's human resources division, affirming the rights of same-sex couples to receive federal benefits, regardless of their state of residency.As straightforward as awarding benefits might seem after an unambiguous Supreme Court decision, any changes that are applied across an entity as vast as the federal government are a huge logistical undertaking.In some instances, government agencies will consider a marriage valid only if the state where the couple currently live recognizes it. Others will look to the state where the couple filed their most recent tax return, or where they lived when they applied for benefits, or where they were married.Most government entities, like the Internal Revenue Service and the Social Security Administration, are still examining how to apply the ruling to same-sex couples. The Justice Department has convened a special task force to assist.Much of the uncertainty stems from the fact that Congress is not expected to do anything to clear up the questions, despite its power to do so. The Republican-led House has no plans to address any gay rights legislation at the moment.The only movement will come from the Senate, where on Wednesday the Health, Education, Labor and Pensions Committee is expected to approve a bill that would extend to gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender people the federal employment protections against discrimination that are currently available to people based on characteristics like race and religion.There is no federal law prohibiting discrimination in the workplace based on sexual orientation; 29 states also do not have such a law.The bill is expected to be voted out of committee with the support of at least one Republican, Senator Mark S. Kirk of Illinois, who is a co-sponsor. But its main sponsor, Senator Jeff Merkley, Democrat of Oregon, has been lobbying other Republicans on the committee, including Lisa Murkowski of Alaska. Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, another Republican committee member, has said he is leaning toward supporting it because it exempts religious organizations.Ms. Murkowski said on Tuesday that she still had some concerns with the legislation as written but was working with Mr. Merkley to iron those out."I'm one who really just doesn't like discrimination of any kind against anybody," she said. "But having said that, you need to make sure if you're going to put legislation into place that it's fair and evenhanded."Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine and the bill's other Republican co-sponsor, said on Tuesday that she was confident other Republicans would come around when it reaches the Senate floor."I think there's been a sea change in public attitudes," she said. "So I'm optimistic that the bill will pass and that there will be bipartisan support."Various versions of this legislation have been introduced and died in both houses of Congress over the years. The closest it got to passage was in 2007, when the House approved a measure that had its transgender discrimination provision stripped out. It later died in the Senate.
The Supreme Court returned the battle over same-sex marriage to the states two weeks ago, and Deb and Susan Whitewood are among the first to pick up the fight.A couple for 22 years with two teenage daughters, the Whitewoods filed suit on Tuesday to overturn Pennsylvania's ban on gay marriage, one of the first of an expected outpouring of cases around the country to cite the court's majority opinion that same-sex couples are denied a "status of immense import" and their children deprived of "the integrity and closeness of their own family."The suit, carefully assembled by the American Civil Liberties Union, was filed in Federal District Court in Harrisburg with the aim of adding Pennsylvania to the column of states permitting same-sex marriage, currently 13 plus the District of Columbia. The 23 plaintiffs come from many walks of life, including a doctor, college professors, a truck driver, a Vietnam veteran and a woman who lost her partner of 29 years."What we're looking for is the validation from the legal system that we are equal in our marriage as anyone else," said Susan Whitewood, 49, in an interview before a planned news conference to announce the suit at the Pennsylvania Capitol in Harrisburg.The legalization of same-sex marriage has primarily come through the political process, with lawmakers and voters approving it in six states in just the past year. But earlier victories were achieved through state courts, in states including Massachusetts and Iowa. The A.C.L.U. acknowledged that it was bringing suit in Pennsylvania because overturning the state's gay marriage ban in the Republican-controlled legislature is a near-term impossibility.Pennsylvania's law defines marriage as between a man and a woman — similar to the federal law struck down by the Supreme Court — and it denies recognition to same-sex marriages legally performed elsewhere.Gay-marriage opponents say using the courts undermines the will of the voters. Michael Geer, president of the Pennsylvania Family Institute, which opposes same-sex marriage, said that in 1996 when the state passed its law, fewer than 25 out of some 240 legislators opposed it. "The fact the A.C.L.U. is turning to the courts to try to redefine marriage takes it out of the hands of the people," he said.The A.C.L.U. plans to file suit soon in two other states, Virginia and North Carolina. In Michigan, a federal judge blocked a state law denying domestic partner benefits to public employees, citing the Supreme Court rulings. And on Wednesday the A.C.L.U. and Lambda Legal plan to seek summary judgment in Illinois in two year-old gay marriage cases."You'll have these things filed all over the place," said Frank Schubert, political director of the National Organization for Marriage, which opposes same-sex marriage.James Esseks, national director of the LGBT Project at the A.C.L.U., agreed. "No question this issue will get back to U.S. Supreme Court over the next several years," he said.At the heart of many of the cases is the issue the Supreme Court ducked in one of its two recent rulings, a narrow decision on a California case: If a state prohibits same-sex couples from marrying, does it trample the guarantee of equal protection in the United States Constitution?Supporters believe that enlarging the map of states that allow same-sex marriage will ultimately influence the Supreme Court when it next takes up the issue of a constitutional right to same-sex marriage, as it is expected to do in the next few years. Activists are pressing legislatures in three more states that appear ready to pass measures legalizing same-sex marriage: New Jersey, Hawaii and Illinois."We think what the map of the country looks like is going to make a big difference to how the issues in the case feel to the Supreme Court," Mr. Esseks said. "Will we have the 13 states plus D.C., or will we be at 20 or more?"Opponents are fighting back under the same logic. They see an opportunity to add Indiana to the 29 states with constitutional bans on same-sex marriage."Our challenge is to let the court see they're not going to get away with this without a massive public revolt," Mr. Schubert said.Both sides are focusing on one man, Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, the frequent swing vote on the court, who wrote the 5-to-4 majority opinion striking down a key part of the federal Defense of Marriage Act. Justice Kennedy did not say whether there was a constitutional right to same-sex marriage, leaving it up to individual states. But he defined the terms of battle.Opponents said their course was to show how same-sex marriage is a breach of thousands of years of history.Advocates have seized, especially, on Justice Kennedy's language that denying marriage to gay and lesbian couples harms their children by assigning them second-class status. The Pennsylvania suit argues that children of same-sex couples are deprived of "social recognition and respect" and of financial benefits that married parents enjoy.The Whitewoods said their daughters, Abbey, 16, and Katie, 14, were eager to join the suit."Having children means we have to protect our children in the utmost way," said Susan Whitewood, a human resources executive, who with her partner chose the same last name after a Holy Union ceremony at their church in 1993. "We have to be enormously proactive in everything we do that we don't get discriminated against or don't have negative ramifications."Before school each year, she and her partner, Deb Whitewood, 45, a stay-at-home mother, met with teachers in their suburban Pittsburgh community to explain their family and answer any questions. Invariably their girls were the first a teacher had encountered with two mothers, the women said."People would ask the questions," Deb Whitewood said, "and then things would just go totally normal from there."
Three Republicans on the Health, Education, Labor and Pensions Committee voted for the bill, which supporters hope will improve its chances to pass the Senate with the 60 votes it will need.Four Republican senators — Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, and Mark S. Kirk of Illinois, who voted for it in committee, along with Susan Collins of Maine, one of the bill's sponsors — are now on record supporting the bill, which has been debated in one form or another for more than a decade in Congress but has never passed the Senate.Supporters said they were emboldened by the 15-to-7 vote on Wednesday and took it as yet another sign, after last month's Supreme Court decision invalidating the Defense of Marriage Act, that gay rights are on an inexorable climb.But the political reality in Congress means the fate of the legislation is very much in doubt, despite the ease with which it cleared the committee. Even if the bill garners the necessary 60 votes to pass the Senate — not a sure thing, even with the support of the four Republicans, as three Democrats remain uncommitted — it faces an almost certain death in the House, where the Republican leadership has no plans to bring it up."I wouldn't underestimate the difficulties of getting the bill through the whole Congress," said Mr. Kirk shortly after the vote, which happened so quickly it surprised even some of the senators on the committee. It was less than 20 minutes from the time the meeting was gaveled in to the time it adjourned.Senator Tom Harkin, Democrat of Iowa and the committee's chairman, noted the irony of approving a measure that had languished for so long."It has been a long time coming," Mr. Harkin said. "And sometimes you work on these things for years and years. And all of a sudden it passes."Mr. Kirk has long supported the legislation. And Ms. Murkowski was seen as a likely yes after she became the third Senate Republican to express support for same-sex marriage last month.She said Wednesday that hearing from her constituents over the July 4 recess ultimately helped put her over the edge. "When I was home over the break, I think it was 1,774 postcards were delivered to my office from Alaskans around the state," she said. "It's important to them. It's important to me."But the "yes" vote from Mr. Hatch, a Mormon, came as something of a surprise. Like many conservatives, including some of the seven who voted "no" on Wednesday, Mr. Hatch said he was concerned that religious institutions could be penalized. But the way the legislation is written, religious organizations like houses of worship, schools and missions are exempt from the law, as is the military and small businesses with fewer than 15 people.Similar legislation has faltered in Congress before. The most problematic aspect in the past had been the inclusion of transgender people. When former Representative Barney Frank, Democrat of Massachusetts, introduced the bill in the House in 2007, he ultimately agreed to remove the transgender provision, helping to ensure its passage.
Pennsylvania's attorney general, Kathleen Kane, said on Thursday that she would not defend the state against a lawsuit to overturn a ban on same-sex marriage.Ms. Kane, a Democrat, quoting from Pennsylvania's Constitution, said that unequal treatment based on race, religion and physical disability was no longer tolerated, and "it is now the time here in Pennsylvania to end another wave of discrimination."The suit was filed in Federal District Court in Harrisburg on Tuesday with 23 plaintiffs, including 10 gay and lesbian couples, two teenage children of one couple, and a woman whose partner of 29 years had died. It cites a ruling last month by the United States Supreme Court striking down the federal Defense of Marriage Act. It was the first of a wave of planned lawsuits invoking the high court that are aimed at expanding the number of states that allow same-sex marriage, including Virginia and North Carolina.Attorneys general in Illinois and California have previously declined to defend their states in such suits. In the case of California, the refusal of Jerry Brown, the attorney general at the time, and Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger led to a second Supreme Court decision last month that cleared the way for gay and lesbian weddings there. When California officials would not defend Proposition 8, a ballot initiative banning same-sex marriage, independent supporters stepped in. The high court ruled that the supporters did not have standing.In Pennsylvania, the general counsel's office of Gov. Tom Corbett, a Republican, was seen as likely to pick up the defense. But James D. Schultz, the general counsel, did not immediately agree to do so. He said Thursday that he first needed a formal notice from Ms. Kane explaining her decision."We are surprised that the attorney general, contrary to her constitutional duty under the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, has decided not to defend a Pennsylvania statute lawfully enacted by the General Assembly, merely because of her personal beliefs," Mr. Schultz said in a statement.State Republican officials also criticized Ms. Kane's decision in the case, which was brought by the American Civil Liberties Union."It is unacceptable for Attorney General Kathleen Kane to put her personal politics ahead of her taxpayer-funded job by abdicating her responsibilities," said Rob Gleason, chairman of the Pennsylvania Republican Party.Pennsylvania amended its marriage laws in 1996, the same year the federal Defense of Marriage Act was adopted, to define marriage as between a man and a woman.Speaking at the National Constitution Center in Philadelphia, Ms. Kane told a supportive crowd that included several plaintiffs from the suit, "I cannot ethically defend the constitutionality of Pennsylvania's version of DOMA."Ms. Kane, 47, who was elected attorney general last year and has been mentioned as a possible future candidate for governor, has tangled before with Mr. Corbett. One of her first acts in office was to begin an investigation of Mr. Corbett's extended inquiry into child-sex-abuse allegations against Jerry Sandusky, the former Penn State football coach, who is now in prison."I looked at it this way," Ms. Kane said in explaining her decision in the lawsuit. "The governor's going to be O.K." But who would represent ordinary people, "the Daves and Robbies"? she asked. "Who represents the Emilys and Amys?"
SAN FRANCISCO — The San Diego County official in charge of issuing marriage licenses has asked the State Supreme Court to stop same-sex weddings.The official, County Clerk Ernest J. Dronenburg Jr., urged the state's highest court on Friday to immediately halt the weddings while it considered his legal argument that same-sex marriage remains illegal in California despite the United States Supreme Court's decision widely regarded as authorizing the weddings.Mr. Dronenburg is arguing that the United States Supreme Court decision applies only to the two couples named in the original federal lawsuit and to the clerks in Alameda and Los Angeles Counties, where the couples applied for marriage licenses.Mr. Dronenburg also argues that county clerks are not bound by orders from the governor, the state attorney general or other state officials to marry gay couples.The State Supreme Court last Monday refused a similar request to immediately stop gay weddings that was made by backers of California's Proposition 8, which banned same-sex marriage in the state when voters passed it in 2008. That complaint made the same legal arguments as Mr. Dronenburg."The filing offers no new arguments that could deny same-sex couples their constitutionally protected civil rights," said Kamala D. Harris, the state attorney general. "The federal injunction is still in effect, and it requires all 58 counties to perform same-sex marriages. No exceptions."The Supreme Court cleared the way for same-sex marriages to resume in California on June 28 by dismissing an appeal to a lower court's ruling that found the ban unconstitutional. The justices decided that the Proposition 8 supporters who filed the appeal lacked the authority to defend the law after the governor and the state attorney general refused to do so.As a result, the 2010 opinion by Judge Vaughn R. Walker of Federal District Court that found Proposition 8 unconstitutional became the definitive ruling. Judge Walker found that the same-sex marriage ban violated constitutional equal protection guarantees.The California Supreme Court still plans to separately consider whether the lower court's ruling that invalidated the ban and a companion mandate prohibiting the state from enforcing it applied statewide or only in Los Angeles and Alameda Counties.
A Louisiana sheriff has apologized for the arrests of as many as a dozen or more men in recent years on charges that they violated an anti-sodomy statute that has been ruled unconstitutional by the United States Supreme Court.On Saturday, The Advocate newspaper in Baton Rouge reported that a community policing unit of the East Baton Rouge sheriff's office had been arresting men who discussed or agreed to meet privately to have consensual sex with undercover officers. Some of the arrests went as far back as 2011 and some were as recent as this month.The men were arrested on charges of violating a Louisiana statute barring "unnatural carnal copulation," though the Supreme Court in 2003 declared such laws unconstitutional invasions of privacy. The attorney general of Louisiana at the time issued a statement saying the state's anti-sodomy law "would be unenforceable."In each of the known cases in Baton Rouge, the district attorney's office declined to prosecute, citing a lack of evidence that a crime, like prostitution, had taken place. Gay rights advocates and at least one public official have publicly questioned why sheriff's deputies continued to make such arrests when the district attorney's office had made it clear that such actions were not criminal."We need to find out when the sheriff was first informed that the D.A.'s office would not prosecute people under this anti-sodomy law because it's unconstitutional," said John Delgado, a Baton Rouge city councilman.Hillar C. Moore III, the district attorney for East Baton Rouge parish, said he was not aware of the arrests until informed last week by a reporter. But in looking back over the past two and a half years, he found that prosecutors in his office had been referred to such cases 9 or 10 times and the cases were dropped when no evidence was found that money was involved.Mr. Moore said such arrests were scattered and may have gone unnoticed among the 25,000 cases the office handles each year. "Had it come to our attention and there seemed to be a pattern here I can see how it would have gone up the chain," he said.On Monday, Sheriff Sid J. Gautreaux III issued a statement apologizing "to anyone that was unintentionally harmed or offended by the actions of our investigations." The sheriff said that he had instructed his employees to no longer use "this unconstitutional law," and that he was conducting "a comprehensive evaluation of undercover operations made by our deputies and will make changes to ensure better supervision, training and guidance."Bruce Parker, who manages a statewide coalition of gay and lesbian advocacy groups called Equality Louisiana, said that there had been at least 12 arrests in recent years under the anti-sodomy statute but he suspected there may have been more."It was really a case of targeting people," Mr. Parker said.Mr. Parker said the sheriff's office has been responsive since the weekend, saying it would work with the Capital City Alliance, a Baton Rouge-based group that is part of the coalition. While Mr. Delgado said those arrested had a strong case for a civil suit, Mr. Parker said some of them were not openly gay when they were arrested and were unlikely to want further publicity."Many of their lives were dramatically ruined because of this," he said.
WASHINGTON — Last month's Supreme Court rulings on same-sex marriage were major gay rights victories. But countless questions about the legal rights of gay men and lesbians remain.Here's one: May gays be excluded from juries on account of their sexual orientation? The federal appeals court in California will soon decide the issue, which turns out to be surprisingly knotty.It arose at the 2011 trial of an antitrust fight between two giant drug companies. After a potential juror appeared to reveal that he was gay, a lawyer for Abbott Laboratories used a peremptory strike — one that does not require a reason — to eliminate him from the jury pool.An opposing lawyer objected, saying the juror "is or appears to be, could be, homosexual."That mattered, the lawyer said, because "the litigation involves AIDS medications" and "the incidence of AIDS in the homosexual community is well known, particularly gay men."In legal terms, the lawyer had just tried to raise a Batson challenge, named after a 1986 Supreme Court decision, Batson v. Kentucky. That decision recognized an exception to the general rule that peremptory challenges are completely discretionary. Race, the court said, cannot be the reason.Eight years later, the court said that gender cannot be the reason, either. But it has never addressed sexual orientation.At the antitrust trial, in SmithKline Beecham Corporation v. Abbott Laboratories, things quickly got confusing, with the judge uncertain about the law and the Abbott Laboratories lawyer missing an opportunity to protect his client."I don't know that, number one, Batson applies in civil," said Judge Claudia Wilken of Federal District Court in Oakland, Calif. But Batson does apply in both civil litigations and criminal prosecutions."Number two," she went on, now on firmer ground, "whether Batson ever applies to sexual orientation.""Number three," she said, "there is no way for us to know who is gay and who isn't here, unless someone happens to say something."Nonetheless, she offered the Abbott Laboratories lawyer, Jeffrey I. Weinberger, a chance to offer a neutral reason for his peremptory strike. "Or if you don't want to," she said, "you can stand on my first three reasons."Mr. Weinberger took the judge up on her offer. "I will stand on the first three at this point," he said, adding of the juror: "I have no idea whether he is gay or not."Declining to give a reason was probably a tactical error. It takes very little to respond to a Batson objection. Almost anything will do.The reason does not have to be, the Supreme Court has said, "persuasive, or even plausible." One reason the court found sufficient: a prosecutor said he did not care for a potential juror's "long curly hair" and "mustache and a goatee-type beard."Mr. Weinberger did not lack other explanations for striking the seemingly gay potential juror. He could have cited the juror's work as a computer technician at the same federal appeals court that will decide whether his exclusion was proper, the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. Or that the juror had been close to someone who had H.I.V.But what Mr. Weinberger did say, that he had no idea whether the juror was gay, ran counter to what the juror had said. The juror, a man, said of "my partner" that "he's retired," that "he doesn't have to work" and that "he just has studied economics and does investments."This juror's sexual orientation seems tolerably clear. But that will not always be the case without intrusive questioning. Abbott Laboratories told the Ninth Circuit that allowing challenges based on sexual orientation "would present formidable practical problems."That sounds right. But California law has barred peremptory challenges based on sexual orientation in state courts for more than a decade, and the system seems to work.Excluding gay men and lesbians from jury service, a state appeals court explained, "would send an intolerable message." At the same time, the court said, potential jurors should not be questioned about their sexual orientations."If it comes out somehow," Judge William W. Bedsworth wrote for the court, "the parties will doubtless factor it into their jury selection process, just as they factor in occupation, education, body language and whether the juror resembles their stupid Uncle Cletus."A ruling that gay people may not be excluded from juries in federal court would be a powerful symbolic step. But it would probably have little practical effect given how easy it is for a lawyer to offer a neutral-sounding reason.Meaningful changes to the jury selection process would require the solution proposed by Justice Thurgood Marshall in a concurrence in Batson itself."The decision today will not end the racial discrimination that peremptories inject into the jury selection process," Justice Marshall wrote. "That goal can be accomplished only by eliminating peremptory challenges entirely."Doing away with peremptory challenges would still allow lawyers to object to potential jurors for cause. But lawyers would have to persuade a judge that the potential juror would not be able to weigh the evidence in a case fairly and impartially.In a 2005 concurrence, Justice Stephen G. Breyer appeared to endorse Justice Marshall's view, saying that "peremptory challenges seem increasingly anomalous in our judicial system." He noted that England had eliminated peremptory challenges but "continues to administer fair trials based largely on random jury selection.""I believe it necessary," Justice Breyer wrote, "to reconsider Batson's test and the peremptory challenge system as a whole."
LAS CRUCES, N.M. — Saying he was upholding New Mexico's Constitution — amended four decades ago to guarantee equal rights to all — a county clerk here began issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples on Wednesday, magnifying a fight that could become one of the key issues in next year's elections for governor.The clerk, Lynn Ellins, said he had exhausted his patience waiting for the courts to resolve the ambiguity between the state's definition of marriage, which makes no mention of gender, and the marriage applications used by county clerks, which require couples to list their names under "bride" and "groom." The issue was central to the lawsuits filed by same-sex couples in Albuquerque in March, and by Alexander Hanna and his partner, Yon Hudson, in Santa Fe in June."If the court tells me to stop, I'll stop," Mr. Ellins said. "But until that happens, we're open for business."Mr. Ellins is the clerk of Doña Ana County, the political stronghold of Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican, who has repeatedly expressed her opposition to same-sex marriage.Proponents are banking on the outcome of the court cases, pending before separate district courts, and on a statement by Gary King, the state's attorney general, in June saying the statutory framework that precludes same-sex marriage would be "vulnerable to challenge."During a news conference in Albuquerque on Wednesday, Mr. King, a leading Democratic contender for governor, said he would not challenge Mr. Ellins or any other county clerk who decides to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples. He warned, however, that the licenses could be invalidated if the New Mexico Supreme Court eventually rules that same-sex marriage is not allowed in the state.In a terse decision last week, the state court denied a request on behalf of Mr. Hanna and Mr. Hudson to rule on the issue, a calculated maneuver the couple hoped would have allowed them to sidestep the lower courts and force a quicker resolution of the matter.On Wednesday, the American Civil Liberties Union and the National Center for Lesbian Rights, two of the groups leading the push for the legalization of same-sex marriage across the country, increased the pressure. They filed an emergency request before the state's Second Judicial District Court, asking to permit a woman with terminal cancer, Jen Roper, to marry her longtime partner, Angelique Neuman, immediately so that Ms. Neuman and their three adopted children would be legally protected once Ms. Roper died."Because of my illness, we do not have the luxury of waiting years for the courts to decide whether loving, committed same-sex couples can marry in New Mexico," Ms. Roper said in a statement. "For us, the time is now."There are also signs that the political tide may be shifting. Despite her long-professed opposition to same-sex marriage, Governor Martinez has softened her stance, saying voters should be the ones to decide whether to legalize it in New Mexico — "not a court, not politicians in Santa Fe, and not one random county clerk," as her spokesman, Enrique Knell, put it in a statement on Wednesday.Polls have indicated that the electorate is divided, though, with much of the resistance grounded in the strong Roman Catholic vein that runs through the state.At the Doña Ana County clerk's office on Wednesday, staff members were issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples at a rate of four an hour, a record for an office that generally grants five marriage licenses a day. The deputy clerk, Mario O. Jimenez, said the phone had been "ringing nonstop," as couples from as far away as Lubbock, Tex., 350 miles to the east, called to tell they were on their way.Carrie Hamblen, 45, and her partner of seven years, Char Ullman, 51, arrived early, fearing that protesters or perhaps a court injunction might frustrate their marriage plans. Instead, said Ms. Hamblen, the chairwoman of the board of directors for Southern New Mexico Pride, they were greeted by cheers from county employees.Sarah Finke, 48, heard about the marriage licenses from a colleague at the elementary school where she works. During a fire drill, she called her partner of 10 years, Heather Oesterreich, also 48.whyThe women had decided long ago not to travel to another state to get married. Their pastor, Linda Mervine of the First Christian Church, married them under a palm tree in front of the county building here. Micah, their 6-year-old son, looked on approvingly."This is our state," said Ms. Oesterreich. "We have wonderful family and friends, and a God and our church that we wanted to witness this."Doña Ana County became the first county in New Mexico to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples since 2004, when a clerk in Sandoval County issued 64 licenses, but stopped it after the state's attorney general at the time, Patricia A. Madrid, issued an opinion saying the licenses were "invalid under state law."
HOT SPRINGS, S.D. — In the past couple of years, conservative opposition to same-sex marriage has clearly started to erode. Prominent Republicans like Senators Rob Portman and Lisa Murkowski and former Secretary of State Colin L. Powell have come out in support of gay marriage. Even David Blankenhorn, the expert witness in the Proposition 8 trial in California and a Democrat, announced that he had changed his mind.They are, for the most part, moderate conservatives using secular, democratic arguments. None come from the Christian right. Among religious conservatives, opposition to same-sex marriage has remained essentially unquestioned.Which is why "The Things We Share: A Catholic's Case for Same-Sex Marriage," an essay by Joseph Bottum, published Friday on the Web site of Commonweal magazine, is something new in this debate.Mr. Bottum, 54, is a serious Christian. He attended Roman Catholic high school, college and graduate school. His erudite writing for conservative magazines like National Review and The Weekly Standard is laced with references to church history and theology and to Christian writers like G. K. Chesterton and W. H. Auden. He fiercely opposes abortion, and for five years, until 2010, he was editor in chief of First Things, a key opinion journal for religious conservatives.In his large Victorian house here 50 miles from Mount Rushmore, a crucifix hangs in the hallway. At lunch, he crossed himself before we sat down. Mr. Bottum is the kind of man who, when he casually says "Thomas," you know that he means Aquinas, the 13th-century Catholic philosopher.Not five years ago, he condemned backers of gay marriage as amoral. Yet in his new long and challenging essay, Mr. Bottum argues, in effect, that he was wrong and that fellow conservative Catholics are misinterpreting their tradition, in particular Aquinas's "natural law" theology.Aquinas considered heterosexual, monogamous union the highest form of marriage, but Mr. Bottum believes that he was actually less interested in strict legal precepts than in an enchanted vision of the world — a vision that, Mr. Bottum now says, is better served by supporting same-sex marriage.But before we got deep into theology, Mr. Bottum told me about his family. As we sat on his front porch, in sight of the track at the town high school, the Marlboro-smoking, fair- and floppy-haired Mr. Bottum reminded me that his great-uncle lost his Senate seat to George McGovern. Mr. Bottum's grandfather, the senator's brother, might have won office, had he not converted to Catholicism."We had another name for conversion," Mr. Bottum said, when I visited him on Wednesday. "We called it 'marrying an Irish girl.'  "Mr. Bottum's parents weren't very religious, he said, but he always had a metaphysical side: "I never didn't believe in God." His passion for Catholicism was heightened when, as a student at Georgetown, he encountered the poetry of Robert Lowell, a Catholic convert. "I really got Lowell, and read him to pieces," said Mr. Bottum, whose friends call him Jody.He attends Mass weekly and objects to the death penalty as well as abortion, which leaves him frustrated with both political parties. (On balance, the Republicans are "usually more educable on the death penalty than Democrats are on abortion.") He took his family from Manhattan back to South Dakota three years ago, after he was fired by First Things, for reasons he will not discuss.If Mr. Bottum had testy relations with his co-workers at First Things, many of them Catholic conservatives, there was little sign that he would break with them on same-sex marriage. And a disagreement over Aquinas seemed even more unlikely.Religious Catholics are generally united in their reverence for St. Thomas Aquinas, whose theology dominates Catholic thought. The traditional-marriage movement is led by men like Brian S. Brown, the president of the National Organization for Marriage, and Prof. Robert P. George of Princeton, Catholics who rely on Aquinas's reasoning to make the contemporary case for traditional marriage.So Mr. Bottum's change of heart is noteworthy. He makes several arguments. The first is pragmatic.Basic democratic premises like fairness, equal rights and majority rule suggest that the time for same-sex marriage has come, he says. We can agree, Mr. Bottum argues, that Americans are turning in favor of same-sex marriage, and there "is no coherent jurisprudential against it — no principled legal view that can resist it." Furthermore, the bishops' campaigns against same-sex marriage "are hurting the church." Especially for the young, Catholicism is coming to symbolize repression.
WASHINGTON — All same-sex couples who are legally married will be recognized as such for federal tax purposes, even if the state where they live does not recognize their union, the Treasury Department and the Internal Revenue Service said Thursday .It is the broadest federal rule change to come out of the landmark Supreme Court decision in June that struck down the 1996 Defense of Marriage Act, and a sign of how quickly the government is moving to treat gay couples in the same way that it does straight couples.The June decision found that same-sex couples were entitled to federal benefits, but left open the question of how Washington would actually administer them. The Treasury Department answered some of those questions on Thursday. As of the 2013 tax year, same-sex spouses who are legally married will not be able to file federal tax returns as if either were single. Instead, they must file together as "married filing jointly" or individually as "married filing separately."Their address or the location of their wedding does not matter, as long as the marriage is legal: a same-sex couple who marry in Albany, N.Y., and move to Alabama are treated the same as a same-sex couple who marry and live in Massachusetts."Today's ruling provides certainty and clear, coherent tax-filing guidance for all legally married same-sex couples nationwide," Treasury Secretary Jacob J. Lew said. "This ruling also assures legally married same-sex couples that they can move freely throughout the country knowing that their federal filing status will not change."Gay and civil rights groups praised the ruling. "Committed and loving gay and lesbian married couples will now be treated equally under our nation's federal tax laws, regardless of what state they call home," said Chad Griffin, the president of the Human Rights Campaign. "These families finally have access to crucial tax benefits and protections previously denied to them under the discriminatory Defense of Marriage Act."But the Treasury decision could have ramifications for many gay couples' tax liabilities, said Roberton Williams of the nonpartisan Tax Policy Center in Washington. Couples with similar incomes often pay the "marriage penalty," with their tax liability as a couple being much higher than it would be if they were single.At the same time, same-sex couples will also be able to file amended returns for certain prior tax years, meaning that many couples might be eligible for refunds. Couples do not have to file amended returns if they do not want to, a senior Treasury official said, meaning that couples who might pay the marriage penalty would not owe back taxes.But the ruling creates complications for same-sex couples who live in any of the 37 states that do not recognize their marriages. Previously, such couples filed federal and state tax returns as individuals. Now, they will have to file their federal returns as other married couples do, but may be required to file their state returns as individuals."There's going to be a cumbersome workaround," said Nanette Lee Miller of Marcum L.L.P., a public accounting firm. She sees it as a paperwork bother more than a financial issue.States might also respond to the federal ruling with changes of their own. "Most state income tax regimes begin with federal taxable income as the starting point," Marvin Kirsner, a tax lawyer at Greenberg Traurig, said in an e-mail. "These state taxing authorities will have to figure out how to deal with a same-sex married couple who file a joint income tax return for federal tax purposes." He added,"We will need to see guidance from each nonrecognition state to see how this will be handled."The rule change is likely to provide a small increase for federal revenue, as more same-sex couples pay the marriage penalty, Mr. Williams said, describing it as a "rounding error." But it would be partly offset by new federal spending on benefits for same-sex spouses.The ruling applies to all legal marriages made in the United States or foreign countries. But it does not extend to civil unions, registered domestic partnerships or other legal relationships, the Treasury said.The Treasury ruling is one of many that are starting to emerge from all corners of the federal government as Washington changes regulations to conform with the Supreme Court decision.Separately, the Health and Human Services Department said Thursday that Medicare would extend certain key benefits to same-sex spouses, "clarifying that all beneficiaries in private Medicare plans have access to equal coverage when it comes to care in a nursing home where their spouse lives."But federal agencies are not moving in lock step. Instead, they are creating a patchwork of regulations affecting gay and lesbian couples — and may be raising questions about discrimination and fairness in the way that federal benefits are distributed.Medicare and Treasury officials have said they would use a "place of celebration" standard for determining whether gay couples are eligible for benefits. That means same-sex couples would receive benefits as long as they are legally married, regardless of where they live.But the Social Security Administration is now using a "place of residence" standard in determining spousal benefits, and a gay couple in Alabama might not receive the same benefits as a gay couple in New York until final determinations are made or Congress acts. The Obama administration has pushed federal agencies to ensure the Supreme Court's ruling is carried out quickly and smoothly."It would be nice if they were consistent," Ms. Miller said. Creating federal regulations is a process and could change, she said.
The San Francisco Gay Men's Chorus sang "Give 'Em Hope" for a revered and in some ways surprising guest who shared a California stage with them last month: Justice Anthony M. Kennedy.Justice Kennedy was in San Francisco for an American Bar Association meeting, but he was also there to be celebrated by the men on the risers behind him. In remarks from the stage, San Francisco's mayor, Edwin M. Lee, thanked the justice "for upholding the Constitution and justice for all" in his majority opinion in June in United States v. Windsor, a major gay rights victory."Freedom is always a work in progress," Justice Kennedy said in his own remarks, making clear that there was more work to be done.Justice Kennedy has emerged as the most important judicial champion of gay rights in the nation's history, having written three landmark opinions on the subject, including this summer's Windsor decision, which overturned a ban on federal benefits for married same-sex couples. Those rulings collectively represent a new chapter in the nation's civil rights law, and they have cemented his legacy as a hero to the gay rights movement."He is the towering giant in the jurisprudence of freedom and equality for gay people," said Evan Wolfson, the president of Freedom to Marry and one of the architects of the political and legal push for same-sex marriage.That push has taken on momentum thanks to the Windsor decision, which gay rights groups are citing in challenges to state bans on same-sex marriage. On Thursday, the Internal Revenue Service said it would implement the Windsor ruling by recognizing the unions of all lawfully married same-sex couples, including those living in states that do not allow same-sex marriage.On Saturday, Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, who joined Justice Kennedy's majority opinion in Windsor, became the first member of the court to officiate at a same-sex wedding.The praise now being showered on Justice Kennedy by gay rights advocates — and the deep disappointment of conservatives — would have been hard to imagine when President Ronald Reagan nominated him to the Supreme Court in 1987. Gay rights groups were more than a little wary then.On the federal appeals court in California, where Justice Kennedy had served for 13 years, he heard five cases concerning gay rights. He voted against the gay rights claim every time."I have to say that Kennedy seems rather obtuse on important gay issues and must be counted as a likely vote against us on most matters likely to come before the Supreme Court," Arthur S. Leonard, an authority on gay rights at New York Law School, wrote in The New York Native, a newspaper that focused on gay issues.The justice's trajectory since then has been a product of overlapping factors, associates and observers say. His Supreme Court jurisprudence is characterized by an expansive commitment to individual liberty. He believes that American courts should consider international norms, and foreign courts have expanded gay rights. His politics, reflecting his background as a Sacramento lawyer and lobbyist, tend toward fiscal conservatism and moderate social views. And he has long had gay friends.Michael C. Dorf, a law professor at Cornell who served as a law clerk to Justice Kennedy, said the key to understanding his former boss was the culture of his home state."The way to think about his instincts is that he is fundamentally a California Republican," Professor Dorf said. "It's not surprising that a California Republican in 1987 would be expected to be at best an unreliable ally for gay rights groups."In the 1980s, California Republicans, like most Americans, had deep reservations about the notion of gay equality. But there were also early stirrings of the gay rights movement in California.Harvey Milk, a member of the San Francisco Board of Supervisors and one of the first openly gay elected officials, delivered a landmark gay rights speech in 1978 (on which the song "Give 'Em Hope" was based). Mr. Milk was assassinated later that year.The same year, Reagan, a former California governor preparing to run for president, helped defeat a ballot initiative that would have made it easy to fire gay teachers.Over time, some leading California Republicans moved more on the issue than many Republicans elsewhere. Theodore B. Olson, a Northern Californian who served as the United States solicitor general under President George W. Bush, helped lead the fight to overturn Proposition 8, the state's ban on same-sex marriage.Justice Kennedy's three major gay rights decisions are in this tradition, Professor Dorf said. They also hark back to a third California Republican, Chief Justice Earl Warren, another former governor, who wrote Brown v. Board of Education, the 1954 decision barring segregation in public schools.Romer v. Evans, in 1996, struck down a Colorado constitutional amendment that had banned laws protecting gay men and lesbians. Lawrence v. Texas, in 2003, struck down laws making gay sex a crime. And in June, Justice Kennedy wrote the Windsor decision.In 1987, gay rights advocates could see little of this coming. Jeffrey Levi, then the executive director of the National Gay and Lesbian Task Force, testified against Justice Kennedy at his confirmation hearings, saying that "his past opinions offer little hope to gays and lesbians challenging adverse treatment in the courts."Professor Levi, who now teaches health policy at George Washington University, said in an e-mail that "there was no way to predict that Justice Kennedy would 'evolve' as he did (given prior opinions on gays in the military, immigration and federal employment)."Professor Levi drew a comparison to Dr. C. Everett Koop, whose nomination as surgeon general under Reagan was opposed by gay rights groups based on hostile statements he had made."He turned out to be a hero of the early fight against AIDS," Professor Levi said of Dr. Koop.
ALBUQUERQUE — The decision by clerks in six of New Mexico's most populous counties to start issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples has added a sense of urgency to a fight that some of the state's top political leaders had seemed in no hurry to join."It is time someone makes a decision that settles this debate," said Maggie Toulouse Oliver, the clerk in Bernalillo County, where about a dozen same-sex couples were married during a group ceremony outside the county building here last Tuesday.For years, state legislators have tried to settle the debate, with conservative Republicans introducing bills to describe marriage as a union between a man and a woman and liberal Democrats stalling those efforts or proposing bills of their own without gender-specific restrictions. None ever succeeded.That has left New Mexico as the only state in the country that has no statute or constitutional amendment explicitly barring same-sex couples from marrying, but also no law saying they can. Since March, same-sex couples in three cities — Santa Fe, Albuquerque and Los Alamos — have filed lawsuits in an effort to get a clear ruling on the issue.Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican, has kept a dispassionate distance, affirming her personal opposition to same-sex marriage but saying the decision should be left to voters. In June, Gary King, the state's attorney general and a Democrat, punted, telling reporters he was not going to take a public stance on the issue. More recently, he has said he would not challenge any county clerk who decided to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples.But as the time passed and the uncertainty lingered, some county clerks took matters into their own hands.The first among them, Lynn Ellins of Doña Ana County — where Governor Martinez began her political career — said he was tired of waiting when, on Aug. 21, he began issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples from his office in Las Cruces, an increasingly liberal city in the largely conservative southern part of the state. Five other county clerks followed, though not until a court order gave them justification and permission, a move that also served to limit the legal options available to stop them.The court order, which was issued Aug. 26 by an Albuquerque judge, Alan M. Malott, established that "implying conditions of sexual orientation on one's right to enter civil contracts such as marriage" was a violation of the equal-protection clause in the state's Constitution.William E. Sharer, a Republican state senator from Farmington, in northern New Mexico, and the loudest voice of opposition, said that the court order "complicates things," and he characterized the clerks' moves as "pure lawlessness." Still, late on Friday, Mr. Sharer sued Mr. Ellins to stop him from granting any more marriage licenses.Terry H. McMillan, a Republican state representative from Las Cruces — who had considered joining Mr. Sharer's lawsuit, but backed away because, he said, he was ultimately not opposed to same-sex marriage — conceded in an interview that marriage equality in New Mexico was "an inevitability."The clerks have shifted their focus to the state's Supreme Court. They are joining one of the lawsuits filed by same-sex couples so they can appeal Judge Malott's ruling, which is limited to Bernalillo and Santa Fe Counties, both defendants in the lawsuit, and try to force a statewide resolution.For their part, elected officials from both parties are contemplating the political price they may have to pay for their stance on same-sex marriage.The state's Democratic Party has worked hard to take ownership of the issue, using it to bolster its narrative of New Mexico's gradual tilt to the left on social issues. In an interview, the party's chairman, Sam Bregman, noted the lack of protests after clerks began issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples in San Miguel County, home to many Roman Catholic Hispanic families, and Valencia County, where evangelical churches have recently multiplied. (The Valencia County clerk, Peggy Carabajal, is the sole Republican among the clerks issuing the licenses. She won her election in 2012 by 26 votes.)"We're going to prove that the Republican Party here in New Mexico is on the wrong side of history," Mr. Bregman said.Political observers here acknowledged that the position is a bit of a gamble — but also that risks exist for all sides.Republicans need conservative Democratic voters to win statewide office, which could help explain Governor Martinez's reluctance to publicly engage in the debate over same-sex marriage — and also Mr. King's noncommittal stance. He is regarded as a leading contender for the Democratic nomination for governor, which means that he would be vying for support from the same group of constituents, the state's most reliable set of swing voters, in a general election.Silence, however, might also antagonize both parties' bases.Brian Sanderoff, a New Mexico pollster, said evangelical megachurches in Albuquerque, for example, could successfully mobilize opposition in primary races against Republican candidates who did not speak strongly against same-sex marriage.What most people are hoping for is a definitive ruling from the state's Supreme Court, but the outcome also has its wrinkles. If the court legalizes same-sex marriage, conservative legislators might push for a ballot question to give voters the ultimate say. But if there is a ballot question, liberal and progressive voters would most likely mobilize in droves, posing a challenge for Governor Martinez, who is up for re-election next year."The last thing the governor wants is a bunch of liberal, young voters going to the polls," Mr. Sanderoff said.They have already proved they are able to organize quickly and cheaply. Pat Davis, executive director of ProgressNow New Mexico, an advocacy group, said the mass wedding ceremony outside the county building here came together in less than 24 hours and cost $50, mostly because so many of the organizers volunteered their time and labor.One of the group's interns asked college friends to design fliers, and then they each pitched in to pay for printing them. Flower shops offered discounted rates for arrangements that adorned a makeshift podium Mr. Davis had kept from another event and transported in his car.About 200 people gathered for the wedding, including Ms. Toulouse Oliver, the Bernalillo County clerk, who took a rainbow-color rose to her office afterward, a souvenir to mark the record 136 marriage licenses — 130 of them for same-sex couples — that her office issued that day.
HOUSTON — Nearly 200 cities across the country have enacted ordinances in recent years that prohibit bias by municipal employees or in city contracts over someone's race, sex, age, religion or sexual orientation. Houston, Austin, Dallas and Fort Worth are a few of the Texas cities that adopted such measures.But in San Antonio, a nondiscrimination ordinance that includes protections for sexual orientation and gender identity turned into a divisive political battle this summer, the likes of which this liberal-leaning city of 1.4 million has rarely seen in recent decades.The City Council passed the measure, 8 to 3, on Thursday, capping weeks of heated debate that exposed racial, religious and gay-and-straight divisions and drew the scorn of Republican leaders and candidates around the state who are just starting to position themselves for next spring's primary elections.The Texas attorney general, Greg Abbott, who has been running for governor since Gov. Rick Perry announced he was not seeking re-election, weighed in on the issue, expressing his opposition. The state agriculture commissioner, Todd Staples, who is running for lieutenant governor — and who as a state senator sponsored the constitutional amendment that passed in 2005 that defined marriage in Texas as between one man and one woman — also spoke out against it.They said it would trample religious liberties by suppressing the views of those who oppose homosexuality or same-sex marriage for religious reasons, a claim supporters of the measure deny."I consider this an attempt to impose a liberal value system over the objection of millions of Texans," Mr. Staples said. "It actually discriminates against those with deeply held religious views by pushing this agenda to the extreme."All of the major statewide elected positions are open contests in the Republican primary. And while voters do not head to the polls until March, many Republicans seeking statewide office have seized on San Antonio's ordinance in what some see as a way to appeal to the grass-roots conservatives who make up the bulk of the electorate in the party's Texas primaries."It is Republican statewide candidates signaling their base that they are true and trustworthy conservatives," said Calvin Jillson, a political science professor at Southern Methodist University in Dallas. "When you're running for statewide office, you don't control what the San Antonio mayor and Council do. So all you're really doing is taking an ideological position that you then project toward the Republican primary electorate, so that they can see that you're a social conservative and you are manning the ramparts against undesirable social change."There appeared to be other political reasons that the debate became closely watched.Republicans sought to engage San Antonio's mayor, Julián Castro, who supported the measure and has become one of the few Democrats in a Republican-dominated state with star power, political science professors said. A number of Democrats want Mr. Castro, who gave the keynote address at the Democratic National Convention in 2012, to run for statewide office. The debate over the ordinance became as much about challenging Mr. Castro's vision for San Antonio and his future ambitions as it was about gay rights."An issue that otherwise would primarily be confined to local media coverage and some protests by social conservatives has taken on a state and even national level scope, and that's due to the fact that Julián Castro is involved," said Mark P. Jones, a political science professor at Rice University in Houston.Republican officials and others seeking to defeat the ordinance said their opposition had nothing to do with politics. They described it as a thinly veiled attack on those who hold traditional rather than liberal values.Mr. Abbott, the attorney general, sent a letter to Mr. Castro stating that passage of the ordinance would most likely "envelope the city in costly litigation," though he stopped short of suggesting the state would challenge it in court. Mr. Abbott wrote that the measure conflicts with the Constitution, because it threatens to remove from office any city official who shows a bias "by word or deed" based on sexual orientation."The obvious problem with this provision is that it allows government to impose thought and speech control over any city official or board or commission member who may hold deep religious beliefs that are counter to the ordinance," Mr. Abbott wrote.The ordinance adds sexual orientation and gender identity to the list of classes protected from bias, including race, religion, age and disability. It affects city employees, city contracts, housing and city officials as well as members of municipal boards and commissions. It also applies to restaurants and other businesses, making it unlawful to deny anyone any services available to the general public on the basis of sexual orientation or any of the other protected classes. Language was added that no person or group was required to support or advocate "any particular lifestyle or religious view."The tone of the debate has been sharp. Supporters and opponents held dueling news conferences on the front and back steps of City Hall. Hundreds flooded the Council chambers to speak for or against the measure, with supporters dressed in red shirts and opponents in blue.Councilwoman Elisa Chan, who voted against it, angered supporters when secretly recorded comments she made to staff members about gays and lesbians became public in The San Antonio Express-News. She called homosexuality "disgusting" and said gays should not be allowed to adopt. She has since defended her remarks.Mr. Castro said the passage of the ordinance by the 11-member Council proved that San Antonio belongs to everyone, regardless of the stance of Republican leaders. "It's not surprising during campaign season that politicians from outside the city would chime in on an issue like this," he said. "I respect their perspective, but we did what's in the best interest of San Antonio."
AVA, Mo. — Rick Fausett bobbed onto the deck of the campground pool, clutching a Busch Light with one hand and waving the other like a wand. He wore nothing but flip-flops and a top hat decorated with long pheasant feathers and fabric-spun magenta poinsettias."Mr. DeMille, I'm ready for my close-up," he said, repeating a line from the 1950 movie "Sunset Boulevard."Across the pool, a bald man with a large stomach sitting naked in a chair turned to a friend and murmured out the side of his mouth, "You think that's just a tad gay?"These rolling woods of the Ozarks — where a billboard along a major highway proclaims that marriage is the union of one man and one woman, where a "Jesus Saves" sign and other Christian symbols decorate front lawns — seem an unlikely place for gay people to feel comfortable being out and open.But tucked in the backcountry here is a place where gay men are unabashedly celebratory and self-deprecating about their lives: Cactus Canyon Campground, a 700-acre, clothing optional, all-male hideaway.In its 15th season, the campground has become so popular that the owners are in the process of tripling its RV capacity, adding more spaces for tents and installing a second pool.Most surprising, perhaps, is the way local residents generally react to the camp nowadays: with a shrug, or maybe an awkward grin. Once the target of notable harassment — gunshots, vandalism and runoff from a strategically placed hog farm — Cactus Canyon now enjoys a much more peaceful existence."Live and let live," said Jim Luellen, 68, who owns a convenience store in nearby Gentryville.His sister, Kathy Haynie, 72, said: "It's not right for men or women being homosexual or whatever you call it. But it's their lives. It isn't bothering us."Nearly a decade ago, Missourians voted overwhelmingly for a constitutional amendment banning same-sex marriage, and there is no sign of a serious effort to overturn that anytime soon. Still, the story of Cactus Canyon offers one example of the evolving gay experience in this country.After vacationing in the region, a gay couple, Chaz Franzke and Jim Thideman, became so enamored of the scenery that they left their jobs in Wisconsin, bought property and opened the campground in 1999. They sought to establish the delicate balance of engaging with the community while not being bold about their lives. They started a Yahoo Group, Out in the Ozarks, that organized various gatherings for gay people, like breakfasts at a local diner. They had a stand at the farmer's market. They let in a local television station to do a news story.Some in the community did not take too kindly to them. Neighbors fired guns around the camp to scare them. Someone posted threatening signs on trees and painted a message with a derogatory term on their front sign."I couldn't leave here without feeling I was going to be gunned down," Mr. Franzke said.The last straw was when some people put hogs on an adjacent hill and carved out channels in the land so runoff from the site would trickle into the campsite.Mr. Franzke and Mr. Thideman, who broke up as romantic partners a decade ago but continue to run the business together, quickly got the hogs removed with a lawsuit. It was settled in 2009, and Mr. Franzke said the harassment had since ceased because, he thinks, opponents finally got the message that they would stand up for themselves.For the campers lounging by their RVs and the pool on a recent Saturday, concerns extended little beyond whether they were getting the sun to hit all the right places. Here, campers said, they do not have to answer questions about why two men are sharing an RV or endure funny stares."I feel a lot more comfortable around gay people than I do around straight people," said Craig Nelson, 62, sitting beside his 32-foot camper on a plot decorated with elephant ears, weigelas and other plants.Although Mr. Franzke and Mr. Thideman said their primary concern was providing their campers with an enjoyable experience, they acknowledged that the campground's presence might play some role in easing concerns that locals had about gay men and lesbians. Businesses are generally welcoming, Mr. Franzke said, and one liquor store even offers the campers a discount.In each of the past two election cycles, Mr. Franzke even got both sheriff's candidates to do a forum at the campground, after one of them wanted to rebut a rumor that he had once said he would run gay men and lesbians out of the county if he was elected."For a place that, before, people used to hide and not be out, it's now a community," Mr. Franzke said. "The gays and lesbians are out in the community and proud of it. We've come a long ways."
MIAMI — The nomination of a gay black Miami judge to the federal bench will not move forward after Senator Marco Rubio announced he was withdrawing his support over concerns about the judge's actions in two criminal cases.Without Mr. Rubio's approval, Judge William Thomas's nomination to the Federal District Court for the Southern District of Florida, in Miami, is effectively blocked. Judge Thomas, who serves on the Miami-Dade Circuit, was nominated by President Obama, with Mr. Rubio's backing, more than 10 months ago.Senator Bill Nelson, Democrat of Florida, signed off on the nomination on July 24 after a background check raised no red flags. For a confirmation to proceed, nominees must secure the approval of both United States senators in their home state.Supporters of Judge Thomas, who grew up on welfare in Pennsylvania in a family of 10 children, said Mr. Rubio's opposition was rooted in politics, not court rulings. Mr. Rubio, a Republican, has seen his allure among conservatives tumble, a result of his aggressive push for immigration reform. In recent weeks, he has scarcely mentioned immigration, keeping his focus mostly on issues with broad conservative appeal like abortion and health care.Had he been confirmed by the United States Senate, Judge Thomas would have become the first black openly gay man on the federal bench."As much as I would like to think that politics has nothing to do with this, it looks as if it does," said Yolanda Strader, president of Miami's largest association for black lawyers, who called Judge Thomas one of the hardest working on the bench. "It would be unfair to prevent a well-qualified judicial nominee from proceeding with the nomination process because he is an openly gay black male."Ms. Strader said the group has started an information campaign on social media and is considering an online petition to help move the nomination forward.A spokeswoman for Mr. Rubio said in a statement that there were  concerns about Judge Thomas's "fitness" for the federal bench. "Those concerns include questions about his judicial temperament and his willingness to impose appropriate criminal sentences," the spokeswoman said.Mr. Rubio, who after a long delay approved the nomination last week of another black Florida judge, took issue with Judge Thomas's actions in two criminal cases. But in one of the cases, involving a sentencing in a hit-and-run, Mr. Rubio's criticism was blunted by both the lead prosecutor in the case and the administrative judge for 11th Judicial Circuit criminal division.Both of them wrote letters to Mr. Rubio, who felt the sentence was too lenient, saying that Judge Thomas acted fairly and well within the law.Early this year, Judge Thomas sentenced Michele Traverso, 26, who killed a bicyclist, to 22.6 months in prison. Investigators suspected that Mr. Traverso, who was enrolled in a drug-court program for cocaine, had been drinking before the accident. Mr. Traverso did not turn himself in until the day after the bicyclist's death.The prosecutor said the case was hamstrung from the start. The delay in surrendering to the police meant that blood-alcohol levels could not be measured. As a result, prosecutors could not charge Mr. Traverso with driving under the influence, only with leaving the scene of an accident.What is more, his lawyer told the court that he, and not his client, was to blame for the delay in Mr. Traverso's surrender.Another complication is that Mr. Traverso suffers from a potentially fatal immunological disorder that makes him susceptible to infection. An aunt and an uncle both died young from the disease.Mr. Traverso had already served nearly a year so he was permitted to serve out the rest in a Miami jail, where his doctor could treat him, and then serve two years of house arrest. The sentence fell within the guidelines.In a letter of support for the judge to Mr. Rubio, the prosecutor Jane Anderson said the sentence was disappointing but understandable, given the complicated facts in the case and the lesser charge. The judge conducted the sentencing hearing "with compassion and careful judgment," she said.Mr. Rubio also expressed concern over Judge Thomas's decision to keep out a confession in a murder case involving five defendants in which a young woman was raped and shot to death, and her boyfriend left for dead.Judge Thomas ruled that two of the defendants in the case, including a 15-year-old, either had not been properly read their Miranda rights or had not understood them. The rulings were appealed and Judge Thomas was partially affirmed by the appellate court.All five defendants ultimately were convicted or pleaded guilty.The Congressional Black Caucus has been critical of Republicans in Congress who are holding up judicial nominations, including for a number of black judges. The group said that out of 787 federal positions, only 95 are held by black judges."That is a slender reed for Senator Rubio to hang this on," said Representative Alcee Hastings, Democrat of Florida, referring to the two court cases. "Decisions in this country need to be made by females and Latinos and Asians and blacks."
PORTERVILLE, Calif. — The mayor of Porterville did not give it much thought when a local gay activist in this remote Central Valley farming town asked her to proclaim June a month of gay pride. But when the mayor, Virginia R. Gurrola, settled into her seat at City Hall to sign the proclamation, people were pouring out of the chambers and into the hallways, citing Scripture in opposition to what she had thought of as a simple ceremonial gesture. Her four fellow City Council members announced they would not join her in signing the document.And as of last week, Ms. Gurrola was the former mayor of Porterville, voted out in a sudden reorganization meeting pushed by her dissenting Council members. The Council, over her objections, revoked the gay rights proclamation, replacing it with a more anodyne measure calling for "good will to all." "This was nothing other than a desire to be inclusive as a community," Ms. Gurrola said. "I never dreamed of the controversy it would create.""The proclamation was a proclamation," said Ms. Gurrola, 62, the mother of three sons (and grandmother to seven) who is a retired director of admissions at Porterville College. "We could have gone on from there. We could have gone on and continued with the business of the city."Instead, the fight here stretched over a summer, angering stunned public officials and residents in a community where the Council is more typically embroiled in battles over sewer rates or a tire repair shop that wanted to open in a residential neighborhood.The events in this small town stand as a reminder that at a time when many states are adopting same-sex marriage and other public support for gay rights has grown markedly, the issue is polarizing in many parts of the country. That is even the case in California, a state that, if increasingly Democratic, has a large swatch of deeply conservative regions."I refuse to marginalize them down to one identifier, their sexual persuasion," said Cameron J. Hamilton, who replaced Ms. Gurrola as mayor. "The gay proclamation is strictly about being gay when in reality everybody is much more than that."Mr. Hamilton said that he had a "gay sister and a gay cousin in Hollywood" and that his opposition to this was different from when he championed a City Council resolution supporting Proposition 8, which in 2008 banned gay marriage before ultimately being overturned by the Supreme Court."Proposition 8 was a religious stance on my part, in support of traditional marriages," Mr. Hamilton said.By every measure, California is, and has been, at the leading edge of the gay rights movement. The earliest modern gay liberation groups in the nation were created 60 years ago in San Francisco and Los Angeles — the Daughters of Bilitis and the Mattachine Society.Porterville, a largely Latino agrarian community with a population of 54,000, is in the heart of the San Joaquin Valley, on the edge of the Sequoia National Forest, and surrounded by orange, lemon, pistachio and almond fields, as well as bobbing oil derricks. It is a town that has seen better days, with some buildings on its main streets abandoned.The three Council meetings devoted to this subject drew a large attendance of Mormons and members of the Church of the Nazarene, a powerful force here. Mr. Hamilton is a member of the church, and its minister, Mark Pitcher, offered a 50-minute sermon against homosexual conduct in the middle of the debate, and posted it on the church's Web site."Same-sex attraction is not a sin," Mr. Pitcher said. "What is the sin is acting upon that attraction. We're all tempted but temptation does not become a sin in your life until you act on it."In the course of his sermon, Mr. Pitcher expressed regret at what he said was rising pressure from society — including the news media and the entertainment industry — to press the acceptance of homosexuality. He argued that gay men and lesbians tended to live shorter and unhappier lives, be more prone to disease and suicide, saying, "We are praying for them to come into a right and growing relationship with Jesus."By contrast, the gay community, as much as there is one, appears minuscule. There are no gay bars — though a local biker bar has a gay night every Tuesday — and Brock Neeley, who asked Ms. Gurrola to sponsor the proclamation, became a bit of a local celebrity after he and his partner of 12 years, John Coffee, became the first same-sex couple in Tulare County to get married in 2008.
WASHINGTON — For couples who plan to get hitched at the courthouse here, marital bliss may be tempered by the government shutdown.The Family Court Marriage Bureau will not perform weddings until the government reopens, according to the District of Columbia Courts, although couples will still be able to file marriage license applications and pick up licenses they had previously applied for.Shutdown-related disruptions have been kept at a minimum in the nation's capital — so far — because Mayor Vincent C. Gray has deemed all city employees "essential" and protected from furlough. But the courts are run separately by the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration.The decision not to perform weddings comes after the courts expanded the Marriage Bureau in September to meet the increase in demand that followed the Supreme Court's ruling that struck down a federal law depriving same-sex couples of federal benefits.Washington raises its own revenues, but its spending requires Congressional approval that is cut off by the shutdown. Mr. Gray says the city has enough money in its emergency reserves to pay salaries for only about two weeks.House Republicans did not include the courts in a bill approved on Wednesday that would allow financing to resume for the District of Columbia. The measure lacked substantial support from Democrats — and is likely to die in the Senate — despite a plea from the city's nonvoting delegate, Eleanor Holmes Norton, to "keep the District open."Despite the impasse, some court functions continue: Juveniles must report for probation hearings, and the courts will accept filings and payments. Residents will still have jury duty, too."Trials are essential," according to a Twitter message from the courts.
Mormons hoping for change were buoyed when one of their church's top leaders gave an address last weekend offering an outstretched hand to those who struggle with doubts about the church's history and doctrines.They greeted the words of President Dieter F. Uchtdorf, second counselor in the church's top governing body, the first presidency, as a groundbreaking admission that "mistakes" by fallible church leaders in the past have sown the seeds of doubt today.But they were sobered when Mr. Uchtdorf was followed by several other leaders who dashed any expectations that the church would open the priesthood to women or accept gay marriage. Mormon women who tried to join the ticket line for a men's-only priesthood meeting were turned away and then blocked from the door by a garbage truck."I see the uneven and different messages from the pulpit this weekend as evidence that there is a robust conversation happening at the church office building about the faith crisis and gender issues," said Joanna Brooks, a professor of English and comparative literature at San Diego State University and the author of "The Book of Mormon Girl: A Memoir of an American Faith.""This is how continuing revelation works in Mormonism, when members discuss, debate and hunger for answers amongst themselves, and our leaders try to sort it out," she said.The speeches and the women's protest took place during the General Conference of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, when its top authorities twice a year address 20,000 members at a conference center in Salt Lake City and millions more by telecast around the world. The church now counts 15 million members worldwide.Michael R. Otterson, managing director of public affairs for the church, said the talks at the General Conference were intended to inspire, uplift and counsel individual members, and were not political pronouncements."General Conference is not to be understood through sound bites, especially when people take a sentence here and there and try to justify their own political agendas. That reflects a very poor level of spiritual maturity," he wrote in an e-mail in response to questions.The church's top authority is its president and prophet, Thomas S. Monson, but at age 86 his strength is waning, according to many familiar with the church's leadership. At the conference, he spoke of his grief over the death of his wife this year.President Uchtdorf is one of the two counselors who advise President Monson. He startled many listeners by speaking with empathy for Mormons who doubt or even leave the church."Sometimes we assume it is because they have been offended, or lazy, or sinful. Actually, it is not that simple," he said."Some struggle with unanswered questions about things that have been done or said in the past," he said. "To be perfectly frank, there have been times when members or leaders in the church have simply made mistakes. There may have been things said or done that were not in harmony with our values, principles, or doctrine."He added that while God is perfect, God "works through us, his imperfect children."Terryl and Fiona Givens, married Mormon scholars who conducted a series of seminars in the United States and Europe this year for Mormons struggling with questions about their faith, said that Mr. Uchtdorf's talk was seminal because of the admission that church leaders were fallible."In a single blow, it shattered the cultural mythology that has been at the root of the doubt and disaffection that affects our members," said Terryl Givens, a professor of literature and religion at the University of Richmond and the author of books on Mormonism.Mrs. Givens said, "I'm looking at his talk as the balm of Gilead for many people who are struggling with questions to which they cannot find answers."The history that has unsettled some Mormons includes the facts that the church's founder and first prophet, Joseph Smith, married multiple women, many of whom already had husbands; and that Brigham Young, who succeeded Smith, barred blacks from the priesthood — a policy reversed in 1978 by declaring a new revelation from God.The Mormon Church does not condone gay marriage but includes active members who are increasingly making their dissent known. Apostle Dallin H. Oaks, a former Utah Supreme Court justice, told the conference that the church's policies on homosexuality are "determined by the truths God has declared to be unchangeable."
DENVER — As he made his way across the country, Joe Bell walked through rain squalls, slept in ditches and talked to anyone who would listen about how his gay son had killed himself after being taunted and bullied at school.Mr. Bell's artificial knees ached and his feet were mapped with blisters, but he told friends and strangers that he was determined to make it on foot from his home in eastern Oregon to New York City, where his son, Jadin, 15, had dreamed of one day working in fashion or photography. "I miss my son Jadin with all my heart and soul," he wrote on Facebook in late May. "I know you're with me on this walk."But last Wednesday, Mr. Bell's American journey — one that drew attention from local newspapers and attracted thousands of followers on social media — ended in an instant on a two-lane road in rural eastern Colorado. He was struck and killed by a tractor-trailer whose driver had apparently fallen asleep, the state police said.For nearly six months, Mr. Bell, 48, had been on the road, sharing his son's story and trying to salve his own grief. He spoke at motorcycle rallies and college bars, schools, diners and gay-outreach centers, telling people about his sensitive, artistic son who hanged himself from a piece of playground equipment on Jan. 19.While Jadin had plenty of friends and support — 200 classmates and community members showed up at a vigil while he lingered on life support — he also stood out in his hometown, La Grande, Ore., family friends said. Some students pushed him around at school, or threw things at him on the street, said Bud Hill, a friend of Mr. Bell's who knew Jadin for most of his life."He was very open and very proud," Mr. Hill said in an interview.After Jadin died in early February, Mr. Bell lay in bed and wondered what he could have done differently, reproaching himself for missing signs or yelling at his son for smoking days before he hanged himself, his friends said. One day, he decided he needed to get out on the road, joining scores of others who have crossed the country to raise money or promote social causes. For Mr. Bell, the cause would be his son."He had to heal himself," Mr. Hill said.Mr. Bell mapped out a route and assembled a network of friends who would track his progress from afar. He quit his job at a plywood mill, threw some clothes and a sleeping bag onto his back and loaded up a three-wheeled pushcart with food and gallons of water, then set off on April 20. As he walked east, from Oregon to Idaho to Utah to Colorado, he chronicled his progress in Facebook posts and videos describing the people who fed him chicken dinners, refilled his water jugs and lent him a bed and made small donations to keep his trek going.He wrote about sleeping under the stars, and described how a sunset in Utah made him miss his family and wish he could be with them. Sometimes, he would meet up with his partner, Lola Lathrop, or one of his three other children when he stopped in a big city. Mostly, he was alone.He considered how long he would be on the road — two years, at least — and wrestled with the hunger, aches and loneliness that accompanied his trip."I'm going through a tough time right now," he said in a video message posted on Facebook in early October as he headed away from Denver. "I'll get it straightened out by the time I get to Wichita."He met people everywhere, knitting together a diaspora of friends, family and strangers who are now reeling from his death.Ed the cabdriver helped him when his pack got too heavy. Juliet at the Turkey Crossing Cafe fed him dinner. Jim and Janice gave him a warm bed. In Utah, when his pushcart was stolen and a sinus infection hobbled him, Ann Clark helped him find a place to stay after meeting him on the road, and helped organize meetings in Salt Lake City where Mr. Bell could speak."I worried about his safety," Ms. Clark said. "There were times I said, 'I wish you'd go home.' "When Mr. Bell was alone in the mountains or the desert, he would unfurl his sleeping bag and sleep under a tree or along the side of the road. He spent weeks in larger cities, finding speaking opportunities and a place to sleep and do laundry with members of anti-bullying organizations and suicide-prevention groups.Many of them offered to drive him down the road, but Mr. Bell always demurred. He would accept rides inside a city or to a particular destination, but once he was back on the road, every inch had to be on foot.The day he died, Mr. Bell had been trying to log a few more miles before speaking at a Methodist church in Hugo, Colo. A day earlier, he and the sheriff of Lincoln County had started chatting on the side of the road, and bonded quickly as fathers of gay sons. The sheriff, Tom Nestor, set up a talk for Wednesday evening.Mr. Nestor had been planning to fetch Mr. Bell when he got word that a pedestrian had been hit along Highway 40. He raced to the scene. Mr. Bell's cart was lying in the road. Medics were already covering his body.On Thursday, he will be remembered at a memorial service in Oregon."I got down on one knee and put my hand on Joe's head and said a silent prayer," Sheriff Nestor said in an e-mail."I only knew him for a very short time but this man had to of made a huge difference in everyone he met. He made me realize how important basic humanity still is."
DETROIT — A federal judge on Wednesday ruled that a case contesting Michigan's ban on same-sex marriage would go to trial early next year, one among some 30 such challenges playing out in courthouses around the nation.Here, advocates for same-sex marriage and even some opponents had speculated that the judge, Bernard A. Friedman, of the Eastern District of Michigan, might go further and overturn the state's nine-year-old constitutional amendment on marriage as early as Wednesday.Some gay couples said they had already made plans to seek marriage licenses. And a representative for Bill Schuette, the Michigan attorney general, whose office has defended the state's ban, issued a directive to county clerks in the event that the judge ruled against the state, advising them that they were forbidden to issue marriage licenses to same-sex couples until appeals were completed.In the end, Judge Friedman delayed an answer to the issue, instead suggesting that a trial, set for Feb. 25, would examine a central legal question surrounding the issue in Michigan, but also elsewhere: whether the rationales for a ban on same-sex marriage serve a legitimate state interest.In June, the Supreme Court struck down the federal Defense of Marriage Act, thus requiring the government to provide benefits to same-sex couples just as it does to heterosexual couples. But the court also left other questions unanswered, and challenges invoking that ruling have since emerged in courts, as well as renewed focus on cases that had been filed earlier, including one here.Thirteen states and the District of Columbia permit same-sex marriage. Same-sex couples could begin marrying in New Jersey as early as next week under a ruling in the courts there last month, but Gov. Chris Christie's administration is seeking a stay until an appeal can be resolved.In a way, Michigan is an unlikely place for the fight over marriage. Republicans control the governor's office and both chambers of the Legislature. Voters approved a constitutional provision defining marriage as between a man and a woman in 2004, and organizers of an effort to overturn the ban with a new referendum say that is three years away from going to voters.The federal lawsuit began as a limited challenge to the state's adoption laws but was later amended to include the broader question of marriage. April DeBoer and Jayne Rowse of Hazel Park, Mich., contended that the state laws prevented them from adopting children together, although they were raising three young children together as a family. Ms. Rowse adopted their two boys, and Ms. DeBoer their girl."Like with most couples, you want to know as a parent that if something happens to you, the children will be with their other parent, and you can live the rest of your life without worrying about what might happen," Ms. DeBoer said. "But then we found that that couldn't be done."Lawyers for the state and critics of same-sex marriage say voters should decide the matter. "The citizens of Michigan, like those of over half the states, made their decision at the ballot box, and only they should have the prerogative to change that decision," said Austin R. Nimocks, senior counsel for the Alliance Defending Freedom.
SANTA FE, N.M. — The New Mexico Supreme Court is poised to decide once and for all whether same-sex marriage is legal in this state, addressing an issue that the Legislature has for years failed to resolve and the governor has avoided — but that Democratic county clerks have embraced, under threats of legal action and at considerable political risk.In a packed hearing at the territorial courthouse here on Wednesday, one broadcast live for the first time in the court's history, lawyers for both sides presented their cases, trying in their arguments to resolve the question: Do gay men and lesbians have a constitutional right to marry in New Mexico?The case reached the Supreme Court here with unprecedented speed, propelled by the state's 33 county clerks, who in August petitioned for legal guidance on whether they were allowed to grant marriage licenses to same-sex couples. Seven of them started doing so in recent months, backed by district court rulings that affirmed the rights of same-sex couples based on a provision of the New Mexico Constitution that prohibits discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation.So far, the biggest winner is Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican who tempered her personal opposition to same-sex marriage by saying that voters ought to decide. In hearing the case, the Supreme Court effectively took her out of the equation, deflecting pressure from religious conservatives, who have carried the opposition to same-sex marriage in the state, as well as criticism from progressive groups, which turned the debate into a referendum about fairness.In court, one of the lawyers for the Republican legislators opposed to same-sex marriage argued that defining marriage was a matter of policy, and as such should be left to the Legislature. Later, Sean Cunniff, an assistant attorney general representing Judge Alan M. Malott of Albuquerque, who issued the ruling allowing the Bernalillo County clerk to grant same-sex marriages, said, "The political process hasn't functioned to eliminate the stalemate."Fourteen states have made same-sex marriage legal, while 35 states have banned it. On Monday, Hawaii's Legislature will hold a special session to debate a same-sex marriage bill. There is a bill pending before the House of Representatives in Illinois.New Mexico remains the only state that does not have a law or constitutional amendment allowing or prohibiting same-sex marriage, and it also does not recognize domestic partnerships. Its statutes governing the rights of married couples are ambiguous: some use gender-specific terms, others do not. And while marriage license applications are gender-neutral, marriage licenses contain the terms "bride" and "groom.""Today, this court is given the opportunity to give credence to the notion of equality," Maureen Sanders, a lawyer for same-sex couples who filed a lawsuit in March seeking the right to marry, told the five justices. "The court can bring certainty to the uncertainty in the state."Throughout the hearing, the justices fired off numerous questions, asking, among other things, if it was rational to recognize same-sex marriages performed in other states, as New Mexico does, yet bar them from being performed in New Mexico.One of the justices, Charles Daniels, told James A. Campbell, a lawyer for Alliance Defending Freedom, a conservative Christian organization based in Arizona, who argued the case for the opposition, that "in the real world," the debate over same-sex marriage is a debate about religion and it has "no place" in the court's deliberations.To Miriam Rand, 63, and Ona Porter, 67, partners for 25 years with three daughters, including one who has multiple sclerosis, the issue, ultimately, is legitimacy."Our family has been like every other family," Ms. Rand said outside the courthouse. "We've cared for one another, we've loved one another, yet we're challenged at every step."It was unclear when the Supreme Court would rule on the case.With same-sex marriage off the ballot in 2014, Democrats are working to figure out other ways to draw out progressive voters in their effort to defeat Governor Martinez, whose popularity has never dipped below 50 percent and whose fund-raising machine reaches far beyond state borders. As of Oct. 7, she had brought in $3.3 million, or more than 20 times the amount raised by the leading Democrat vying for her post, the state's attorney general, Gary King.The state's Democratic Party chairman, Sam Bregman, is plotting another line of attack, homing in on the state's dismal social indicators — it has the worst rate of childhood poverty in the nation, and one of the lowest rates of education attainment — to undermine Ms. Martinez's economic development accomplishments, like the industrial complex in southern New Mexico where Union Pacific is building a $400 million rail facility.In an interview, Mr. Bregman said the strategy included pushing for another ballot question, one focused on whether the state should devote a portion of the royalties it gets from oil and gas production to pay for early-childhood education programs. The idea has been floated in the Legislature, but like the same-sex marriage bills proposed over time, there has never been decisive action.
WASHINGTON — Senator Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, said Wednesday that he would vote for a nondiscrimination bill that protects gay men, lesbians and transgender people, putting the measure within one vote of gaining the support it needs to overcome a filibuster.Mr. Manchin was the only Democrat who had not signaled how he would vote. His support means that all 55 members of the Democratic majority are expected to get behind the bill, known as the Employment Nondiscrimination Act, which has languished in various forms in Congress for nearly 40 years. Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, could bring it to the floor as early as next week."There's no way that I could ever not support something that basically bans discrimination," Mr. Manchin said. "There's no way. It's just a fundamental right."Four Republicans have also expressed support, meaning there are now 59 senators who are on record as favoring the measure. Sixty votes are needed to overcome a filibuster.The Republicans who are expected to vote yes are Susan Collins of Maine, Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, Mark S. Kirk of Illinois and Lisa Murkowski of Alaska. Ms. Collins and Mr. Kirk, who are cosponsors of the bill, have been working to persuade colleagues on their side of the aisle.So far, the most likely undeclared Republican supporter appears to be Rob Portman of Ohio, who said this week that he was inclined to vote yes. Mr. Portman said earlier this year that he had come around on the issue of same-sex marriage after learning that his son is gay.While Mr. Manchin's support makes it much more likely that the bill will get through the Senate, the Republican-controlled House of Representatives is another story.The bill would grant protection from discrimination to people on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity. It would be the first measure of its kind to advance to the floor in either house of Congress. Previous versions of the bill that have come to a vote have not included provisions for transgender people.There is no federal law prohibiting discrimination in the workplace based on sexual orientation; 29 states also do not have such a law.
OSSINING, N.Y. — One morning last summer, Connie Knapp got a phone call from her minister. Several days earlier, the Supreme Court had handed down a ruling fortifying the movement for same-sex marriage. Her pastor, the Rev. Chip Low, had a feeling that Ms. Knapp and her partner, Anne Corey, might want to have a wedding.For going on 30 years, since they had met in a running club and fallen in love over spaghetti with clam sauce at a Chelsea diner, Ms. Knapp and Ms. Corey had considered themselves a couple. Yet even after gay marriage was allowed in New York State, they had vowed not to wed as long as the Defense of Marriage Act remained a federal law.Now the high court had struck down a key part of the measure, which had denied federal benefits to married same-sex couples. After years of enduring opprobrium from religious conservatives, of being told that gays and lesbians were evil and immoral and intrinsically disordered and had provoked the Almighty to cause 9/11, the women had a friendly minister who had hung the rainbow flag outside his church and was offering to officiate at their ceremony.There was just one obstacle. Ms. Knapp, born and raised Catholic, was now a Presbyterian studying for the ministry. Ms. Corey was from a Reform Jewish background. The women, both 65, were about to discover that in an era of growing acceptance of gay marriage, they would have no trouble finding clergy members ready to perform a same-sex ceremony. An interfaith ceremony, however, looked like a deal-breaker.If the realization took them by surprise, Ms. Knapp and Ms. Corey were far from alone. As tolerance for same-sex marriage rapidly grows, interfaith gay couples are finding that the same spiritual leaders who support the civil right to wed might object on theological grounds to religiously mixed ceremonies."I have absolutely observed that increasing phenomenon over the years," said Idit Klein, the executive director of Keshet, an advocacy organization for Jews who are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender. "I've seen it go from being difficult to find a rabbi to officiate at same-sex weddings to now having rabbis call me and say, 'I've never done a gay wedding and I want to' — a real eagerness to show solidarity. Something profound has shifted.""But what hasn't shifted appreciably is most rabbis' views of interfaith marriage," Ms. Klein said. "Having interfaith families in their congregation is one thing, but officiating at the wedding is another."Keshet has a database of 713 rabbis or synagogues willing to perform same-sex weddings. Of those, however, Ms. Klein estimated, only about 20 percent are willing to hold interfaith ceremonies. Within the Reform Jewish movement, which has a decades-long record of supporting gay rights, only about half of its rabbis will conduct interfaith ceremonies, regardless of a couple's sexual orientation. The Conservative movement's rabbinical association has published guidelines for same-sex weddings, but prohibits its members from presiding at interfaith weddings.The varying rules and norms within the rabbinate, in turn, put Christian clergy members in a reactive position. Among ministers willing to perform same-sex weddings, even within the faith, almost all are from the liberal mainline Protestant denominations.At ground level, as couples like Ms. Knapp and Ms. Corey have discovered, fixed rules sometimes matter less than personal comfort levels. Some rabbis will marry an interfaith couple if the entire liturgy is Judaic; others, if the couple promise to raise their children as Jews. Some rabbis will co-officiate with non-Jewish clergy, while some will not. They may or may not accept the use of non-Jewish symbols and texts within the ceremony.Mixing and matching heritages had seemed simple to Ms. Knapp and Ms. Corey for most of their decades together. They have held lesbian Seders annually since the mid-1980s, with their own cut-and-paste Haggadot. Ms. Corey goes to church with Ms. Knapp on Christmas and Easter. They read from a book of religious meditations each morning.
WASHINGTON — A major test of how carefully Republicans can navigate the intraparty politics of sexuality will come on Monday, when the Senate holds a crucial vote on a bill to outlaw workplace discrimination against gay men, lesbians and transgender people.The anticipated vote comes four months after the Supreme Court invalidated a federal ban on recognizing same-sex marriages, and nearly a year after some conservative leaders warned that losses in the 2012 elections exposed the party as being out of touch with much of the country on social issues.With the bill apparently just one vote short of the threshold to prevent a filibuster, the Republican senators believed to be the most persuadable — Rob Portman of Ohio, Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire and Dean Heller of Nevada — were keeping their positions private.Political strategists and congressional aides who have been lobbying for the bill say they have received private assurances that there will be enough Republican votes to move the measure forward on Monday, but none of the senators who plan to support it want to say so publicly out of concern that they could become targets by groups opposing the measure.In the House, the best chance for passage this year seems to be to tack the measure onto a larger piece of legislation like the National Defense Authorization Act and hope that conservatives do not revolt."If you've been told your entire career that Republican primary voters are hostile on these issues, and people have only just started to educate you otherwise," said Jeff Cook-McCormac, a Republican lobbyist who has been pushing to get the bill enacted, "it takes a little while for that to sink in."While opposition appears less organized than in previous gay rights debates in Congress, senators of both parties said the emotion surrounding the issue had complicated efforts to break a Republican filibuster attempt.One senator recalled having to explain to a colleague that the legislation would not require insurance companies to pay for sex-change operations. Another spoke of phone calls from constituents who were convinced that their children could be taught in school by men wearing dresses. And conservative groups like the Family Research Council are warning their supporters that the bill would force Christian bookstores to hire drag performers.To break through the misinformation, supporters said, they have presented senators with polls showing that a majority of Republican voters favor protections for gay, lesbian and transgender workers. And they have made appeals to bedrock Republican principles."I'm a Lincoln guy," said Norm Coleman, a Republican former senator from Minnesota who is lobbying for the bill, known as the Employment Nondiscrimination Act. "So if you go back to who we are, what we are about as a party — economic freedom, equality, the right to earn a living — this makes sense."Democrats are confident they will have a good outcome regardless of the final vote, and have pressed ahead despite not being absolutely certain that the bill can pass. If they succeed, it will be the first time the Senate has passed an anti-discrimination bill that protects gay men and lesbians. One failed in 1996, the last time the issue came to a vote on the floor.And if it fails this time, Democrats will be able to frame the loss as a victory by Republican extremists."How can they justify voting against it?" said Barney Frank, who tried to get a nondiscrimination bill passed when he was a Democratic congressman from Massachusetts.When Mr. Frank pushed the bill through the House in 2007 — it would go nowhere in the Senate that year — he had to drop the transgender provision. "Unfortunately, in 2007 we still had the 'ick' factor when people were confronted with transgender," recalled Mr. Frank, one of only a few openly gay or lesbian members of the House at the time.Senator Susan Collins, a Maine Republican who has led the effort in the Senate to persuade more Republicans to vote for the bill, said some colleagues had raised concerns about how transgender people would have to be accommodated, including one who was concerned about insurance covering sex changes. But by and large, she said, she came away from conversations encouraged that many Republicans seemed to be willing to re-evaluate their views on sexual orientation, gender identity and the law.
BOSTON — Michael H. Michaud, a Democrat who represents conservative, northern Maine in Congress and is a leading candidate for governor next year, announced in a newspaper column Monday that he is gay.He said he wanted to address a whisper campaign from his opponents who urged voters to ask whether he is gay."Allow me to save them the trouble with a simple, honest answer: 'Yes, I am. But why should it matter?'" he wrote. "That may seem like a big announcement to some people. For me, it's just a part of who I am, as much as being a third-generation millworker or a lifelong Mainer."Mr. Michaud, 58 and single, is the seventh openly gay member of Congress and one of two openly gay candidates — Heather R. Mizeur, a Democrat in Maryland, is the other — to seek a governorship. No state has elected an openly gay governor. James E. McGreevey, the former governor of New Jersey, announced in 2004 that he was "a gay American" on the day he resigned from office in a scandal.Mr. Michaud faces a three-way contest in Maine. Gov. Paul R. LePage, a Republican with Tea Party backing, is to announce the beginning of his re-election campaign on Tuesday. Eliot Cutler, an independent, is also running. Mr. Michaud has a slight lead in early polling.L. Sandy Maisel, a professor of government at Colby College, said that voters who would oppose Mr. Michaud because he is gay would probably back Mr. LePage anyway.Professor Maisel also said that Mr. Michaud's coming out could help him in at least two ways. It could help him raise money from the national network of gay groups. And it could prompt a second look at him by some of the state's liberal Democrats, including many young people, who were not supporting him."He is not their kind of Democrat," Professor Maisel said. "He's not articulate or charismatic. But this gives them a reason to come back to the Democratic Party. We have no data on that yet, but I know a lot of those people and they have been saying, 'We don't like Michaud but we're afraid to vote for Cutler because it could give the race to LePage.' "That is what happened in 2010. Many Democrats were unhappy with their nominee for governor and backed Mr. Cutler, which allowed Mr. LePage to win with 38 percent of the vote.Mr. Michaud, who is Roman Catholic, represents rural, conservative northern Maine. Last year, voters statewide approved same-sex marriage but his district voted against it.It was perhaps with an eye toward winning over voters in more liberal southern Maine that he wrote a newspaper column last month in which he sought to clarify his position on abortion, saying it had evolved over the years."In the past, I have taken votes that I would not take today," he wrote. "I'm proud to say I now have a 100 percent rating from Naral — the nation's leading organization for women's reproductive rights — as well as a 92 percent rating with Planned Parenthood."
WASHINGTON — A measure that would outlaw workplace discrimination based on sexual orientation and gender identity overcame a significant obstacle in the Senate on Monday as seven Republicans crossed party lines and voted to begin debate on the bill.The 61-30 vote marks the first time since 1996 that the full Senate will consider a measure to extend federal nondiscrimination law to gay, lesbian and bisexual people — a stark reminder, supporters said, that as the public has come around to accepting gay rights, Congress has been slow to keep pace.It is also the first time that either house of Congress has voted on a nondiscrimination bill that includes transgender people.Before the vote, supporters spoke of making history. The occasion moved Senator Mark S. Kirk, Republican of Illinois, to make his first speech in the Senate since suffering a stroke last year. None of the Republicans voting against the measure spoke up."Here we are today, now taking one more step to make the American family more inclusive," said Senator Tom Harkin, Democrat of Iowa. "No one should be discriminated against because of race, sex, religion, national origin, and they shouldn't be discriminated against because of who they love or who they are."Senators are expected to try to amend the bill in the next several days to address Republican concerns. One proposed change would broaden the types of religious groups that are exempt from the bill, and another would make sure religious institutions are not subject to retaliation by the government if they refuse to employ people otherwise covered under the bill.If one of those amendments is approved, the bill's sponsors say they are confident they will be able to maintain the level of support — 60 votes — to break a Republican filibuster attempt and pass the measure.Federal law already protects people from discrimination at work because of race, religion and a number of other factors. But it remains legal in most states to fire or refuse to hire people because they are gay, lesbian, bisexual or transgender. Just 21 states and the District of Columbia offer such protections.President Obama praised the Senate vote, saying, "Inexorably, the idea of a more tolerant, more prosperous country that offers more opportunity to more people, that's an idea that the vast majority of Americans believe in."Senator Susan Collins, the Maine Republican who has pressed colleagues on her side of the aisle to sign on to the bill, said her constituents were often shocked when they learned no such federal nondiscrimination law existed."They just assume that our civil rights laws, which protect people from discrimination based on race, gender, religion, age, also protect individuals based on sexual orientation," she said, calling the measure "common sense."The Republicans joining Ms. Collins and Mr. Kirk were Senators Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire, Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, Dean Heller of Nevada, Rob Portman of Ohio and Pat Toomey of Pennsylvania. Another Republican, Senator Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, who voted for the legislation in committee and supports same-sex marriage, was absent.Despite passing this procedural test, the fate of the bill remained uncertain. The Republican-controlled House was already signaling that the bill was going nowhere fast. Even before the Senate could act on Monday, Speaker John A. Boehner said through his spokesman that the bill "will increase frivolous litigation and cost American jobs, especially small business jobs."Nondiscrimination legislation including sexual orientation and gender identity has languished in Congress for nearly 40 years.In 1996, the Senate came within one vote of passing one. Eleven years later, the House approved legislation protecting gays, lesbians and bisexual people — but only after stripping out the transgender provision. It went nowhere in the Senate.For a few tense minutes on Monday evening, the outcome of the vote was uncertain. Ms. Murkowski's absence meant that one more Republican who had not yet declared support needed to vote yes, or else the bill would have failed to meet the 60-vote threshold.Mr. Portman and the bill's main sponsor, Senator Jeff Merkley, Democrat of Oregon, were in negotiations in the Republican cloakroom just off the Senate floor until the vote's conclusion.It was an unusual scene of last-minute haggling in public view, as the press and spectators in the galleries looked on. About a dozen senators, including Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, and Charles E. Schumer, the No. 3 Senate Democrat, crowded around the entrance of the cloakroom trying to persuade Mr. Portman and Mr. Toomey.In the end, the two agreed to vote yes, after Democrats said they would allow votes on the Republican amendments.
Mike McGinn, who was elected mayor in 2009, was denied a second term on Tuesday as voters turned instead to Ed Murray, a longtime state senator and leader of last year's successful drive for same-sex marriage in the state. It was the third time in just over a decade that an incumbent mayor had lost his job.With two days of ballots counted in the all mail-in election, Mr. Murray led with more than 55 percent of the vote, enough to give him a victory over Mr. McGinn, according to The Associated Press. Mr. McGinn, 53, who had a reputation for bluster, faced widespread voter disapproval over public safety and transportation even as Seattle's economy gained strength and created thousands of jobs as it emerged from the recession.Mr. Murray, 58, who will take office as the city's first openly gay mayor, pledged to start his administration with a new police commissioner and a more collaborative tone at City Hall."Collaboration is not a code word, for, you know, a fluffy approach to administering," Mr. Murray said in a news conference. In the state Legislature, he said, he was able to build coalitions around gay rights and other issues by including opponents in the discussion. "You make them part of the process, and almost every time I've used that method I've been pretty successful in moving controversial issues," he said.Mr. McGinn seemed in some ways like a mayor from central casting when he took office in 2010: a bike-commuting, slightly scruffy, bearded social liberal and former leader of a Sierra Club chapter.But he finished second in the primary election in August behind Mr. Murray, which advanced both men to the general election. Mr. Murray then pulled ahead in fund-raising. His prominent role in the battle to win same-sex marriage rights for Washingtonians last year — hugely popular in Seattle — helped him in many city neighborhoods.The political crosswinds were ferocious for both candidates. Seattle's economy, including in new housing construction, surged under Mr. McGinn, but the city's social strains were almost as marked. The thousands of highly paid tech workers who swarmed into places like South Lake Union, Amazon's headquarters, pushed up rents, raising concern that lower-income residents could be priced out or pushed out.Concerns about safety also created a minefield for the candidates. Mr. McGinn strongly defended his record in overhauling the Seattle Police Department after a report by the Justice Department found a pattern of racial insensitivity and excessive use of force. But a series of highly publicized violent crimes gave Mr. Murray fodder to argue that the McGinn administration was failing to protect residents and keep order."Senator Murray's arrival signals that Seattle wants a new style of leadership," said the City Council president, Sally J. Clark, who endorsed Mr. Murray. "Our city continues to struggle with issues of public safety and transit, parks and urban planning, economic resiliency and civil rights. I'm looking forward to working with an executive who will help us manage these issues."The weak power of incumbency in Seattle actually helped Mr. McGinn in the past. He replaced Greg Nickels as mayor after Mr. Nickels was eliminated in the primary election in 2009.Mr. Nickels had himself taken over for an incumbent, Paul Schell, who ran afoul of the voters and lost in a primary race, leaving office in 2002.
WASHINGTON — At nearly every critical juncture, the Senate bill that passed Thursday banning workplace discrimination because of gender identity and sexual orientation has had an unconventional and powerful ally.Mormons, reflecting shifting attitudes inside their church, have stepped in to provide the political muscle, the additional momentum or the decisive vote. And more often than not, they were not just Mormons, but Republicans.The bill, which passed by a vote of 64 to 32 with 10 Republicans joining, was a priority of Senator Harry Reid, the majority leader, who, as the Mormon Church's highest-ranking member in the government, put the nondiscrimination measure at the top of the Senate's agenda once the government reopened last month. "People shouldn't be able to fire them because of their sexual orientation any more than you can fire them if they're Mormon," Mr. Reid said Thursday in an interview.Senator Orrin Hatch of Utah, who at 79 is one of the Senate's longest-serving members, became the first Republican to signal he would reverse his opposition as the bill faced a crucial vote in committee. He voted against a similar bill the last time it came up in the Senate — 17 years ago — but changed his mind earlier this year after Gordon H. Smith, a fellow Mormon and former Republican senator, convinced him there was nothing in it that violated church doctrine. "The church does want to be helpful where we can be, without violating our own conscience," Mr. Smith, a former bishop, said in an interview.And as the bill approached a vital vote earlier this week, Senator Dean Heller, the Nevada Republican who has taught Sunday school at his Mormon church, provided the crucial 60th vote to break a filibuster.In the end, all but two of the Senate's seven Mormons voted yes.Their support for including civil rights protections for gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender people is the latest example of a broader evolution by some of the most visible members of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, who have come to cautiously embrace gay rights. It is a remarkable turnabout from just five years ago, when the church faced a maelstrom of criticism for backing the initiative in California that took away the right of same-sex couples to marry.Unlike the issue of marriage, which the church views as an inviolable doctrine, nondiscrimination law has become one subject that Mormons of all political stripes can safely seem to support. Indeed, the church publicly backed a provision in Salt Lake City in 2009 that extended many of the same workplace protections as the Senate bill. It did not, however, take a public position during the Senate debate.The church has also embarked on a public relations campaign to soften the perception that it is homophobic. It has even created a website called MormonsandGays.org, which points out that while acting on same-sex attraction is a sin, "With love and understanding, the Church reaches out to all God's children, including our gay and lesbian brothers and sisters."Mr. Heller, who voted against a similar nondiscrimination measure in 2007 when he was a member of the House, said he was typical of members of his faith who had come around on the issue."Where American families are becoming more inclusive, I think the same is true of the L.D.S. faith," he said. "We believe we should treat people with dignity, and you saw that on the immigration reform issue as well. It's an issue of fairness."Success in the Senate guarantees nothing in the House, where the measure faces serious Republican resistance. Speaker John A. Boehner has made no commitment to put it to a vote, a prospect that drew criticism from President Obama after the Senate vote on Thursday. "One party in one house of Congress should not stand in the way of millions of Americans who want to go to work each day and simply be judged by the job they do," the president said in hailing the Senate vote.Building support among the Senate's Mormons had always been part of the strategy for the bill's sponsor, Senator Jeff Merkley, Democrat of Oregon, who reached out to the man he beat in 2008 — Mr. Smith — for help. "He can speak from a perspective that I might not be able to replicate," Mr. Merkley said of his former rival. When Mr. Smith asked how he might help, Mr. Merkley suggested he reach out to Mr. Hatch.Of all the Republican senators who came around to supporting the bill, Mr. Hatch was in some ways the least obvious. He is solidly conservative on social issues like abortion and same-sex marriage. He is one of the oldest members of the Senate. But Mr. Smith, who co-sponsored the hate crimes bill named for Matthew Shepard, said he appealed to Mr. Hatch's "constructive conservatism."Shortly before the committee vote in July, he said he reminded Mr. Hatch about the church's support for the Salt Lake City initiative and impressed on him that this was an issue of conscience. "These are positions that I came to as a matter of my own conscience long ago," he said."It's just the right thing," Mr. Hatch said as he walked into the Senate chamber to vote. "Religion should be respected, and so should people."More so than his Republican colleagues, Mr. Reid has distanced himself from some of his church's attitudes toward homosexuality, most notably saying its involvement in the California same-sex marriage fight was wrongheaded.But he has not always been so open-minded, and in 1996 voted for the Defense of Marriage Act.In an interview on Thursday, he recalled how he once considered sexual orientation "kind of an environmental thing," but said he later realized that orientation was not in fact a choice.He has a lesbian niece who he said had "helped us work our way through the issues." He recalled having two neighbors in Nevada he always called "the bachelors." Thinking of them now, he said, he realizes they must have been gay. "Let's assume they got married. What difference would it make to me and my family? Zero. None. None," Mr. Reid said.He has already been to two same-sex weddings this year, including one where he gave a toast to the grooms.Mormons, who have seen their own share of bias, should be especially sensitive, he said. "I would think that members of the church should understand that one of the things that should be paramount in their minds," he said, "is how they've been treated."
WASHINGTON — The Senate on Thursday approved a ban on discrimination in the workplace based on sexual orientation and gender identity, voting 64 to 32 in a bipartisan show of support that is rare for any social issue. It was the first time in the institution's history that it had voted to include gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender people in the country's nondiscrimination law.Despite initial wariness among many Republicans about the bill, 10 of them voted with 54 members of the Democratic majority to approve the measure.But nothing is guaranteed in the House, where Speaker John A. Boehner has repeatedly said he opposes the bill.President Obama hailed the Senate action and urged House Republican leaders to bring the bill to the floor for a vote."One party in one house of Congress should not stand in the way of millions of Americans who want to go to work each day and simply be judged by the job they do," Mr. Obama said in a statement. "Now is the time to end this kind of discrimination in the workplace, not enable it."Senator Harry Reid, the majority leader, said on Thursday that "the time has come for Congress to pass a federal law that ensures all citizens, regardless of where they live, can go to work not afraid of who they are." He noted that a vast majority of Americans already think such a law is in place. "Well, it isn't already the law," he added. "Let's do what the American people think already exists."Senate Republicans who voted against the bill, known as the Employment Nondiscrimination Act, were muted in their opposition. The first senator to rise and speak against the bill on the floor all week was Dan Coats of Indiana, who said Thursday morning that religious freedoms were at risk, despite the bill's broad exemption for religious institutions.Those exemptions, he said, did not go far enough."We can't pick and choose when to adhere to the Constitution, and when to cast it aside," Mr. Coats said. "The so-called protections from religious liberty in this bill are vaguely defined and do not extend to all organizations that wish to adhere to their moral or religious beliefs in their hiring practices."The bill includes a number of protections for religious entities, some of which were added this week to gain more Republican support. It now contains a provision that says no federal agency or state or local government that accepts money from the federal government can retaliate against religious institutions for not complying. This would include actions like denying them tax-exempt status, grant money, licenses or certifications.The institutions that are exempt from the bill include churches, synagogues and mosques that are expressly religious in nature. This would also extend to schools or retail stores affiliated directly with churches, but it would not apply to those that have only loose religious affiliations.The scene inside the Senate chamber on Thursday was far different from the last time a vote on a gay rights nondiscrimination bill was held 17 years ago. That measure failed by one vote on the same day that a ban on recognizing same-sex marriages overwhelmingly passed. Senators on the floor condemned homosexuality as immoral."The drive for same-sex marriage," Senator Robert C. Byrd, Democrat of West Virginia, said at the time, "is, in effect, an effort to make a sneak attack on society by encoding this aberrant behavior in legal form before society itself has decided it should be legal."Mr. Coats, who was the only Republican to speak against the bill on Thursday, also spoke up in 1996, calling same-sex marriage "trendy moral relativism."On Thursday, Mr. Coats made no mention of homosexuality. He limited his remarks to the religious freedom aspect of the legislation.There was another notable difference from 1996. Two of the Republican senators who voted no then, John McCain of Arizona and Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, voted yes on Thursday.
HONOLULU — When, as most everyone expects, Gov. Neil Abercrombie signs into law same-sex marriage here in the coming days, it may almost seem like a routine event. Hawaii is poised to be among 16 states to approve gay marriage, along with Illinois and shortly after Minnesota, New Jersey and Rhode Island.But the step in Hawaii has special resonance because the contemporary battle over same-sex marriage was born here two decades ago. Such marriages existed nowhere when Ninia Baehr and Genora Dancel, along with two other couples, filed what seemed like an utterly quixotic lawsuit seeking a marriage license. To near universal shock, Hawaii's Supreme Court granted them a victory in 1993, ruling that a refusal to allow gay and lesbian couples to marry was discriminatory and illegal.It was the first judicial expression of an idea that soon caught fire across the country and the world.The ruling prompted a national backlash, with Congress barring federal recognition of same-sex marriage and dozens of states amending their constitutions to define marriage as between a man and a woman, and it was even overruled by Hawaii's voters. But it also opened a huge new front for the gay rights movement, laying the groundwork for scores of legal and political battles ever since.So when it became clear this week in a raucous special session of the State Legislature that same-sex marriage would finally come to Hawaii, it was the closing of a circle."I've got what we Hawaiians call chicken skin — goose bumps," said Daniel R. Foley, now a state judge. As a private lawyer in Honolulu in 1990, he took on the case of same-sex couples seeking marriage licenses after national rights groups had declined it as far-fetched.On Friday, hundreds of gleeful advocates of same-sex marriage waved rainbow flags at the Capitol while hundreds of opponents shouted "Let the people decide" and sang "God Bless America." Friday night, after a day of emotional debate, the House of Representatives passed the bill to expand marriage rights, making its final adoption next week a near certainty as it heads to the Senate before being signed by the governor.The 1993 Hawaii ruling spurred advocacy groups to make marriage equality a prime goal. It energized campaigns that would bring the country's first civil unions in Vermont in 2000 and the country's first same-sex marriage vows in Massachusetts only nine years ago."The case in Hawaii launched the global movement for the right to marry," said Evan Wolfson, president of Freedom to Marry, based in New York, and a longtime strategist on the issue who became co-counsel with Mr. Foley in the follow-up litigation.Mary L. Bonauto, another legal advocate for same-sex marriage, said that "Hawaii really encouraged people on the marriage issue; it showed that a court can get it."Today, more than 30 lawsuits in at least 20 states are testing marriage restrictions in what Ms. Bonauto, a project director of Gay and Lesbian Advocates and Defenders, in Boston, called an "explosion in litigation." They include challenges to state amendments barring same-sex marriage in Nevada and Virginia, demands that Texas grant divorces to same-sex couples married elsewhere and a suit to be decided soon in New Mexico arguing that same-sex marriages are permitted by state law.For Steven H. Levinson, the State Supreme Court justice who wrote the 1993 opinion in Baehr v. Lewin, it is a moment of reckoning. He looks back on his failure to grasp the forces that were unleashed.The few previous suits pushing for same-sex marriage in other states "had been laughed out of court," Mr. Levinson recalled. "I soon realized that this opinion was going to be major.""But I was naïve about how the Baehr decision would be received," he said between meetings this week at the State Capitol, where in retirement he has helped campaign for the long-elusive legislative victory.
HONOLULU — The State House of Representatives passed a bill late Friday to legalize same-sex marriage , all but ensuring that Hawaii will soon join 15 other states and the District of Columbia in allowing gay couples to wed.After 12 hours of heated debate, the House approved the measure on a 30-to-19 vote. The bill will now be sent to the State Senate, which approved same-sex marriage by a wide margin but must accept revisions in the House version for the measure to become law.Gov. Neil Abercrombie, a Democrat who called a special session of the Legislature to address the issue, praised the House action and indicated that he would quickly sign the legislation when it reached him. "I look forward to a successful conclusion to this major step in affirming everyone's civil rights," Mr. Abercrombie said in a statement issued late Friday night.As members of the largely Democratic House debated, they could hear opponents outside chanting, "Let the people decide."Inside the chamber, opponents said the measure would infringe on religious freedom and endanger Hawaiian culture. But a leading supporter of the bill, State Representative Chris Lee, expressed the prevailing view, saying, "In Hawaii we are all minorities, and we all deserve the same dignity and respect."The likely expansion of marriage rights in Hawaii follows 20 years of conflict here over the issue, with religious conservatives leading the opposition. In 1993, the Hawaii Supreme Court issued the nation's first decision that said refusing to allow gay men and lesbians to marry was illegal discrimination.That ruling, at a time when same-sex marriage was not legal anywhere, inspired civil rights advocates across the country to make it a priority in politics and the courts.But it also prompted a backlash. Voters here passed an amendment to the Hawaii Constitution in 1998 that gave the Legislature the power to override the courts and limit marriage to a man and a woman.Opponents of same-sex marriage vowed last week to challenge the expected new law in court, arguing that voters in 1998 intended to ban such marriages. But the state attorney general, David M. Louie, said that under the terms of the amendment, the Legislature clearly retained the authority to decide the issue.The House measure broadened the religious protections beyond those adopted by the Senate. It said not only that pastors and churches could refuse to perform same-sex weddings, but also that church-affiliated facilities and nonprofit groups could decline to provide goods and services for such celebrations.But the bill did not authorize small-business owners like caterers, florists and photographers to discriminate against gay and lesbian couples.
On the morning of Sept. 3, the first day the Pentagon said they could, Alicia Butler and her wife, Judith Chedville, who is a Texas Army National Guard officer, went to Austin's Camp Mabry so Ms. Butler could get a military spouse identification card and register for the same federal marriage benefits provided to wives and husbands of heterosexual service members.The two women handed a sheaf of official papers, including their 2008 California marriage license, to a clerk who glanced at the documents and declared, "It's one of those." She then called over her boss, who told the couple that they would have to travel to a federal military base like Fort Hood, 70 miles to the north, to get the ID, Ms. Butler recalled.The reason: Texas is one of six states refusing to comply with Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel's order that gay spouses of National Guard members be given the same federal marriage benefits as heterosexual spouses. Mr. Hagel's decree, which applies to all branches of the military, followed the Supreme Court's ruling in June that struck down part of the Defense of Marriage Act that had prohibited the federal government from recognizing same-sex marriages.While a majority of states ban same-sex marriages, most are not fighting the new policy. But Pentagon officials say that in addition to Texas, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, Oklahoma and West Virginia have balked. Each has cited a conflict with state laws that do not recognize same-sex marriages. (A West Virginia official said, however, that the state intended to follow the directive.) While the president has the power to call National Guard units into federal service — and nearly all Guard funding comes from the federal government — the states say the units are state agencies that must abide by state laws.Requiring same-sex Guard spouses to go to federally owned bases "protects the integrity of our state Constitution and sends a message to the federal government that they cannot simply ignore our laws or the will of the people," Gov. Mary Fallin of Oklahoma said last week.But the six states are violating federal law, Mr. Hagel told an audience recently. "It causes division among the ranks, and it furthers prejudice," he said. Mr. Hagel has demanded full compliance, but Pentagon officials have not said what steps they would take with states that do not fall in line.Though the government does not keep official figures on same-sex marriages in the military, the American Military Partner Association, which advocates for gay service members, estimates that the number could be 1,000 or more of the nearly half-million National Guard members nationwide, said Chris Rowzee, a spokeswoman for the group.The military grants a range of significant benefits to the spouses of active-duty guardsmen, including the right to enroll in the military's health insurance program and to obtain a higher monthly housing allowance. Spouse IDs allow unescorted access to bases with their lower-priced commissaries.Officials in the six states say they are not preventing same-sex spouses from getting benefits, because those couples can register and receive IDs through federal bases. But those officials conceded that many couples would have to travel hours round trip to the nearest federal installation. Advocates for gay service members, though, fear that some benefits offered on bases, like support services for relatives of deployed service members, could still be blocked.Moreover, gay spouses say that in an age that saw the scrapping of the military's ban on openly gay service members, it is discriminatory — and humiliating — to have to jump through extra hoops to receive benefits.Ms. Butler, a plaintiffs' lawyer in Austin, has had to navigate other tricky legal rules during her relationship with Ms. Chedville, who is now a first lieutenant in the Texas Army National Guard and works as a civilian nurse in Austin.After they started dating, Ms. Chedville deployed to Iraq in 2003 to help repair air bases, but the women had to keep quiet about their relationship because the ban, known as "Don't Ask, Don't Tell," was still law. Five years later, they went to California to get married before a state referendum, Proposition 8, banned same-sex marriages. (Proposition 8 was later overturned.)Ms. Butler is critical of state officials who say they are causing only a minor inconvenience because all the same-sex spouses have to do is travel to a federal base. The reasoning behind that notion, she said, was similar to that of the Southern states that once required separate — but what state officials then insisted were "equal" — water fountains and bathrooms."Sometimes it's about the indignities you make people go through," Ms. Butler said. "It's a petty way to score political points."Aides to Gov. Rick Perry, who is not running for re-election but has not ruled out another presidential bid in 2016, told the commander of the Texas Military Forces (the state's National Guard) that his "is a state agency and as such is obligated to adhere to the Texas Constitution and the laws of this state, which clearly define marriage as being between one man and one woman," said Josh Havens, a Perry spokesman.The state Guard commander, Maj. Gen. John F. Nichols, "wants to support all his soldiers and treat them all equally and fairly, but he cannot break state law," said his spokeswoman, Lt. Col. Joanne MacGregor, who serves in the Texas Army National Guard. She said at least 20 federal installations in Texas were processing the benefits, while Camp Mabry and four other Guard bases on state property were not.General Nichols has asked the state attorney general, Greg Abbott, to issue an opinion on whether there is a way to adhere to Mr. Hagel's demand. Mr. Abbott, a Republican vying to succeed Mr. Perry next year, may not issue an opinion for some months. According to early polls, Mr. Abbott's toughest challenge next year is likely to be in the general election against State Senator Wendy Davis, a Democrat who has supported equal treatment of gay people in the workplace.If Mr. Abbott rules that state officials are allowed to issue IDs to same-sex Guard couples, would Mr. Perry let General Nichols proceed? Mr. Havens, the Perry spokesman, said they would "cross that bridge" later.
BALTIMORE — Cardinal Timothy M. Dolan , in his final address as president of the nation's Roman Catholic bishops, called on them Monday to take up the cause of Christians in places like Iraq, Syria, Nigeria and India who are persecuted and killed for their faith.It was a notable shift in priorities. For the last two years the bishops have poured their time and resources into a campaign to fight what they saw as serious threats to religious liberty in the United States. Their prime concern has been a provision in President Obama's health care overhaul that would force even some Catholic employers to provide contraception in their insurance plans, when Catholic teaching prohibits the use of artificial contraception.But Cardinal Dolan, the archbishop of New York, said that the struggles over religious liberty in the United States "pale in comparison" to the persecution of Christians abroad."Now we are being beckoned — by history, by our Holy Father, by the force of our own logic," he said, "to extend those efforts to the dramatic front lines of this battle where Christians are paying for their fidelity with their lives."The shift in emphasis was the clearest sign that eight months after Pope Francis was elected, his priorities were beginning to trickle down to the organization that Cardinal Dolan leads, the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops. Francis provoked widespread discussion in the church with an interview published in September in which he said that the church should not be so "obsessed" with issues like abortion, gay marriage and contraception — but should instead lead with the Gospel's message of love and mercy.He has said the church must be "for the poor," and has visited with refugees and washed the feet of juveniles in prison, cameras in tow.Archbishop Carlo Maria Viganò, the Vatican's ambassador to the United States, told the bishops that he had met with Francis in June in the pope's simple apartment in the Vatican, and that Francis "made a special point of saying that he wants 'pastoral' bishops, not bishops who profess or follow a particular ideology."Noting the church's diversity, Archbishop Viganò added, "We must take care that, for us as a church, this diversity does not grow into division through misrepresentation or misunderstanding, and that division does not deteriorate into fragmentation."The bishops' religious liberty campaign has put them in a direct and sustained confrontation with the Obama administration — contributing to criticism that the bishops' conference has become enmeshed with the Republican Party. More than 70 lawsuits have been filed against the administration by Catholic universities, hospitals and other entities and by other Christian churches and institutions, as well as by private employers.At a news conference, Cardinal Dolan said that the bishops are not abandoning the religious liberty campaign, and that it had been "very successful." But he said that in the interest of justice and the bishops' own credibility, the bishops should heed the pleas that they have heard from Christians overseas to turn their attention to those who are being killed and persecuted for their faith.He said, "We don't have tanks at our door, we don't have people being macheted on their way home from Mass."In an interview, Archbishop William E. Lori of Baltimore, the chairman of the bishops' ad hoc committee on religious liberty, said, "This doesn't represent a backing away. It represents an amplification."He said that since the lawsuits have resulted in contradictory rulings by various courts, he hoped the Supreme Court would take up the issue. In the meantime, he said the bishops were pursuing "creative solutions" to the health care mandate that may be announced later.The Rev. Thomas J. Reese, a senior analyst for The National Catholic Reporter, a liberal Catholic newspaper and website, said he perceived Francis's effect in the bishops' new approach to religious liberty: "They're not withdrawing that agenda item, but so far in this meeting, they're just not obsessing."The bishops, however, did spend part of their afternoon session hearing an update on their efforts to stop same-sex marriage. One bishop asked whether it was possible to come up with a slogan sufficiently short and memorable to compete with the term "marriage equality" used by gay rights advocates.Archbishop Salvatore J. Cordileone of San Francisco, the chairman of the bishops' committee that works on marriage, said, "We speak about marriage as the union of one man and one woman. I don't think we've come up with a two-word phrase."Several liberal Catholic groups held news conferences outside the bishops' meeting, calling for a focus on poverty and economic injustice.Fred Rotondaro, the chairman of Catholics in Alliance for the Common Good, said, "I want to see the bishops take a role in fighting poverty and inequality in this country, and I don't think they're doing it."
Breaking their silence about the public feud between their two daughters, former Vice President Dick Cheney and his wife, Lynne, said Monday that the situation had pained them, but offered some political cover for their elder child, who is seeking a United States Senate seat in Wyoming.Liz Cheney, 47, was criticized on Facebook on Sunday by her sister, Mary, 44, who is a lesbian and objects to Liz's opposition to same-sex marriage. Mary Cheney and her wife, Heather Poe, have suggested that Liz has always been supportive of their relationship and have questioned how she can do so while publicly opposing same-sex marriage.But Mr. Cheney and his wife appear to be siding with Liz, and said in the statement that it is possible to be loving toward a lesbian sister and her spouse while not embracing the idea of their marrying."This is an issue we have dealt with privately for many years, and we are pained to see it become public," the parents' statement said. "Since it has, one thing should be clear: Liz has always believed in the traditional definition of marriage. She has also always treated her sister and her sister's family with love and respect, exactly as she should have done. Compassion is called for, even when there is disagreement about such a fundamental matter and Liz's many kindnesses shouldn't be used to distort her position."Mr. Cheney is heavily involved in his older daughter's bid for the United States Senate seat in Wyoming and has been helping her to raise money for the race. The Cheneys appear eager to prevent the family feud from becoming an issue in the race.The sisters have not spoken since the summer, and Mary Cheney told The New York Times on Sunday that she would not reconcile with Liz unless she changed her position on marriage.Mary Cheney has kept up her advocacy on her Facebook page, responding sharply to one commenter on the page who urged her to be "lovingly tolerant" of her sister's position on same-sex marriage."This isn't like a disagreement over grazing fees or what to do about Iran," Mary Cheney wrote. "There isn't a lot of gray here. Either you think all families should be treated equally or you don't. Liz's position is to treat my family as second class citizens. That's not a position I can be 'lovingly tolerant' towards."
WASHINGTON — A New Mexico law forbids businesses open to the public to discriminate against gay people. Elaine Huguenin, a photographer, says she has no problem with that — so long as it does not force her to say something she does not believe.In asking the Supreme Court to hear her challenge to the law, Ms. Huguenin said that she would "gladly serve gays and lesbians — by, for example, providing them with portrait photography," but that she did not want to tell the stories of same-sex weddings. To make her celebrate something her religion tells her is wrong, she said, would hijack her right to free speech.So she turned down a request from a lesbian couple, Vanessa Willock and Misti Collinsworth, to document their commitment ceremony. The women, who hired another photographer, filed a discrimination complaint against Ms. Huguenin's studio, Elane Photography. So far, the studio has lost in the courts.There are constitutional values on both sides of the case: the couple's right to equal treatment and Ms. Huguenin's right to free speech. I asked Louise Melling, a lawyer at the American Civil Liberties Union, which has a distinguished history of championing free speech, how the group had evaluated the case.Ms. Melling said the evaluation had required difficult choices. Photography is expression protected by the Constitution, she said, and Ms. Huguenin acted from "heartfelt convictions."But the equal treatment of gay couples is more important than the free speech rights of commercial photographers, she said, explaining why the A.C.L.U. filed a brief in the New Mexico Supreme Court supporting the couple."This is a business," Ms. Melling said. "At the end of the day, it sells services for photographing weddings. This is like putting up a sign that says 'Heterosexual Couples Only.' "Other supporters of gay rights and same-sex marriage said they would strike a different balance."Photographers, writers, singers, actors, painters and others who create First Amendment-protected speech must have the right to decide which commissions to take and which to reject," the libertarian Cato Institute and two law professors — Eugene Volokh of the University of California, Los Angeles, and Dale Carpenter of the University of Minnesota — told the New Mexico Supreme Court.Most discussions of conflicts between religious beliefs and laws banning discrimination against gay people center on the First Amendment's protection of the free exercise of religion. Ms. Huguenin's case relies on a different part of the amendment: its protection of free speech.Ms. Huguenin says the government should not be allowed to compel her to say something she does not believe — that same-sex weddings should be celebrated. For the same reason, she says, she would not want to work on a fictional film about a same-sex marriage even if the actors were straight.Most courts, to say nothing of serious photographers, agree that photography is expression entitled to First Amendment protection. Ms. Huguenin composes and selects images, arranging them in picture books that tell the stories of memorable days. But there are stories that she does not wish to tell.Tobias B. Wolff, a law professor at the University of Pennsylvania who represents Ms. Willock and Ms. Collinsworth, said Ms. Huguenin had given up the right to make that choice when she opened the doors of her business to the public."This was a straightforward case of discrimination in the public marketplace," Mr. Wolff said. "No court has ever held that the First Amendment gives businesses a license to sell goods and services to the general public but then reject customers based on race or religion or sexual orientation, in violation of state law."The New Mexico Supreme Court agreed, saying Ms. Huguenin's "services can be regulated, even though those services include artistic and creative work." Laws banning discrimination, the court said, apply to "creative or expressive professions."Jordan W. Lorence, a lawyer at the Alliance Defending Freedom, which represents Elane Photography, said Ms. Huguenin should be able to decline assignments at odds with her beliefs in a way that, say, motels and hardware stores may not. "There are some professions that are inherently expressive — an ad agency, website designer or even a tattoo artist," he said."A tattoo artist should not be forced to put a swastika on an Aryan Nation guy," Mr. Lorence said. "The government could not force someone to put a bumper sticker on their car that says, 'I support same-sex marriage' or 'I support interracial marriage.' "The court agreed, to a point. "If Elane Photography took photographs on its own time and sold them at a gallery," it said, then it could say what it liked, but a business open to the public must take all comers.Justice Richard C. Bosson concurred with the majority opinion, but uneasily."The Huguenins are not trying to prohibit anyone from marrying," he wrote. "They only want to be left alone to conduct their photography business in a manner consistent with their moral convictions." Instead, they "are compelled by law to compromise the very religious beliefs that inspire their lives.""Though the rule of law requires it," Justice Bosson wrote, "the result is sobering."
John Rechy, the youngest of five children born to poor Mexican parents during the Depression, once wrote, "There was so much poverty and hunger in El Paso and Juarez that we didn't consider ourselves poor, because we ate and had a home." But as a gay boy in Texas, he did often feel like an outsider.His novel "City of Night," which turns 50 this year, chronicles the journey of a young Mexican-American from the border town of El Paso into the gay underworld of Times Square, Hollywood Boulevard and the French Quarter of New Orleans during the 1950s. As the book's jacket boldly announced, "This is a novel about America."In a telephone interview from Los Angeles, where he now lives, Mr. Rechy, 82, said he had written "City of Night" on a rented typewriter in the family's modest home in the projects. He recalled how his brother Robert and his mother, Guadalupe, formed an assembly line around the kitchen table to send his first novel off to his publisher, Grove Press, in New York."It was a great, great night." Mr. Rechy said. "I had to make four carbon copies, and they all had to be separated. So each of us was going around with a stack of papers, laying them out. When my family saw the number of manuscript pages, they must have realized this book was for real.""City of Night" began as an unsent letter to a friend but ultimately appeared as short fiction in Evergreen Review, Big Table, Nugget and The London Magazine.Mr. Rechy said he panicked when the galley proofs arrived. "There was a big problem," he said. "In print, it was all 'different' — wrong." He began the task of rewriting and making adjustments. "The book was virtually rewritten on the margins and on pasted typewritten inserts." He was willing to use his royalties to pay for the corrections, but Barney Rosset, the Grove Press publisher, agreed to the changes.Once the book was published, no one was more surprised by its success than its author."I thought it would be critically successful but not successful in the commercial publishing world," he said. "How wrong I was!"The book sold 65,000 copies in hardcover and remained on the New York Times best-seller list for 25 weeks, peaking at No. 3 and vying with the works of James Michener and J. D. Salinger one month, and those of Ian Fleming and Pearl S. Buck the next.Mr. Rechy had earlier applied to be in Ms. Buck's creative writing class at Columbia University with his story "Pablo!" Buck did not admit him. "Instead of going to Columbia University, I went to Times Square," where he found himself hustling on 42nd Street, Mr. Rechy said in an earlier interview. "I was later invited by Columbia to teach the same class."The year after the novel was published proved difficult. "I was still living in the El Paso projects," he said. "My brother got me an old Studebaker, and I began to travel again. I didn't want to do any kind of publicity. It scared me; it really did. Reviews like the one in The New York Review of Books were devastating."The critical tide soon changed, and writers like Gore Vidal, James Baldwin, Larry McMurtry and Frank O'Hara praised "City of Night" for its new and authentic voice.Back in Texas, Mr. Rechy's groundbreaking work did not sit well in the conservative, mostly Roman Catholic Latino community."For years, people didn't consider me a Mexican-American," Mr. Rechy said. "A couple of Chicano writers got annoyed and angry for me claiming to be Mexican-American. It's been more difficult for me to come out as a Mexican-American than come out as gay."For the gay Chicano writer Benjamin Alire Sáenz, winner of this year's PEN/Faulkner Award and a teacher in the creative writing department at the University of Texas at El Paso, Mr. Rechy's novel is "without a doubt one of the finest literary works ever written.""It saddens me to think that it is rarely taught and mentioned in the Latino literary canon, which only goes to show how homophobic the literary establishment has been," Mr. Sáenz said. "What he taught me is this: to banish all fear when I sit down to write."Half a century later, Mr. Rechy is justly proud that his book has been translated into many languages (including Czech, Chinese and French), has sold millions of copies and has never been out of print. His body of work ranks as a major achievement in American, Latino and gay literature."I have a competition going with 'City of Night,' " Mr. Rechy said. "Today, it is better known than I am. And I might add that book is more loved than I am. People will come up and say, 'I loved your book.' And I say, 'Which one?' I think of Don Quixote, who is more famous than his creator, Cervantes."Mr. Rechy recalled his mother's influence and encouragement in making his novel a success. "I translated parts of the novel into Spanish for my mother, who only spoke Spanish, and she would say, 'You're writing a beautiful book, m'ijo.' When the book was published and there were best-seller lists or new translations, then she would say, with enormous pride, 'Ay, esa "Ciudad de Noche," m'ijo.' " Oh, that "City of Night," my son.Those words became his mantra throughout his literary life.
SAN FRANCISCO — There were times — after he told his parents he was gay, for example, and his mother wept and his father tried to hit him — when Fredy Bolvito curled up on a bench in Union Square here and cried because he had AIDS and no job and no place to stay and he felt, he said, that "my life was over."But there were also days when he sat on the bench in the square and sang "The Star-Spangled Banner," looking up at the flags atop the Westin St. Francis hotel and thinking, "That's breathtaking, that's my American dream." Or when he mingled with tourists, giving them directions to the cable cars, or gazed through the windows at the shoppers in Macy's and was saddened by how rich and healthy they looked.He scavenged for meals in garbage bins. He avoided the homeless shelters, where he had heard that gays were taunted, or worse. His "angel," he said, was in the center of the square: the statue "Victory," a trident in one hand, a wreath in the other."I would look at it at night and think, 'Oh my God, that's my hope,' " he said.San Francisco is often viewed as a Mecca for gay people. But the warmth of the city's welcome can quickly vanish for those who are poor.City leaders were startled this year when a survey revealed that 29 percent of the homeless population —about 2,100 of the 7,350 people counted — identified themselves as gay, lesbian, bisexual or transgender.Bevan Dufty, the director of the city's homelessness initiatives, said he was surprised the percentage held true for all age groups, even adults and the elderly. "What was really staggering was to see that it didn't change as you got older," he said.The survey found that gay, lesbian, bisexual or transgender people who are homeless had higher rates of disability than homeless heterosexuals and were more likely to be homeless when they arrived in the city. Some of them were older gay men with AIDS who had been evicted from their apartments or people who had been cast out by their families in other states. Others, like Mr. Bolvito, a native of Guatemala who graduated from college in Hayward, Calif., with a degree in political science and once worked as a real estate agent, had good jobs that disappeared during the recession.In response to the findings, Mr. Dufty and Kara Zordel, a coordinator of Homeless Connect, organized an event in October that offered medical and dental services and other assistance to gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender people who are homeless. And in August, the city's planning commission approved permits for a 24-bed shelter with a focus on helping them. The shelter is expected to open in the coming months. Other cities have shown interest in San Francisco's efforts, Mr. Dufty said. Officials from Santa Clara and Phoenix attended the Homeless Connect event.Brian Basinger, a co-founder of the AIDS Housing Alliance in San Francisco, said the harassment of gays is common in the city's shelters.People there "do not have a lot of status in society to begin with, and so the way they protect or generate status in these social environments is to step on the queers," Mr. Basinger said.Gay and transgender residents have their shoes stolen, he said. They are robbed or beaten up in line.Mr. Basinger, whose partner was homeless for 10 years and who came close to being homeless himself after he developed AIDS, brought in an architect to design the new shelter."I really wanted to think about how does the built environment impact people's experiences," he said. "So we spent a lot of time thinking that through and talking to people and designing something that was going to be functional and respect people's dignity."But the shelter will house only a fraction of those who are without homes.On a recent evening in the Castro District, Hjalmar Bjorkman, 48, sat cross-legged in a doorway. He has lived in the Bay Area for years. But two months ago, he said, he lost his job at a bar and his partner kicked him out. Since then, he has been sleeping on the sidewalk behind an old theater, he said, or at the home of a friend, who charges him $20 a night for the couch."My ex-partner walks by me every day," Mr. Bjorkman said.Bobby Spencer, 47, arrived in San Francisco from Atlanta in May, thinking he had a job as a nanny with a former co-worker at the company where he had worked as an executive assistant.He was excited about the move. "Being gay in the South is still a lot different than being gay here, even in Atlanta," he said. "I moved here to be queer, that was part of the plan."But the job did not work out and, after having volunteered in soup kitchens in Atlanta, Mr. Spencer abruptly found himself without a place to stay.
WASHINGTON — Supporters of Liz Cheney, whose campaign for a Senate seat in Wyoming got off to a rocky start, have created a "super PAC" to bolster her "name awareness and approval rating." The group is hosting a high-dollar fund-raiser this week in Washington featuring her father, former Vice President Dick Cheney, at a Georgetown restaurant, according to an emailed invitation.Mr. Cheney will be the keynote speaker at a $10,000-per-couple dinner here on Thursday at Cafe Milano to benefit the newly formed Cowboy PAC, a group that aims "to begin a statewide advertising campaign in the very near future.""The goal is to get Liz Cheney to parity in name awareness and sentiment as soon as possible," Sarah Atnipp, a Washington-based fund-raising consultant, wrote Tuesday in an email to Republican donors.Super PACs are free to raise and spend unlimited amounts of money. Ms. Cheney, who is already airing television ads in Wyoming, is challenging Senator Michael B. Enzi in next year's Republican primary.Ms. Cheney spent much of her adult life in the Washington area, and she is trying to respond to charges of carpetbagging by emphasizing her Wyoming roots. But her recent move to the state is already threatening her campaign.Mr. Enzi, who is running for his fourth term, is far better known in Wyoming than Ms. Cheney and is widely considered the front-runner.Thursday night's dinner highlights one of Ms. Cheney's central challenges in trying to unseat the incumbent: She must be able to tap into her father's ample Beltway fund-raising network, while overcoming suspicions that she is more Washington than Wyoming.The fund-raiser comes just over a month after Mr. Cheney pointedly criticized Mr. Enzi for receiving much of his contributions from Washington lobbyists."Mike has a record, if you go back and review his finances, of getting about 84 percent of his campaign funds from Washington-based PACs," Mr. Cheney said in late October on ABC's "This Week." "That's more than any senator of either party. He doesn't get much money from Wyoming."The host of Thursday's event is Red Cavaney, a longtime Washington lobbyist and friend of Mr. Cheney from their days working together in the White House under President Gerald R. Ford. Until Mr. Cavaney retired in 2008, he was the head of American Petroleum Institute, the primary trade group for the oil and gas industry.Mr. Cheney has become a central figure in his eldest daughter's campaign. When Ms. Cheney began her bid over the summer, she told associates that she wanted to win in her own right.But she has plainly recognized what an asset her father can be in a Republican primary. And according to Republicans who have spoken to him, Mr. Cheney, his once-faltering health revived by a new heart, is consumed with helping her win.He is hosting fund-raisers not just for the new super PAC but also for the campaign itself — he appeared with Ms. Cheney at a finance event in Denver last month.And Ms. Cheney has not been shy about emphasizing their relationship. In each of her first two ads, she featured images of the former vice president. One of the commercials included one of her daughters referring by name to her famous grandfather.Last month, when Ms. Cheney and her sister, Mary Cheney, a married lesbian, got into a public argument over same-sex marriage, Mr. Cheney and his wife, Lynne, issued a statement that offered support for Liz's claim that she had never supported same-sex marriage rights.As for the super PAC, Liz Cheney cannot, by law, coordinate with the group. But she has family ties with the operative running Cowboy PAC. According to a one-page memo sent along with the invitation, Cowboy PAC will be based in Cheyenne, Wyo, and managed by Barry Bennett.Mr. Bennett is a Republican operative who has previously worked with Mary Cheney. The organization is still in its nascent stages, though, as the URL on the letterhead simply reads, "This website is currently under construction."
The AIDS epidemic in America is rapidly becoming concentrated among poor, young black and Hispanic men who have sex with men.Despite years of progress in preventing and treating H.I.V. in the middle class, the number of new infections nationwide remains stubbornly stuck at 50,000 a year — more and more of them in these men, who make up less than 1 percent of the population.Giselle, a homeless 23-year-old transgender woman with cafe-au-lait skin, could be called the new face of the epidemic."I tested positive about a year ago," said Giselle, who was born male but now has a girlish hair spout, wears a T-shirt tight across a feminine chest and identifies herself as a woman. "I don't know how, exactly. I was homeless. I was escorting. I've been raped.""Yes, I use condoms," she added. "But I'm not going to lie. I slip sometimes. Trust me — everyone here who says, 'I always use condoms'? They don't always."Besides transgender people like Giselle, the affected group includes men who are openly gay, secretly gay or bisexual, and those who consider themselves heterosexual but have had sex with men, willingly or unwillingly, in shelters or prison or for money. (Most of those interviewed for this article spoke on the condition that only their first names be used.)Nationally, 25 percent of new infections are in black and Hispanic men, and in New York City it is 45 percent, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the city's health department.Nationally, when only men under 25 infected through gay sex are counted, 80 percent are black or Hispanic — even though they engage in less high-risk behavior than their white peers.The prospects for change look grim. Critics say little is being done to save this group, and none of it with any great urgency."There wasn't even an ad campaign aimed at young black men until last year — what's that about?" said Krishna Stone, a spokeswoman for GMHC, which was founded in the 1980s as the Gay Men's Health Crisis.Phill Wilson, president of the Black AIDS Institute in Los Angeles, said there were "no models out there right now for reaching these men."Federal and state health officials agreed that it had taken years to shift prevention messages away from targets chosen 30 years ago: men who frequent gay bars, many of whom are white and middle-class, and heterosexual teenagers, who are at relatively low risk. Funding for health agencies has been flat, and there has been little political pressure to focus on young gay blacks and Hispanics.Reaching those men "is the Holy Grail, and we're working on it," said Dr. Jonathan Mermin, director of H.I.V. prevention at the C.D.C. His agency created its Testing Makes Us Stronger campaign — the one Ms. Stone referred to — and has granted millions of dollars to local health departments and community groups to pay for testing.But he could not name a city or state with proven success in lowering infection rates in young gay minority men."With more resources, we could make bigger strides," he said.Gay black youths are hard to reach, experts say. Few are out to their families. Many live in places where gays are stigmatized and cannot afford to move. Few attend schools with gay pride clubs or gay guidance counselors."When we talked about H.I.V. in sex ed, the class started freaking out," said Alex, 20, who was born in St. Croix but raised in New York. "One guy said, 'We ain't no faggots; why do we have to learn this stuff?' So the teacher stopped and moved on to another topic."When those who are poor and homeless go to traditional gay hangouts, they become prey.Kwame, a 20-year-old from Philadelphia, said that on his first day wandering around New York last year, he was propositioned by an older homeless man and by an older transgender person. The homeless man later admitted that he was infected, and added: "If you sit here long enough, you're going to get some propositions — and that's where you're going to sleep tonight. It happened to me, and it's going to happen to you."
PHILADELPHIA — Gov. Tom Corbett of Pennsylvania has thrown his support behind a state bill that would ban discrimination on the grounds of sexual orientation, adding unexpected support from a Republican who once said gay marriage was the equivalent of a brother marrying a sister.Mr. Corbett, in an interview on Tuesday with The Philadelphia Inquirer, said he would back House Bill 300, which would outlaw discrimination in employment, housing and public accommodations on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity and gender expression.While some gay rights advocates were surprised by the governor's remarks, given his strong defense of traditional marriage in the past, they also hailed his newfound support for the bill as significantly increasing its chances of becoming law after a decade of failure in the state legislature amid increasing acceptance of gay rights nationally.The governor's spokeswoman, Lynn Lawson, said Mr. Corbett had not previously opposed the bill, and his remarks were simply a restatement of his long-held opposition to discrimination."Tom Corbett, even from his days as attorney general, has always supported anti-discrimination laws, measures, rules," Ms. Lawson said. "He was never against it. He has just made his position known that he was in support of it."Mr. Corbett has been lagging in the polls ahead of his bid for re-election next year and is viewed as perhaps the nation's most vulnerable governor. But Ms. Lawson said his statement reflected his personal views, not any desire to win votes.According to its supporters, the bill now has 93 co-sponsors out of 203 lawmakers in the House, and 25 out of 50 in the Senate. That represents the strongest support that the bill has ever had in several attempts to get it through the legislature over about 10 years, according to Mason Lane, a spokesman for State Representative Brian Sims, a Philadelphia Democrat who is a co-sponsor."This is the first time I have ever heard him come out in support of L.G.B.T. civil rights," Mr. Sims said of the governor.But the bill still faces strong opposition from State Representative Daryl Metcalf, a conservative Republican who is the chairman of the House State Government Committee. He has refused to give the bill a hearing, saying he does not want to take up the committee's time with a bill that will be defeated. He said the governor's support for the bill would not make any difference to his refusal to hold hearings on it."I don't generally bring up bills that I'm going to defeat in committee," he said in an interview. "I know that the majority of my committee do not support legislation that is going to discriminate against people of faith."Mr. Metcalf said that under the bill, people of faith would be forced to accept what he called the "homosexual agenda."He said women could be subjected to embarrassment or even personal danger if the public accommodation section of the proposed law allowed a man to use a women's bathroom or a locker room "just because that man self-identifies as a woman that day."But Mr. Sims said conservatives should now be more willing to back such measures. "To those conservative leaders in our government who have shied away from being vocal about nondiscrimination legislation in Pennsylvania, I hope this is a green light to openly support nondiscrimination legislation," he said in a statement.
The New Mexico Supreme Court unanimously affirmed on Thursday the right of same-sex partners to marry in the state, reasoning that the "protections and responsibilities that result from the marital relationship shall apply equally" to them and to opposite-sex couples.With the ruling, which takes effect immediately, New Mexico becomes one of 17 states and the District of Columbia to permit same-sex marriage. Thirty-three states limit marriage to opposite-sex couples. "Today's decision is a powerful affirmation that same-sex couples are equal members of New Mexico's diverse culture and must be given the same legal protections and respect as other families," Shannon Price Minter, legal director of the National Center for Lesbian Rights, which joined the American Civil Liberties Union to bring the case to court, said in a statement.In a written opinion, the court's five justices agreed that marriage rights for same-sex couples are guaranteed under the equal-protection clause of the New Mexico Constitution, amended in 1972 to state that "equality of rights under law shall not be denied on account of the sex of any person."Justices weighed this amendment against the opposition's argument that prohibiting same-sex marriage was necessary to protect the government's "overriding interest of responsible procreation and childrearing."The justices said in their opinion that such interest played no role in the development of the state's marriage regulations. Its purpose, they contended, is to "bring stability and order to the legal relationship of committed couples" by defining their responsibilities to one another, their children if they choose to have them, and to their property."Procreation," wrote Justice Edward L. Chavez, author of the opinion, "has never been a condition of marriage under New Mexico law, as evidenced by the fact that the aged, the infertile and those who choose not to have children are not precluded from marrying."The decision capped years of failed attempts in the State Legislature to have same-sex marriage legalized, or banned. In March, six same-sex couples filed a lawsuit, bringing to court a battle that, until then, had been governed primarily by political interests.In August, a district judge ordered the clerks in Bernalillo County — which encompasses the state's most populous city, Albuquerque — and Santa Fe County, which includes the state's capital, to begin issuing marriage licenses to same-sex partners. The 33 county clerks in New Mexico intervened, asking the State Supreme Court to resolve the issue.Among the plaintiffs in the lawsuit were Ona Porter and Miriam Rand, who have been together for 26 years and have three children.After the Supreme Court decision became public on Thursday, Ms. Rand said: "Our kids get to feel they matter both legally and by name."Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican, chose to stay away from the dispute, although she has publicly taken the position that marriage should be between a man and a woman. On Thursday, she talked about a proposal to roll out high-tech research and development programs, and issued no comment on the court's ruling.The justices heard arguments on Oct. 23; spectators packed three rooms in the historic territorial courthouse in Santa Fe. By then, eight county clerks had begun granting marriage licenses to same-sex couples. According to the state's chapter of the A.C.L.U., more than 1,000 such couples have already been married in New Mexico.An appeal of Thursday's ruling is impossible, because it was issued by the state's highest court and is specific to the state's Constitution.
The Rev. Frank Schaefer, a Methodist minister, was stripped of his clerical credentials on Thursday for violating church law by presiding at his son's same-sex wedding. The punishment, imposed by the United Methodist Church in Pennsylvania, was requested by the church prosecutor to deter other ministers from blessing same-sex marriages.But far from intimidating others, the trial and defrocking of Mr. Schaefer have galvanized a wave of Methodist ministers to step forward to disobey church prohibitions against marrying and ordaining openly gay people.Members of the United Methodist Church, the nation's third-largest Christian denomination, have been battling bitterly over homosexuality for four decades. The church now faces an increasingly determined uprising by clergy members and laypeople who have refused to cede, even after losing the most recent votes, at the Methodist convention last year, on proposals to change church teaching."After 40 years of playing nice and attempting a legislative solution, we will not wait any longer," said Matt Berryman, a former Methodist pastor who said he turned in his credentials because he is gay. He now serves as the executive director of the Reconciling Ministries Network, a Methodist gay rights group.In Philadelphia last month, 36 Methodist ministers recited the Declaration of Marriage on the steps of a Methodist church for two gay men in a 25-year relationship. In New York, Methodist clergy members have been triumphantly posting accounts on a blog of the same-sex marriages they have been performing.And in what is considered a brazen act of church boundary-crossing, a retired San Francisco bishop, Melvin Talbert, flew in October to Birmingham, Ala., where same-sex marriage is not legal, to conduct a church ceremony for two gay men against the will of the local bishop. Bishops are considering bringing ecclesiastical charges against him.Church conservatives, however, say they have the momentum. About a half-dozen more ministers are facing church trials, and the defrocking of Mr. Schaefer proves to them that church juries have the courage of their convictions. In addition, they say the church is losing members in its liberal-leaning regions and growing in conservative regions.John Lomperis, the United Methodist director at the Institute on Religion and Democracy, a conservative religious think tank, said the same-sex weddings performed by Methodist clergy were "publicity stunts" that were backfiring."It's very noisy, but I just don't see it as being a sustainable campaign in the long run," Mr. Lomperis said in an interview. "It's like burning down a house to try to take it over from the residents."Mr. Schaefer is hardly the first Methodist minister to be defrocked for disobeying church teachings on homosexuality. Jimmy Creech was stripped of his credentials in 1999 for performing a same-sex ceremony. Irene Elizabeth Stroud, a lesbian living with her partner, was defrocked in 2005.Mr. Schaefer said at a news conference on Thursday after his defrocking, "Here we are 10 years later, and they are doing the same thing."He added, "The church needs to recognize that things have changed and times are changing and people are changing."Mr. Schaefer has four children, three of whom are gay. He performed the wedding for his son, Tim, in Massachusetts in 2007 after same-sex marriage was legalized there.Mr. Schaefer, who is 52, had been serving as the pastor of a small church in Lebanon, Pa., for 11 years when charges were brought against him this year, weeks before the church's statute of limitations was set to expire. The man who brought the complaint was the son of a choir director whom Mr. Schaefer had removed, according to news reports and confirmed by Mr. Schaefer in an interview on Thursday.The church's Book of Discipline, which contains its law and doctrine, forbids same-sex marriage and the ordination of gay people, and says that homosexuality is "incompatible with Christian teaching." Efforts to amend the Book of Discipline have been defeated by increasingly wide margins at the church's quadrennial conferences as delegates representing the church's growing branch in Africa have bolstered the votes of conservative Methodists in the United States.Mr. Schaefer was found guilty last month by a 13-member jury of pastors of disobedience and violating the Book of Discipline. He was given 30 days to decide whether he would comply with church law.At a short meeting Thursday morning at the church's conference center in Norristown, Pa., Mr. Schaefer appeared before about 45 members of the church's ministry board. He was asked, "Will you uphold the Book of Discipline in its entirety?"In an interview afterward, Mr. Schaefer said that as he got into the car to go home, his wife noticed he was shaking. "For 20 years, I've served this church, and it has now put me outside," he said. "I find myself totally shunned, excluded. It just felt awful."He said he would not consider leaving the Methodist Church for a denomination that has changed its teaching on homosexuality."It's not that easy when a church is your spiritual home," he said. "All my children have been baptized in the United Methodist Church. I don't know how to be a minister out of the United Methodist Church."He said his lawyers had already filed an appeal with a judicial body akin to a church appellate court.Those watching the trial were stunned when Bishop Peggy Johnson, who leads nearly 900 United Methodist churches in Pennsylvania and who is Mr. Schaefer's superior, posted a note on her blog this week, saying that she believed the prohibitions on gay ordination and marriage in the Book of Discipline were "discriminatory."The prohibitions, Bishop Johnson continued, taken together with the church's message of inclusion, "has led to confusion by many from the outside of the church wondering how we can talk out of two sides of our mouth."
Salt Lake County began issuing marriage licenses to jubilant same-sex couples on Friday, hours after a federal judge ruled that Utah's amendment barring same-sex marriage violated the United States Constitution.The decision, by Judge Robert J. Shelby of United States District Court, ordered Utah to immediately cease enforcement of its laws restricting marriage to a man and a woman. Gov. Gary R. Herbert condemned the decision and said he was trying to determine "the best course to defend traditional marriage within the borders of Utah."The attorney general said the state would request a stay of the order pending an appeal.Dahnelle Burton-Lee, chief deputy clerk for Salt Lake County, said she was called back from vacation to deal with the crowds that showed up as news of the decision spread. "We're pretty slammed right now," she said, with some 15 couples waiting for their licenses. "And they keep walking in the door."She said that the district attorney had authorized her office to proceed "until or unless we're told otherwise."Seth Anderson of Salt Lake City posted progress reports on Twitter, with pictures of his license and the wedding certificate as he and his partner, Michael Adam Ferguson, married."Me and my new husband!!" he wrote. "My polygamous Mormon great grandparents would be so proud!"Utah, home of the Mormon Church, is one of the country's more conservative and religious states. But if Judge Shelby's ruling is upheld, it will become the 18th to permit same-sex marriage, along with the District of Columbia. The decision came one day after the New Mexico Supreme Court ruled that same-sex couples have the right to marry, and follows a year of legal and legislative victories for gay rights advocates."The court holds that Utah's prohibition on same-sex marriage conflicts with the United States Constitution's guarantees of equal protection and due process under the law," Judge Shelby, appointed by President Obama, wrote in a 53-page decision. "The state's current laws deny its gay and lesbian citizens their fundamental right to marry and, in so doing, demean the dignity of these same-sex couples for no rational reason."State courts in Connecticut, Iowa, Massachusetts and New Jersey, as well as New Mexico, have required recognition of same-sex marriage. But only once before, in California, has a federal court voided a state constitutional amendment barring such marriages that had been adopted by a popular vote.Utah adopted its restrictive marriage amendment in 2004, after the Legislature passed laws that, together with the amendment, were declared unconstitutional on Friday.More than 30 states have passed amendments or laws restricting marriage to a man and a woman. Buoyed by a United States Supreme Court decision in June that declared parts of the federal Defense of Marriage Act unconstitutional, advocates have filed dozens of lawsuits in both state and federal courtschallenging bans.But the Supreme Court has not ruled on whether state amendments limiting marriage to a man and a woman are inherently unconstitutional.The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints opposes same-sex marriage and said in a statement on Friday that it "has been consistent in its support of traditional marriage while teaching that all people should be treated with respect.""We continue to believe that voters in Utah did the right thing by providing clear direction in the State Constitution that marriage should be between a man and a woman," the statement said, "and we are hopeful that this view will be validated by a higher court."
SALT LAKE CITY — They arrived with children in strollers and with bouquets of flowers, with co-workers and with friends — dozens of gay couples pouring into a government building just a few miles from the headquarters of the Mormon Church to do what many said they thought would never be possible: get a Utah marriage license.A federal judge's ruling on Friday afternoon striking down Utah's ban on same-sex marriages touched off what Mayor Ralph Becker called a "thrilling pandemonium." Hundreds of people filled the hallways and spilled out onto the sidewalks on Friday, hoping to marry before the county clerk's offices closed for the weekend — and before an appeals court could stay the decision that made Utah, at least for the moment, the 18th state to allow same-sex marriages.For gay couples, it was a seismic change in a state where 66 percent of voters approved a ban on same-sex marriage in 2004. The Mormon Church also played a pivotal role in supporting a 2008 measure that banned same-sex marriage in California."I can't believe it," James Goodman said. He and his partner, Jeffrey Gomez, rushed from work to the clerk's office on Friday after hearing about the ruling. Since they had no car, they hitched a ride from a boss and colleagues at Nordstrom, where Mr. Gomez works. Their rides also ended up being their witnesses."We knew it was just something we had to do," Mr. Gomez said. "This is my home, and I never thought I'd be able to get married here. I feel like a real person."Salt Lake County officials issued more than 100 marriage licenses by the end of the day. But in legal documents filed late Friday, the state said those marriages might now fall under a "cloud of uncertainty" as it fights the decision by Judge Robert J. Shelby. Utah has asked that the judge's decision be put on hold as it appeals. As of Saturday morning, no court had granted a stay.Brandon Mark, a lawyer in Salt Lake City, said his partner, Weston Clark, called him shortly after the ruling to share the news. They raced down to the clerk's office with their son, Xander, 3, joining a throng of news cameras and cheering couples."We wanted to wait until it was legal in our state," Mr. Mark said. "This is the state we live in and where we raise our family. We weren't willing to settle for second best."Even as gay couples celebrated the ruling, it drew condemnation from some religious leaders and elected officials in this deeply conservative state. Gov. Gary R. Herbert, a Republican, assailed it as judicial activism that had upended the will of Utah voters.The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints issued a statement saying it hoped a higher court would overturn Judge Shelby's ruling. And The Deseret News, which is owned by the Mormon Church, criticized the ruling for creating "a new class of same-gender applicants deemed 'married' under the Utah Constitution."As the case now heads to the United States Court of Appeals for the 10th Circuit, in Denver, gay couples said they had many questions about how state agencies would treat their marriages. Would the state allow them to file joint income-tax returns? Would it allow them to enroll their new spouses in state insurance programs?In its legal filings, Utah said the new same-sex marriages could be "declared invalid" if its legal challenges succeeded. But Jim Dabakis, a gay Democratic state senator who married his longtime partner on Friday, said he planned to call Utah's health insurance office and enroll his partner, "whether the state likes it or not.""We will expect every other right and benefit of other Utah marriages," he said. "I don't see how the state takes that back."
LOS ANGELES — A pastor who was defrocked by the United Methodist Church in Pennsylvania because of his support for same-sex marriage has been offered another position by a Methodist bishop in California, a sign of the deep split within the church over acceptance of gay men and lesbians.The pastor, the Rev. Frank Schaefer, who led a congregation in Lebanon, Pa., was stripped of his clerical credentials last week. Since then, Bishop Minerva G. Carcaño has invited him to minister in the California-Pacific Annual Conference, the church region that includes Southern California and Hawaii.Mr. Schaefer said Monday that he was "very seriously considering" the offer.A complaint was filed against Mr. Schaefer within the church this year because he officiated at his son's 2007 wedding to another man. His trial in November highlighted the increasingly loud objections within the ndenomination to its opposition to same-sex marriage and the ordination of gay people."
DENVER — A federal appeals court cleared the way on Tuesday for same-sex marriages to continue across Utah, denying an emergency request from state officials to halt a flood of unions that began after a lower-court judge declared the state's ban on same-sex marriage to be unconstitutional .Advocates of same-sex marriage cheered the ruling from the United States Court of Appeals for the 10th Circuit, in Denver, while the Utah attorney general's office said it would ask the United States Supreme Court to temporarily halt same-sex marriages in the state until the legal battles could be resolved.On Friday, Judge Robert J. Shelby of Federal District Court sent shockwaves through the conservative state and touched off jubilant impromptu weddings by declaring that Utah's 2004 voter-approved ban on same-sex marriage violated the United States Constitution and denied same-sex couples their "fundamental right" to marriage.Even as Republican leaders in Utah condemned the ruling as an activist judge's usurpation of the voters' will and vowed to appeal, gay couples across the state poured into government offices to marry. About 700 couples have received marriage licenses since Friday, according to a tally by The Deseret News, from the more liberal capital of Salt Lake City to conservative towns in southern Utah."This is one of the most conservative Republican states in the country," said Clifford J. Rosky, a law professor at the University of Utah who served as a minister to wed same-sex couples on Monday. "Thousands of same-sex couples can marry in the state of Utah. They'll have months to do it. If they want to do it, they can get married."Gov. Gary R. Herbert, a Republican, has said the surge of same-sex marriages, combined with uncertainty about which side will prevail in the legal fight, has created "a lot of chaos" in Utah. On Monday, as hundreds of couples lined up outside county clerks' offices to exchange their vows and seek official recognition of their relationships, lawyers for the state appeared before Judge Shelby to ask him to stay his own ruling, saying that allowing the nuptials to continue would cause irreparable harm to the state.When the judge denied Utah's request, the state took its case to the appeals court in Denver, but the judges rejected Utah's request. Mr. Rosky said the ruling suggested that the judges did not believe Utah was likely to succeed in its appeal defending the marriage ban, and that they saw no irreparable harm in allowing same-sex couples to wed.The appellate court is set to hear arguments over Utah's ban on same-sex marriage in the coming weeks.
INDIANAPOLIS — Dominated by Republicans and steeped in traditional values, Indiana seemed among the least likely places to become a battleground in the nation's debate over same-sex marriage when the legislature overwhelmingly chose in 2011 to push forward a state constitutional amendment barring gay couples from marrying.But in the two years since, the landscape has shifted as voters, lawmakers and courts began recognizing same-sex marriage in places like Maryland, Minnesota, New Jersey and New Mexico and as the United States Supreme Court declared parts of the federal Defense of Marriage Act unconstitutional. In just the past few days, a federal judge struck down a ban on same-sex marriage in Utah, home of the Mormon Church, and a federal appeals court rejected a request to halt the marriages on Tuesday. A federal judge in Ohio found that same-sex marriages should be recognized on death certificates.So suddenly Indiana, where lawmakers in the coming weeks are expected to call for the second vote needed to put a ban before voters in the fall elections, is now in a far more tense, unpredictable and closely watched spot than anyone here had imagined — a test case in whether a state will impose new limits on same-sex marriage in this fast-moving political and legal environment."What happens in Indiana is critical," said Brian Brown, president of the National Organization for Marriage, which opposes same-sex marriage. He and other opponents hope the outcome here will reveal that shifts in public sentiment over the last few years are not as widespread as some may think.Supporters of same-sex marriage, however, are pouring money and effort into defeating the measure in Indiana, a possibility that seemed unthinkable not long ago but one that advocates now insist is conceivable. They say victory in a conservative place like Indiana would be a turning point in a fight that has largely been waged in more predictable, left-leaning states or in the courts. "That would send a clear message to opponents of marriage equality that it's time to be done fighting this battle," said Sarah Warbelow, state legislative director of the Human Rights Campaign.As lawmakers prepare to return for a new legislative session in January, it is an especially awkward spot for Republicans, who dominate both chambers of the General Assembly. With an election year ahead and the risk of primaries in May, the issue is pitting socially conservative groups, who are urging a constitutional ban, against sometime allies in the state's business community, who say a ban could cause Indiana economic harm.Few Republicans now seem eager to talk about the issue, and some legislative aides said it was not entirely certain who would formally file the legislation in January.In a speech to lawmakers last month, Representative Brian C. Bosma, the Republican House speaker, ticked off a list of top priorities ahead, including preschool education, road funding and business tax policy, before adding, "And yes, while it's not high on the agenda, we all know we have to deal with whether Hoosiers should be entrusted with the important decision of the marriage amendment."And Gov. Mike Pence, a conservative during his years in Congress, has said he favors traditional marriage, but observers say he has not put the current question of a constitutional ban at the center of his agenda in recent months. His signature is not needed to send the matter to voters in November if legislators approve it a second time.To hear some Democrats tell it, many Republicans here would just as soon see the issue fade away, as they ponder navigating between socially conservative primary voters and a broader array of voters in a general election."The tables have turned on this issue, and the Republican members are at a loss about what to do about it," said Representative Scott Pelath, the House minority leader. "They're quaking in their boots about what will happen if they don't pass this thing. But they're fearful about what will happen down the road if they do."Indiana might well have answered this question years ago if not for complications in its process for amending the State Constitution and for shifting partisan control in the legislature. By state statute, Indiana has long barred same-sex couples from marrying. But a decade of efforts to add the measure to the Constitution were slowed by the process required here — two votes by separately elected legislatures, then a decision by voters statewide — and by roadblocks from Democrats who held a majority in the Indiana House for a stretch before 2011.With firm Republican control of both chambers in 2011, the ban advanced with wide margins. Elections in 2012 further strengthened Republican control, giving supporters of the amendment added reason to expect easy passage a second time.
WASHINGTON — In June, when the Supreme Court stopped short of deciding whether the Constitution guaranteed a right to same-sex marriage, many thought the court had bought itself several years before it had to confront the question again.But the issue will soon return to the court, with officials in Utah saying that within the next few days they will ask the justices to block a trial judge's decision last week that allows same-sex couples to marry there."If the court thought it was going to get a few years," said Michael C. Dorf, a law professor at Cornell, "I think they were naïve."The Supreme Court's two decisions in June were finely balanced, with legal experts saying they had achieved the twin goals of advancing the cause of gay rights and avoiding a backlash in parts of the country not ready to embrace same-sex marriage.One decision struck down the part of the federal Defense of Marriage Act that denied federal benefits to same-sex couples in states that allowed such unions. The other declined to say whether the Constitution required states to allow such marriages in the first place.Since then, the pace of change has been very rapid. When the justices heard arguments in the cases in March, same-sex marriage was permitted in nine states and the District of Columbia. If the Utah decision stands, the number of states allowing such marriages will have doubled, to 18.On Dec. 19, the New Mexico Supreme Court allowed same-sex marriage there. And on Monday, a federal judge in Ohio said the state must in at least some circumstances recognize same-sex marriages performed in other states.Michael J. Klarman, a historian at Harvard Law School and the author of "From the Closet to the Altar: Courts, Backlash and the Struggle for Same-Sex Marriage," said he had expected rapid change — but not this rapid."The Utah decision is unique," he added, "because it's in a state with so much opposition to same-sex marriage. In Utah, you're going to have a real experiment in backlash."Many hundreds of couples have been married there in the last week. Judge Robert J. Shelby of Federal District Court in Salt Lake City turned back a request to stay his decision, and a two-judge panel of the United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit, in Denver, agreed, though it called for "expedited consideration" of the appeal.The question for the Supreme Court in the short term will be whether to block Judge Shelby's ruling while appeals proceed. The state's request will initially be directed to Justice Sonia Sotomayor, the member of the court responsible for overseeing the Tenth Circuit, but she will almost certainly refer the matter to the full court. It is likely to act within several days.The Supreme Court will face difficult calculations, ones it did not have to confront in reviewing decisions from federal courts in California striking down Proposition 8, the state's ban on same-sex marriage. In that case, the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, in San Francisco, stayed both the trial judge's ruling and its own as appeals went ahead.Professor Dorf said there are probably not five votes on the Supreme Court to block Judge Shelby's ruling. "On the strictly legal argument," he said, "it's hard to justify granting a stay."But he added that the lower courts should have done so, partly because of the potential cruelty of voiding the new marriages and partly because the Supreme Court is hard to predict."It's pretty clear that even the five justices who are sympathetic to same-sex marriage would rather take a few years before getting there," Professor Dorf wrote in a blog post on Tuesday. "If their hand is forced, as it now will be, it's impossible to say with certainty what they'll do."Whatever the Supreme Court does regarding a stay, it is hard to see how it could hear the larger issue in the case in the current term. But a decision in the court's next term, culminating in a decision in June 2015, is entirely possible.In the meantime, Judge Shelby's decision will certainly get the justices' attention. He acknowledged, for starters, that the Supreme Court's 5-to-4 decision striking down part of the Defense of Marriage Act, United States v. Windsor, could be read to support either side in his case.Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, writing for the majority in Windsor, said "the definition and regulation of marriage" is generally "within the authority and realm of the separate states." That would seem to suggest that voters in Utah were entitled to amend their state's Constitution to ban same-sex marriage.But Justice Kennedy also stressed the harm to individual liberty in denying equal marriage rights. That counts in the plaintiffs' favor in the Utah case.In Windsor, the two interests — states' rights and gay rights — pointed in the same direction. They were, Judge Shelby wrote, "allied against the ability of the federal government to disregard a state law that protected individual rights."To resolve the tension, Judge Shelby looked to Justice Antonin Scalia's dissenting opinion in Windsor."The view that this court will take of state prohibition of same-sex marriage is indicated beyond mistaking by today's opinion," Justice Scalia wrote.Judge Shelby wrote, referring to himself, that "the court agrees with Justice Scalia's interpretation of Windsor."That part of Judge Shelby's reasoning did not impress Jason Mazzone, a law professor at the University of Illinois. "His opinion would have appeared considerably more judicial had he resisted the urge to give Justice Scalia the finger," Professor Mazzone wrote in a blog post last Friday.That is not to say that Justice Scalia's prediction will turn out to be wrong."Somewhere between the next two and six years, the court will be ready to do it," Professor Klarman said, referring to establishing a constitutional right to same-sex marriage, "assuming the composition of the court does not change."As for the pace of change, Professor Dorf said, "it's faster than the majority in Windsor had expected but not faster than Justice Scalia anticipated."
DENVER — For a judge who would go on to make same-sex marriage legal in Utah, a deep-red state where streets in the capital are numbered by their distance from the Mormon temple, Robert J. Shelby arrived on the bench with enthusiastic praise from Republican leaders.He had been a combat engineer in the Persian Gulf conflict and was, according to state voter records, a registered Republican. Senator Orrin G. Hatch, a seven-term Utah Republican, recommended him for a federal judgeship, calling him an experienced lawyer "with an unwavering commitment to the law." Senator Mike Lee, a Tea Party Republican, said that Mr. Shelby was "pre-eminently qualified" and predicted he would be an outstanding judge.Now, less than two years since he joined the bench, the same-sex marriage case has transformed Judge Shelby into a hero for hundreds of newlywed gay couples and an object of derision for many social conservatives who supported Utah's 2004 ban on such unions.Gov. Gary R. Herbert, a Republican, called him an "activist federal judge," and state lawyers are already trying to have higher courts roll back his decision, potentially undoing as many as 900 new same-sex marriages.State officials are expected to ask the United States Supreme Court as early as Monday to halt the waves of same-sex unions that began minutes after Judge Shelby handed down his decision on Dec. 20 that Utah's measure barring same-sex marriage violated the United States Constitution. Utah leaders say the rush of marriages has sown "chaos," and say they should be halted until the legal case is resolved. Judge Shelby has already refused to stay his own decision, and the United States Court of Appeals for the 10th Circuit also denied Utah's request to stop the marriages.Utah's request will initially land with Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who oversees the 10th Circuit. She is expected to refer it to the entire court, and the justices could rule within days.It is an unlikely cacophony created by a man who quietly ascended through Utah's legal ranks, mostly avoiding media attention, law review articles and other totems of success in the legal profession.Born in Fort Atkinson, Wis., Judge Shelby, 43, moved to Utah for college and now lives in Salt Lake City with his wife and their two children. As a young man, he worked for Snappy Car Rental and was a night manager at a Maceys grocery store in Logan, Utah.He spent his legal career in private practice, working on white-collar criminal defense, commercial law and serious personal injury lawsuits. He was a member of the defense team representing Olympic officials in Salt Lake City accused of bribery in the city's efforts to win the 2002 Winter Games. In his Senate confirmation questions, he said he did free legal work for poorer criminal defendants — usually about two cases a year."So many people thought he was so good, just brilliant," said Andrew Morse, president of Snow, Christensen and Martineau, the firm where Judge Shelby had been a shareholder when he was nominated to the bench. "He's just easy to get along with, always says the right thing."He was active in the state and local bar associations, and was a leader in a group that mentors young trial lawyers. But he largely stayed out of the spotlight and away from politics. In 2010, he and his wife gave a $50 contribution to a Republican candidate for the State Legislature — the only political donation found in state and national campaign-finance databases.Former colleagues said they did not know his religious background. The judge did not respond to emails and a phone call requesting an interview.His answers to questions about empathy in judges, and whether judges should protect the "little guy," are as mild as a glass of milk. "I believe it is the judge's responsibility to reach decisions based exclusively on the application of established precedent to the specific facts presented," he wrote.But this month, when it was time to decide a case brought by three gay couples challenging Utah's ban on same-sex marriages, Judge Shelby appeared to be moved by their stories. In his 50-page ruling, he repeated the stories of how each couple met and fell in love, referring to them not only as plaintiffs or by last name, but as Derek and Moudi, Karen and Kate, Laurie and Kody.He wrote that Utah's voter-approved ban on same-sex marriage violated the Constitution's guarantees of equal protection under the law, and said that the ban denied gay and lesbian couples "their fundamental right to marry."
